Article Title: KDS (Kitchen Display Screens) (Legacy)

*Some Settings May No Loner Apply*
Overview
KDS stands for Kitchen Display Screens. They are screens which are used to display order tickets.
When the chef is finished with the ticket, it can be bumped off the screen. You can send each Item to a maximum of 6 screens but you can have as many screens as you like. The screens run off a windows pc. Each PC can support 2 screens.
 They are suited very well to fast service restaurants; however, they work well with many different types of kitchens such as table service and drive thru
Enabling KDS
To enable the KDS feature you need to complete a few steps
1. Install 
OrderCounter Point Of Sale
 on the machine that will run the KDS Screen
2. Go to 
Back Office > Settings > KDS > KDS Settings
KDS Enabled 
– Set this to Yes
Only Print After Bumping
 – If set to no and an item is set to print to both KDS and a printer then the ticket will be sent to both at the same time. If set to Yes then the ticket will not be printer till after the item is bumped ???? Currently not working. Item never gets printed. Do you have to set the bump printer on the station or is that for something else?
Send KDS Immediately
 – If set to No then nothing will be sent to KDS until it sent from the POS. This used the same logic as sending to Printers.
If set to Yes then the items will be sent to KDS as soon as they are rang through. As you press the Items on the POS they will immediately show on the KDS
Use prep times
3. Enable KDS in Terminal Settings for each terminal. If not enabled then that terminal will not send anything to KDS screens.
Go to the Front End > Terminal Settings > KDS > Choose “On” from the drop - down list
Creating stations
Stations are the screens themselves. Items are sent to stations; these need to be set up prior to assigning Items. 
⦁
 
Go to 
Back Office > Settings > KDS > Add KDS Station
Station Name
 – The name of the station. For example, Desserts
Display Mode
 – Choices are - 
Ticket
 – In this mode the whole ticket with all the items will be grouped together and are bumped as a whole ticket
Item
 – In this mode the system will display a list of all items set to send to the station along with a summary of how many of those items are on order. Each item on the order will be sent separately which enables you to bump them separately. Once an item is bumped it is removed from the Item summery count
  
On Order  -  
? KDS crashes when this is enabled
Expo Station? – 
Is this saying items printed here also go to the expo station or that this is the expo station? How do you set the expo station?
Bump From All Stations – 
Determines whether pressing bump removes the ticket from just the station where bump was pressed or from all stations
Require Selection to Bump –
 If set to Yes, the bump button will not do anything unless you 
First select the ticket you would like to bump. If set to No then when bump is pressed it will bump the oldest ticket
Prioritize tickets with all items bumped ?
Show Item Quantity Threshold – ?
Require all tickets to be bumped before Expo can be bumped
Show Modifier Quantity Threshold  -   ?
Bump Printer –  
?? http - //localhost/OCPOS/settings_kds.php only print after bumping. If set to no then when you have an item that is set to print to kds and a normal printer it will send to both at the same time. If set to on then nothing gets to the printer. I believe when you bump the item it is supposed to go to the printer but it does not. I have tried this with the station bump printer setting on and off.
⦁
 
Press  
Under
 KDS Station
 you have
 Display Settings.
 These are the Display settings for that KDS Station. You can have a different setting for Ticket and Item.
 Click on the Pencil Icon next to Ticket or Item to Edit the Settings
Display Settings relate to the screen itself. 
The Ticket display settings determine how the Ticket will look on the screen
Display Settings
Container Width – 
The width in pixels for the ticket (300 is a good starting point)
Display Background Color – 
The color of the background that will sit behind the tickets
Container Background Color – 
The Color of the main body of the ticket
Container Selected Background Color –
Container Border Width –
 The thickness in pixels of the border on the right and left of the ticket. 
Container Border Height – 
The height in pixels of the border at the top and bottom of the ticket
Container Border Color – 
The Color of the boarder that surrounds the outside of each ticket
Container Margin Width – 
The gap in pixels between the side of one ticket to the side of the next
Container Margin Height – 
The gap in pixels between the top of one ticket and the bottom of the next
Container Padding Width – 
The number of pixels between the white line that defines the outside of the ticket and the ticket boarder
Container Padding Height - 
The number of pixels between the white line that defines the outside of the ticket and the ticket board
er
Item Font Size – 
The size of the Item text (12 minimum recommended)
Item Foreground Color – 
The Item Text color
Modifier Font Size – 
The size of the Modifier text (12 minimum recommended)
Modifier Foreground Color – 
The Modifier Text color
The container boarder will begin to flash after the ticket is x minutes old
 
Ticket Display Settings
Container Header background Color – 
The color of the Top of the ticket that contains the table number and time since order
Container Footer Background Color – 
The color of the Bottom of the ticket that contains the server name and order number
Top Left Font Size – 
The size of the font shown in the top left of the ticket (12 minimum recommended)
Top Left Foreground Color – 
The color of the font shown in the top left of the ticket
Top Right Font Size – 
The size of the font shown in the top right of the ticket (12 minimum recommended)
Top Right Foreground Color – 
The color of the font shown in the top Right of the ticket
Bottom Left Font Size –
 The size of the font shown in the bottom left of the ticket (12 minimum recommended)
Bottom Left Foreground Color – 
The color of the font shown in the bottom left of the ticket
Bottom Right Font Size – 
The size of the font shown in the bottom right of the ticket (12 minimum recommended)
Bottom Right Foreground Color  - 
 The color of the font shown in the bottom right of the ticket
 
Item Display Settings
If Back Office > Settings > KDS > Edit KDS Station > Display Mode is set to Item then it will use these settings
Container Width –
 The width in pixels for the ticket (300 is a good starting point)
Display Background Color – 
The color of the background that will sit behind the tickets
Container Background Color – 
The Color of the main body of the ticket and the on order overview
Container Selected Background Color
Container Border Width – 
The thickness in pixels of the border on the right and left of the ticket. 
Container Border Height –
 The height in pixels of the border at the top and bottom of the ticket
Container Border Color – 
The Color of the boarder that surrounds the outside of each ticket
Container Margin Width – 
The gap in pixels between the side of one ticket to the side of the next
Container Margin Height – 
The gap in pixels between the top of one ticket and the bottom of the next
Container Padding Width –
 The space in pixels between the text and the boarder at the left and right of the ticket
Container Padding Height  - 
 The space in pixels between the text and the border at the top and bottom of the ticket
Item Font Size – 
The size of the Item text (12 minimum recommended)
Item Foreground Color – 
The Item Text color
Modifier Font Size – 
The size of the Modifier text (12 minimum recommended)
Modifier Foreground Color – 
The Modifier Text color
On Order  -  ?? if set to on order the KDS does not run
Set items to print to a KDS screen
From the 
Front End > Menu Management > Menu Item> 
Choose the 
Category >
Choose the
 Item > 
Choose the
 KDS screen
 from one of the KDS drop - down boxes
From The
 Back Office > Menu > Menu Items >
 choose the 
Category >
choose the 
Item > 
Choose the
 KDS screen
 from one of the KDS drop - down boxes
You can also use Multi item Edit
Set a machine to be a certain KDS screen
1. Open c - \ocpos\OC - KDS.exe on the machine you want to use as the KDS station
2. Click on the gear icon in the bottom right    
3. Choose a station name from the drop down list
4. Press
 
KDS Configuration from within the app
1. 
Open c - \ocpos\OC - KDS.exe
2. 
Click on Configure
You have the following sections
⦁
 
Color Pallets
⦁
 
Ticket Age
⦁
 
Ticket View
⦁
 
Summary View
⦁
 
Station View
⦁
 
Station Options
⦁
 
Diagnostics
Color Palettes
All tickets have color palettes that they link to. To set the colors, go to the Color Palettes tab and set up how the tickets should look under different situations. Included by default are 3 sample age-based palettes. You can create as many as you like.
 
To add a Palette, click on “
Add
”
This will Create a palette called “
New Palette
”
As you change the options you will see the changes reflected in the “***Sample Ticket***”
Press “
Save
” when you have made all your changes
Here is an overview of each option and what it does 
Header Text Color
 -  The color of the text at the top left of the ticket
2nd Header Text Color
 -  The color of the text at the top right of the ticket
Header Back Color
 -  The color of the background for the Header text and 2nd Header Text
Footer Text Color
 -  The color of the text at the bottom left of the ticket
2nd Footer Text Color
 -  The color of the text at the bottom right of the ticket
Footer Background Color 
-  The color of the background for the footer text and 2nd footer text
Ticket Background Color
 -  The color of any blank space in the ticket behind the items
Border Color 
-  The color of the boarder around the whole ticket
Item Text Color
 -  The color of the text for the items that are listed in the ticket
Item Back Color
 -  The color of the background for each item
Modifier Text Color
 -  The color of any modifiers that are added to the ticket
Modifier Back Color
 -  The color of the background for each modifier
 
Ticket Age
If you want tickets to change their palette depending on how long they have been displayed on the KDS then this is where you do so. Here you will link an age (in seconds) to a color palette. If you want a ticket to cycle back and forth between two palettes, set the second palette as the “Blink” palette. You can ass as many age thresholds as you like
You can also add Bump Settings which will allow you to have an item change its color if that item has been bumped from another screen. More details on that below
 
⦁      Click on “
Add
”
 This will create a new age threshold. 
⦁
 
Click on the New Age Threshold 
⦁
 
Enter a name such as On Time or Late
⦁
 
Enter an age in seconds
⦁
 
Choose a color Pallet from the “Default Palette” list. The ticket will use this palette when it reaches the age you defined in the previous step
⦁
 
If you would like the ticket to cycle between 2 color palettes when the age is reached then choose another palette fron the “Default Blink Pallet” List
⦁
 
Press Save
Bump Settings
As mentioned above you can have an item change color if it is bumped from another station.
Here is a practical example
You have 3 stations  
⦁
 
Grill
⦁
 
Fry
⦁
 
Expediter
You have a menu Item that contains Steak and Fries. You set Fries to go to the Fry and Expediter station and the Steak to go to the Grill and Expediter station. So the expediter gets both items.
When you bump the Steak the color of the steak on the expediter will change color so you know it has been cooked and are just waiting on the Fries. When the color of all the items have been changed then you know you can plate the meal
There is a setting that is related to this in station options called “Require all ticket items to be bumped before expo can bump” This means that you will not be able to bump the ticket from the expo until the fry and grill stations have bumped their tickets. 
There is nothing that defines a station as an expo. It just means that it is the station that is also sent the items.
⦁
 
Click on “Add” under Bump settings
         A “New Bump” will be added to the list
⦁
 
Click on the “New Bump” that was added
⦁
 
Enter an age in seconds. If you don’t want to have the ticket change color depending on age and just want the expediter to change item color when the item is bumped then you will want to enter a high number in here. 86000 is what we normally use.
If you want to use the age thresholds to change the color of the tickets and you also want to use the bump settings then instead of making a new setting just for bumped items you would add the bump settings to each of the age thresholds. This will allow you to have the same color for the bumped items but have the ticket change color depending on age 
⦁
 
Enter a Name for the Bump
⦁
 
Choose a Bump Pallet
This is the palette that will be used to control the color the Items goes when the Item is bumped
⦁
 
If you want the item to cycle between 2 palettes when the Item is bumped then choose another palette from the “Bump Blink Palette” list
⦁
 
Bump stations are the stations that will initiate the bump that causes the color change. If we are using the example above then you would want to select the Fry or Grill station as the bump station.
You could create 2 separate age thresholds and choose a different color profile for each. This would allow you to be able to know which station bumped the item. This probably won’t be required but it is good to keep in mind that it is possible
Ticket View
Where Color pallet allows you to choose the colors you will use with your tickets, Ticket View changes the sizes of the ticket and everything inside it, as well as some more in-depth options. You can link a ticket age to a ticket view. The ticket view gets assigned to a station
You can have multiple ticket views and assign these views to different stations. Each station can be assigned multiple views and can cycle through them using the “View Swap” button on the KDS screen
Left Header Font Size 
- The size of the text in the top left of the ticket
Right Header Font Size 
- The size of the text in the top right of the ticket
Left Footer Font Size
 - The size of the text in the bottom left of the ticket
Right Footer Font Size
 -  he size of the text in the bottom right of the ticket
Item Font Size 
- The size of the text used for the Items within the ticket
Item Font 
- The style of fond used for the Items in the ticket
Item Font Weight
 - 
Choose from
 
 
      
Normal   
 
      
Black     
 
      
Bold
 
      
Demi Bold
 
      
Normal
 
      
Thin
Item Font Style
 - 
 
 
Choose from
 
      
Normal
 
      
Italic
 
      
Oblique  
 
NOTE: Not all machines will support all weights and styles. This is dependent on the graphics card on the machine you are using.
Modifier Margin
 - This is how many pixels there are around the modifier text. Left Top, Right and bottom are set in this section and are separated by a comma. So to have the modifiers indented from the left but have no gap top bottom or right then you would enter 10,0,0,0
Modifier Font size
 - The size of the text used for the Modifiers
Modifier Font 
- The style of font used for the Modifiers
Modifier Font Weight
 -
 Choose from 
 
      
Normal
 
      
Black
 
      
Bold
 
      
Demi Bold
 
      
Normal
 
      
Thin
Modifier Font Style -    Choose from
 
      
Normal
 
      
Italic
 
      
Oblique  
 
NOTE: Not all machines will support all weights and styles. This is dependent on the graphics card on the machine you are using. 
Added Lines. If an order is amended and another item is added then it will come though on the same ticket on a new line. You can have this line have different colors to the normal lines. 
Added Line Border Color 
-   The color of the border surrounding any items that have been added after the ticket was first sent. The “Item Border Thickness” needs to be more than 0,0,0,0 for the color to show
Added Line Font Color 
- The color of the font for any items added after the ticket was first sent
Added Line Back Color
 - The color of the background for any items added after the ticket was first sent
Changed Line Border Color
 - The color of the border surrounding any line that have been changed since the item was first sent
Changed Line Font Color 
– The color of the text used for any line that have been changed since the item was first sent
Changed Line Back Color 
– The color of the background for any line that have been changed since the item was first sent
Deleted Line Strike Through
 - If ticked then any time an item on KDS gets deleted from the POS it will show with a line strike through the text  
Deleted Line Font Color
 - The color of the text for any items that have been deleted
Deleted Line Back Color 
- The color of the background for any items that have been deleted
Item Border Thickness
 - The thickness in pixels of the border that shows round any Items that have been added after the ticket has already been sent to KDS in. This is displayed for Left Top Right and Bottom in the format of 1,1,1,1 where each 1 is the thickness of the border for each position
Modifier Border Thickness
 - The thickness of 
Ticket Width
 - How wide in Pixels the ticket is
Border Margin -
 Is the thickness in pixels of the border that surrounds the ticked when it is selected. . Displayed in the format of 1,1,1,1 where 1 is the number of pixels and the order is Left, Top, Right, Bottom. Increasing this will also increase the distance between the tickets as you can only see the border when the ticket is selected
Background Color
 - The color behind the tickets
Highlight Color 
- The color that surrounds the ticket when it is selected
Ticket Margin
 - This is the gap in pixels between the tickets. Displayed in the format of 1,1,1,1 where 1 is the number of pixels and the order is Left, Top, Right, Bottom
Item Padding
 - The amount of space in pixels between one Item and the next on the same ticket. Displayed in the format of 1,1,1,1 where 1 is the number of pixels and the order is Left, Top, Right, Bottom
Display Mode
 - Choose from Ticket or Item. Ticket will show all the items sent from the same ticket grouped together. Item will show each item individually so they can be bumped individually 
Item Add Mode - Choose from - 
 
Modify Ticket
 - Will update the existing ticket
 
 
New Ticket 
- will add the items to a new ticket
Max Line Length 
- How long in characters the Item can be. So if you have and Item called Coors but you have the Max Line Length set to 2 then it will only show Co. This can be useful if you have items with long names and you want to avoid having very wide tickets
Ticket Corner Radius 
- Controls how round the edges of the ticket are. 
 
Default Palette
 - This is the palette that will be used for this view unless the age of the ticket forces a different palette to be use
Ages 
– If you want the ticket to use a different pallet depending (Change color) on the age of the ticket then you can choose an age threshold from the drop down box then click on “Add” to put it in the “Ages” list.
Age Thresholds are created in the “Ticket Age” section
Overridden Items
 – These are items that you do not want to change. You want to override any of the automatic changes and always keep the items the same foreground and background colors. 
Chose an Item or Modifier from the lists. Then choose a foreground and background and press “Add”
Items or modifiers listed here will always use the foreground and background colors shown
Summary View
This is how the Item Summary at the top of the KDS screen is going to display. You can create multiple views here and then choose which view you want to assign to a station. 
You can assign multiple views to a station and then cycle through them with the “View Swap” button on the KDS Screen
 
 
Dock Location
 - Where you would like the summary to appear. Choose from top bottom left or right
Width
 - The width in pixels for the Summary. If it is set to “Top” or “Bottom” then it will display the full width but it will still only use the space that you allocate here. If using top or bottom then make the Width the full resolution of your screen 
Height
 - The height in pixels for the summary section. If set to “Left” or “Right” then it will always use the full height but it will still only use the space that you allocate here. If using top or bottom then make the Width the full resolution of your screen 
Back Color
 - The background color of the summery section
Item Margin
 - The distance in Pixels between the Items and the Items next to them. Displayed in the format of 1,1,1,1 where 1 is the number of pixels and the order is Left, Top, Right, Bottom
Item Width
 - How much space there is (In Pixels) to display the Item. If you increase the size of the font you would also have to increase the width so you could fit it in the available space
Item Height 
-   How much space there is (In Pixels) to display the Item. If you increase the size of the font you would also have to increase the width so you could fit it in the available space
Item Font Weight
 - 
Choose from 
 
Normal   
 
Black -    
 
Bold
 
Demi Bold
 
Normal
 
Thin
Item Font Style - 
 
Choose from
 
Normal
 
Italic
 
Oblique  
 
NOTE:
 Not all machines will support all weights and styles. This is dependent on the graphics card on the machine you are using.
Font Size 
- How large you want the font to appear
Font 
- Enter the name of the font you wish to use
Default Palette – The Item text and background colors for the Summary will be derived from the palette chosen here
Items to Summarize
 – This is a list of all items that will be displayed on the summary screen. Each Item will display the combined number of those items from all tickets currently on order at that station. Items sent to other stations will not count towards the summary view
To add an item select it from the list and press “Add”. Repeat this process until all required items are added. 
On Order / All Day screen
If you want to use the screen for on order / all day view then you would set the size of the summary screen to full height and full width. This means that it will fill the whole screen
Having a sale item for example large chicken strips meal attribute 5 chicken strips to the summary when sold is not yet supported.
Station Views
Here you assign Ticket and Summary Views to a station. If you do not assign any views to a station then that station will not display any information
First you will need to add a view to the “All Views Section”. This will be a combination of a Ticket View and a Summary View. 
You may not want to have a summary view, in which case choose “Hidden View” as your summary view. This is just a summary view with a height of zero so it will not show
If you want to use the same ticket view but a different summary view on a screen then you will need to create 2 views and assign both views to the station. You can cycle through the views with the “View Swap” button on the KDS screen. 
Enter a name for the new view in the Name Field
Select a ticket view and a summary view by clicking on one
 
Click on add to move it into the “All Views” section
Now assign the view you just created to a Station.
Select the station
 
Select the View
 
 then click on “
Assign to Station
"
 
Station Options
Bump from All Stations 
- ? When you bump a ticket from one station it will bump from any other station it was sent to. Not sure if this works with tickets or items. What if you have part of the ticket on each screen
Require Selection to Bump
 – If selected then pressing the “Bump” Button on KDS won’t do anything unless you first select a ticket or item to Bump
Prioritize tickets with all items bumped 
– This means that when all the items on a ticket are bumped then will show at the top of the list on the station with this option ticked. The idea being that you have an expo screen with this ticked and when all the stations have bumped all the items in the ticket, that ticket will move to the top of the expo screen so they can see its ready to go out
Require all ticket items to be bumped before Expo can bump
 – There is no way to define an expo screen it is simply a second screen that you also send the item to .This options says that you cannot delete a ticket unless it has already been bumped from any other screen it was sent to. You enable this setting only on the station where you want the restriction to apply. If you enabled this on the prep station and the expo then you would not be able to bump from either
Print ticket after bump
 – If you set an Item to be sent to a KDS station and a printer then with this option unticked the station and the printer will get the ticket at the same time. If you tick this option then the physical printer wont be sent the ticket untill it is bumped from the KDS station. The idea being that you have a printer next to the KDS and when you have bumped the ticket it will print out and you can give it to the wait staff. you can print a ticket at any time highlighting the ticket and then pressing the Print button on the KDS screen. 
Minutes to keep Bumped Tickets
 – When a ticket is bumped you are able to recall it for the period of time set here
Do not show items delivered using the following methods
 – Choose one or more of these by using the Shift or Ctrl keys then press save to save the selection. Items sent using the selected order methods will not show up on KDS. To de select an item hold Ctrl and click on the item
​
*For any changes or updates, please reference the document here:
 
https://www.dropbox.com/sh/3bc33g9rn11zb43/AAB8VOP1GzLeTRslD8OLrD_Da/Documents/New%20KDS.docx?dl=0
*
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Epson Printers RMA

1. Provide Scott with the serial number for the printer so that he can check the proof of purchase to see if the printer is still in warranty. The serial number can be found on the side of the printer or on the bottom of the printer. An example is shown below.
 
2. If the printer is still in warranty you will need to call the Epson support line on your phone to contact Epson Support. They will walk you through some troubleshooting steps and come up with a solution to fix the issue or they will issue you an RMA for the printer. Epson Support Number: 
562-276-1314
 
3. They may ask you to test the printer with another ethernet cable if it is an ethernet printer,
 
or they may ask you to test the cable with a different printer so be prepared if you need to
 
do those things.
 
4. If they ask for a name or email use your name and for the email use
 
support@ordercounter.com
.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Lenovo Tablet RMA

1. The RMA process for the Lenovo tablets is a little different than the other RMA processes. The tablet is a product that we generally get off of Amazon. 
2. To begin the process you get with Scott and let him know that you have a lenovo tablet that is broken/not working. Then he will go through the process of finding the proof of purchase and the warranty that goes with the tablet. 
3. If still in warranty he will get you a return label that will have instructions to follow. It will ask you to include a certain part of the paper inside the box and the other part will be the shipping label.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Runtouch RMA Documentation

1. Identify the source of the issue and complete your own troubleshooting steps. 
2. Email Dora from runtouch and explain the issues that you are having and she will email you back with some troubleshooting steps. 
Her email: 
dora@runtouch.com.cn
 
3. Follow through with the troubleshooting steps given to you and reply accordingly. 
4. If you are unable to resolve the issue, Dora should offer to provide you the parts that are needed to fix it or a replacement terminal. 
5. You may need to include an image showing the serial number that 
was provided on the box. Such as the image that is provided below.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: IDTech Card Reader RMA Documentation

1. The first step in performing an RMA for an IDTECH reader is to Download the SDK Demo software to test the card reader. The download link for the software can be found here. It will be one of the last options and it reads “Dot Net SDK Demo.zip”
 
2. Once you have this software open you want to open it up and plug the card reader into your system. Run the start EMV transaction to test the chip card reader and the card swipe. Insert the card as prompted.
3. If there is an error you want to go to the VivoConfig section and double click on the Read Device Config section. When the Configuration Settings window is open press the Execute Read Device Button.
4. Once the configuration runs it will prompt you to save the configuration to your computer. 
5. The last thing that you need is the serial number for the device. You can use the SDK Demo to find it. It will be next to the device in the top left. Double check this number with the serial number on the physical device itself. 
6. Now that you have tested the card reader and you have the config file you can start the RMA process.
7. To start the RMA process head to the IDTech help center here. Once on the website press the RMA button that is on the lower part of the screen. It may ask you to create an account or sign in. Create an account if you do not have one. 
8. Clicking the RMA button will bring you to a page that prompts you to explain the issue. Explain the issue that the device is experiencing and the steps that you have taken to test 
the error. Make sure to include the serial number in both the description and the summary.
9. When you hit the create button it will bring you to the ticket which shows your message and the support technician will reply to your RMA on this page. This is the page where you will upload the Vivoconfig that you saved earlier. Press the paperclip and navigate to the file location and select the config that you just saved. 
10. After you hit the create button it brings you to the page where you can manage your RMA requests that are currently pending. You will be able to access the RMA’s and the messages that the IDTECH support team have sent.
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: CRS RMA Method

1) Identify and document issue in a ticket with customer and get them to provide photo of serial number. An example of a serial number image is shown below.
​
2) With the serial number that the customer sent you have Scott check if the device is still in warranty. if it is in warranty continue on to step 3.
3) Take the information from the customer about what the issue was and the troubleshooting task that you completed with customer and describe them in an email to Chuck Christie.
Email: chuck.chrisitie@crs-usa.com
4) Chuck will let you know the information that is needed to complete the RMA such as the address that the device should be sent to and the specific steps needed to complete the RMA.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Imaging Terminals

Step 1: 
      Install 
Acronis Cyber Protect Home Office For PC
               
   Download Link:
 
https://www.acronis.com/en-us/support/updates/index.html
                        
*You will need to create an account and sign up for the Free Trial*
                              
Step 2:
      Once installed hover over "
Add Backup" 
and select "
Add existing backup
"
            
                  
      
            
                  Select your image from the 
File Directory
                  
Step 3:
     
 Select your image from the Backups menu
         
   
Step 4:
      Connect the 
Hard Drive
 from the 
Terminal 
you'll be imaging
            
May need a Sata Adapter
            
Step 5:
      Click on "
Recovery
" at the top
            Select "
Disks
" if not selected
                  Select the Disk that shows up 
                        Select the 
Connected Hard Drive
 from the "
Recover to"
 Drop Down Menu
                        
*Do not select the first drive unless it is your recovery disk, otherwise you will 
      
      
      
      
      
wipe the drive of the computer you're currently on*
      
                        
Step 6:
      Click "
Recover Now"
 to begin imaging
      
            
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Setting Up PAX Device

SP30 Setup
PAX IP Address 
Ready Screen
Press ‘F’ key
Password: MMDD (today or tomorrow)
If "MMDD" doesn't work, add the Year: "MMDDYY"
Press: 6. Communication → 6. LAN Parameters → IP Address
S300 Setup
PAX IP Address 
Ready Screen
Press ‘F’ & "1" keys together
Password: 9
Press: 6. Communication → 6. LAN Parameters → IP Address
Terminal Setup
Atl+ctrl+\
PAX Tab
Change processor in dropdown @ the top
PAX Comm Method: Ethernet (TCP/IP)
PAX Ethernet IP (Type in the IP from the device)
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Maverick Setup

Information Required to Begin
Business DBA
This does not gave to be the legal business name, just the name of their business that they're operating as.
Will this application be for an ecommerce or in-store processing store?
Ecommerce: Online ordering and/or QR Pay?
In-store: POS Processing or side terminal (or deja vu terminal)?
Clarify whether they will be using OrderCounter POS processing
What is their rate and what is their rate type?
Two types of rates:
Cash Discount:
To calculate this, take their cash discount rate, divide it by 100 plus their cash discount rate and then multiply that by 100.
Example: Cash discount rate = 3.99%. Cash discount effective rate = (3.99/103.99) x 100 = 3.8369%
Effective rate:
This is the processing rate they pay if they are not using cash discount. This information will come
 from Thomas directly and it will not require any calculations.
Starting the Application
After logging in, you will come to the Maverick dashboard.
On the left side panel, select Applications and List





Once in the Applications page, find the application named "GENERIC ORDERCOUNTER 3.99%"

f
Click on "Options" at the bottom of the application and then "Pre-generate"
Once the application duplicates, click on "Options" and then "Edit" on the duplicated application
If the application uses Datacap Net E Pay Hosted and OrderCounter is the merchant, nothing needs to be changed.
Otherwise, adjust the 'Equipment Used' portion to the service they're using and change 'Equipment Provided By' to 'Deployment Center.'
Once you've ensured the proper information in those two fields, check 'I confirm' and click 'Submit' at the bottom of the page
On the next page, Delete 'Generic OrderCounter 3.99%' as the legal business name.
Then, change the DBA name field to the business name
After that, you can leave the business locations information the same, or you can change any of that information if you know the proper choices.
Click 'Next' and change the email address under 'Address & Contact Information' to the merchant's email.
Note:
 The person or people that you put under here must own 25% or more of the company, and in total, must own at least 51% of the company.
Click 'Next' and delete FIS under 'Current Processor'
If this is an Ecommerce account, adjust the 'Monthly Volume' to $10,000, the 'Avg Transaction Amount' to $50, and the 'Max Transaction Amount' to $1,000
Google 'MCC code [BUSINESS TYPE HERE]' to find the proper MCC code
For restaurants, this will typically by 5812
Under 'Intended usage,' select 'VISA, MASTERCARD, DISCOVER, AMERICAN EXPRESS OPTBLU'
Under 'Sales method,' leave the settings as In-person: 98% and Mail/Phone: 2%
If it's ecommerce, adjust it to In-person: 0%, Mail/Phone: 0%, and Internet/eCommerce: 100%
Then, under 'Please describe your refund return policy' type 'no returns'
After than, under 'Card-not present questionnaire' ensure that 'Inventory Maintained' is set to 'On-Site'
Leave the rest of the information the same
Under 'Customer Profile,' adjust the slider to be 100% Individual consumers
Under 'Customer location profile,' adjust the slider to be 100% local
After that, ensure that 'How long after charging the customer...' is set to 24 Hours.
Then, ensure that 'How long after the time of order...' is set to 24 Hours.
Then, ensure that 'Is the cardholder charged at' is set to Time of Order.
After that, ensure that the text in 'Do you have a retail location...' is set to 'Yes, same as DBA'
Then, ensure that the text in 'How do you advertise' is 'No'
Then, ensure that 'Is your business seasonal?' and 'Have you (your business or any principal) ever ...' are set to No
Click 'Next' and there will be a notification that three documents will be needed. These can be added at this point, or added later.
Three Documents:
Processing Statement
This will just need show the general total volume of processing for the store
Voided Check
This is used to verify the account and routing numbers.
Check Requirement
Officially printed business name on the check
If they do not this document, they will need a bank letter on bank letterhead
Bank Letter Requirements
Legal Business Name
Routing Number
Account Number
Signed by bank employee
Quality picture of the Driver's License
These documents can be emailed/texted to us directly or added by the merchant on their side.
Click 'Next' and set all of the fields to 0, except for 'Qualified Rate,' 'Retrieval Fee,' and 'Chargeback Fee.'
Retrieval fee: 7.50
Chargeback fee: 25.00
Qualified Rate: the rate that you were originally given (For our previous example, it was 3.99)
For 'Special Pricing or Exception Notes,' leave blank unless a deal has been approved by Thomas that must go in this field
Click 'Save'
From the Application List page, click the 'Send Link' button on the application you created.
After this, copy the link provided and send that link directly to the owner's email
Let them know that they will receive two separate documents (one for Maverick and one for eSign)
After sending that link, go back to the listing for that application and click 'Automation' then set both options to 'Yes' by clicking on them.
Status Changes & Notifications:
New: This means that the application hasn't yet completed and moved to the underwriting phase
Underwriting: This is where Maverick will review the application and alert us of any additional information they may need for the application.
Pending: This means there are additional requirements that Maverick is requesting from us. Generally, these will be requiring some sort of business documentation that will prove the annual amount we are asking them to approve. Most of the time, we can get them to work with us on this by emphasizing that the application pertains to low volume restaurants.
It's important to turn on notifications for these status changes.
First, click on the bell icon at the top right of the window
Next, click the cog in the side panel that appears
Finally, check the best ways to notify you about any status changes
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Port Forwarding

Configuring port forwarding for OrderCounter's back office is a crucial step for users seeking remote access to their system. This guide will walk you through the steps necessary to ensure a seamless and secure setup for accessing the OrderCounter back office from any location.
Understanding Port Forwarding
  
Port forwarding is a network configuration that directs requests on specific network ports to devices on your local network. This is essential for accessing the OrderCounter back office remotely, as it enables the external traffic to reach the correct internal device.
Step 1: Determine the Required Port
  
For OrderCounter, the commonly used port for remote access is port 80. However, in cases where port 80 is occupied (e.g., for VoIP services), an alternative port such as 8080 can be utilized.
Step 2: Accessing Your Router Settings
  
Locate your router's IP address. This can often be found in your router's manual or on the device itself.
Open a web browser and enter your router's IP address into the address bar. This will take you to your router's login page.
Enter your router's username and password. If you have not changed these from the default, the default credentials might also be found in the manual or on the device.
Step 3: Configuring Port Forwarding
  
Once logged into your router, look for a tab or section named “Port Forwarding,” “Applications,” “Gaming,” or something similar.
You will need to add a new port forwarding entry. Input the internal IP address of the server where the OrderCounter back office is hosted. This ensures that any external requests on the specified port get directed to this server.
Enter the port number you wish to open for remote access (80 as the default or 8080 if the default is in use).
Step 4: Save and Test
  
Once you have entered the necessary information, save your changes.
To test if the port forwarding has been successful, attempt to access your OrderCounter back office remotely using your public IP address followed by the port number (e.g., http://<Your_Public_IP>:8080 if you're using port 8080).
Troubleshooting
  
If you encounter difficulties accessing your back office remotely, ensure that the port forwarding is still configured to the same IP address of your server
.
Use the 'ipconfig' command in a command prompt (on Windows) or 'ifconfig' (on macOS and Linux) to verify your server's internal IP address.
You may need to create a static IP address for your server to ensure that the internal IP address does not change, disrupting the port forwarding setup.
 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Adding A Day Screen To KDS 2.0

Here is a sample of how to get a nice dynamic all day view like this:
First, ensure that you have an AllDay ticket view. If you don't have one, just make one.
The key things are setting the docking location to the RIGHT, setting the Width at a reasonable value (400 in this case) and setting the height to the height of the screen of the system you are on to make the background color look good.
Next, we create a Station view with the primary ticket view that we want, plus the new all day view.
We select the normal ticket view, the all day view, and NONE. We give it a name, and click ADD. We then ensure that the station is selected, and click ASSIGN to station. If there are other views assigned to this station, remove them.
Next, we need to create the data points. Here I create two. I create a label that can display any text you want above the list, and the actual dynamic All-Day List.
Make sure that you make sure the names are meaningful as you will refer to them on this next step where we assign them to that all day screen.
We are going to select the station. Then ensure that the correct sub view is highlighted. After that, Add each of the data points to the sub-view. After adding the points, adjust their position in pixels, and the color. Notice how I offset the AllDay datapoint 40 pixels down so they won't be on top of each other.
Finally, we filter out the tickets from that subview so they won't overwrite our datapoint.Select your view, then select your AllDay subview. Highlight all the order methods, and add them to the filtered out list.
After this last step, you just need to restart your KDS and the information will be displayed as shown in the first image. If you have any questions, please email 
support@ordercounter.com
. All these features are available in the most recent version of the KDS included with version 4.9.0.8.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Enabling EBT On Ingenico Devices

Overview
The merchant will need to communicate with their card processor that they will be using EBT. It is the card processor's job to enable EBT for the site. 
A list of compatible devices will be below. For this example, we'll be using an Ingenico Lane 3000.
https://datacapsystems.com/compatible-devices
Step 1) 
Enable 
EBT Features 
on the Back Office
      Back Office > Settings > POS > EBT Features
      *This will create a flag that we'll use for the EBT "
Payment Method
"*
Step 2)
 Create an 
EBT Payment Button
      Back Office > Settings > Payment Methods
      Add New Payment Method named "
EBT
"
      Set Flags to "
FOODSTAMP
"
      Save Changes
Step 3)
 Verify correct Secure Device EMV
      Open OCPOS
      
CTRL
 + 
ALT
 + 
\
 to bring up 
Credit Card Processor 
settings
      Use correct 
Secure Device EMV 
in the NetEPay & Datacap Gift Stripe settings
      *Find the correct Secure Device EMV here: 
https://datacapsystems.com/ingenico-lane-3000
      *Use encrypted one*
Step 4) 
Verify Test Transaction
      Have the merchant do a test transaction using an actual EBT card. We have them do so in order for us to verify that the batches will go through. If they have no EBT card available at hand, have them 
      contact on the first ebt transaction to verify functionality.
To verify additional features, visit 
https://datacapsystems.com/compatible-devices
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Online Ordering Setup

Online Ordering Setup
 
 
*Prerequisites*
 
 
Online Ordering requires the site to be on 
4.9.0.9
 at minimum, for the smoothest experience. If you are setting up an older site 
4.8.x.x
 and older, you may run into issues upgrading to 
4.9.x.x
. The most common issue is that receipts will 
NOT
 print anywhere, and you won’t see the ticket go into 
SQL. 
Tickets not printing is not an SQL issue, rather, some tables in the database don’t update correctly. If this situation applies to you, please contact OrderCounter so we can format certain tables properly.
 
 
Speaking of SQL, if you are upgrading from an older version of OrderCounter, the server may be using SQL 2008, which is no longer supported in newer versions of OrderCounter. See 
Updating SQL 2008 > 2014
 for more information regarding that. Please do not operate OrderCounter on newer versions (4.8+) with SQL 2008.
 
 
The site must also be properly onboarded, which means in 
API Setup
 in the Back Office, you have set the correct 
API ID, API Key, Location ID 
and have the 
Onboarding Complete.
 
 
The final prerequisite for setting up an Online Ordering site is to check the services running on the terminal. The services you are most interested in are 
RabbitMQ, 
and 
OrderCounter Master Service.
 Checking all services is a good idea, but those two are the most important for Online Ordering.
 
 
*Everything above is NOT required, but will help massively in terms of making sure you only spend 5 minutes setting up, or nailing down where a potential issue may lay.*
 
 
Licenses
 
 
With all of the prerequisites completed, the setup for Online Ordering is straightforward. First, go into the 
Partners Portal
, where you will need to add the appropriate 
Online Ordering License 
for the desired site.
 
 
 
Setting Up
 
 
Once the license is added, you will need to 
Setup Online Ordering
 where this will ask for 3 things:
 
Site name i.e “Le Fancy Restaurant”
 
Site URL, the link to access the Online Ordering site i.e “lefancyrestaurant.ordering.ordercounter.com”
 
Site Email, this can be the owners email, an admin account email address or a throwaway email address i.e “
noreply+lefancyrestaurant@ordercounter.com
”
 
 
 
Roles
 
 
Once the site has been set up, it will take about a minute for the site to respond and tell you it has been set up. The next step is to add 
Admin
 users to the site. The admin user will be the partner who is handling the site. If the site owner wants to control some aspects of the site, they can be added to, but preferably as 
Restaurant Staff, Menu Editor, 
and 
Admin,
 depending on the person. 
 
 
 
Launching
 
 
With the site setup, and the permissions granted to the necessary people, you can now launch the Online Ordering site. 
 
 
 
Whitelisting
 
 
If you would like to have your customers be able to log in with their facebook or google sign in the below needs to be done. Partners cannot do this, OrderCounter is the only entity who can.
 
 
Facebook Login Whitelist:
 
1. Go to 
https://developers.facebook.com/apps/544757122266252/fb-login/settings/
 
2. Scroll to the bottom of the Valid OAuth Redirect URIs section, and add a whitelist entry.
 
    
 
URL Whitelist format: <Full Website URL>
/signin-facebook
 
    
 
E.g.: 
https://senorluna.olo.ordercounter.com
/signin-facebook
 
3. Press the Save Changes button
 
 
Google Sign in Whitelist:
 
1. Go to 
https://console.cloud.google.com/apis/credentials?project=signin-169422
 
2. Click on OCGoogleSignin
 
3. Scroll to the bottom of the Authorized redirect URIs section
 
4. Click the "+ ADD URI" button and Add a whitelist entry
 
    
 
URL Whitelist format: <Full Website URL>
/signin-google
 
    
 
E.g.:
 
    
 
https://senorluna.olo.ordercounter.com
/signin-google
 
5. Click the Save button
 
 
With the permissions set, and the site setup and launched, you have completed the Online Ordering setup! It has been massively improved so that 
Launch Online Order
 will initiate a menu sync, which can be verified by going to 
C:\OCPOS\logs\onlineordering2
 where you should be able to find “
MENU PUT
” at the bottom of that log file.
 
 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Resolving RDP Wrapper "Listener State: Not Supported" Issue

Issue Description
Users of the Remote Desktop Protocol (RDP) Wrapper may encounter a "Listener state: Not supported" issue when attempting to enable RDP functionality on unsupported Windows versions. This problem arises because the RDP Wrapper, though installed and running, cannot listen for incoming RDP connections due to a mismatch with the Windows version build.
Symptoms
RDP Wrapper Installation: The service is installed and running.
Listener State: The RDP Wrapper Configuration displays "Not supported".
Resolution Steps
Identify Windows Version Build
Finding Version Number: The version number can be located in the system information or by executing 
winver
 in the Run dialog (
Win + R
).
Search for Compatible RDP Wrapper INI File
Using Search Engines: Use a preferred search engine to find an RDP Wrapper configuration file that matches your specific Windows build. For instance, search for "rdpwrapper 22631.3447", replacing the numbers with your actual build version.
Manual INI File Update
Open Notepad as Administrator: This allows the necessary permissions to edit system files.
Modify the INI File: Open the 
rdpwrap.ini
 file from the RDP Wrapper installation directory.
Update INI Content: Replace the relevant sections with the new INI content found online.
Save and Exit: Save the changes and close Notepad.
Restart RDP Wrapper Services
Open Command Prompt as Administrator.
Stop Terminal Services: Enter 
net stop termservice
 and press Enter.
Start Terminal Services: Enter 
net start termservice
 and press Enter.
Verify the Listener State
Check Configuration Utility: Reopen the RDP Wrapper Configuration utility to verify the listener state. It should now display "Listening" instead of "Not supported".
Troubleshooting: If the problem persists, review the INI file for errors and confirm you have the correct version for your Windows build.
Best Practices
Backup the Original INI File: Always keep a backup of the original 
rdpwrap.ini
 file before making any changes.
Check for Updates: Regularly check for updates to RDP Wrapper to support the latest Windows builds.
Security Considerations: As RDP can expose your system to vulnerabilities, ensure your network is secure and consider using VPNs for remote connections.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Remote Back Office Setup

Setting up a remote back office (RBO) for your business enhances operations by enabling system management from anywhere. This guide offers comprehensive instructions for RBO setup, incorporating both traditional port forwarding and VPN methods, specifically using ZeroTier.
Understanding Remote Back Office
An RBO allows you to monitor performance, access reports, and manage configurations remotely. This is achieved by establishing a connection between your local computer and the server computer hosting your business systems.
Methods for RBO Setup
Port Forwarding:
 This method involves configuring your router to direct traffic from a specific port to your server's internal IP address.
VPN (Virtual Private Network):
 A VPN creates a secure, encrypted tunnel over the internet, allowing your computer to act as if it's on the same local network as the server. This is particularly useful when you lack access to router credentials or encounter issues with port forwarding.
Choosing the Right Method
If you have access to your router's settings and a static IP address, port forwarding is a viable option.
If you lack router access, have a dynamic IP address, or experience difficulties with port forwarding, a VPN like ZeroTier is recommended.
Setting Up RBO with Port Forwarding
Find Your Default Gateway:
Open Command Prompt (Windows + R, type "cmd").
Type "ipconfig" and press Enter.
Note the "Default Gateway" IP address.
      
Access Your Router:
Open a web browser and enter the default gateway IP address.
Log in using your router's credentials.
      
Find Port Forwarding Settings:
Look for a section like "Port Forwarding," "Applications and Gaming," or "Virtual Server."
Add a New Rule:
Name: "Remote Back Office"
External Port: (e.g., 80, 8080)
Internal IP Address: Your server's IP address
Internal Port: Same as external port
Protocol: TCP
      Example:
      
Configure Database Connections:
Ensure the port number matches the one in your database connection settings
            
Set Up Dynamic DNS (If Applicable):
If you have a dynamic IP address, use a service like No-IP to assign a static hostname.
Setting Up RBO with ZeroTier
Install ZeroTier:
Download and install ZeroTier on both the server and your computer.
Join the Network:
On the server, create a ZeroTier network and note the Network ID.
On your computer, join the network using the Network ID.
Authorize the Connection:
In the ZeroTier central web interface, authorize both devices in the network.
Connect:
ZeroTier will assign IP addresses to both devices within the network. Use the server's ZeroTier IP address to access the RBO.
Troubleshooting
Cannot Access Router:
 Double-check the default gateway IP address and ensure you're connected to the correct network.
Forgot Router Credentials:
 Consult your router's documentation or reset it to factory defaults.
Port Forwarding Not Working:
 Verify the server's IP address, port number, and firewall settings.
ZeroTier Connection Issues:
 Ensure both devices are authorized in the network and have valid IP addresses. If using WAN IP addresses, try switching to ZeroTier IP addresses.
 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: QR code and App questions

How to setup QR Pay    
    Set up online ordering (CSS and Payment Processing at the minimum)
    Add a license for QR Pay
    Enable the Print QR Code setting on the print server settings (the UI does not currently display the checkbox correctly until next release version so you will have to re-check the box when making changes)

QR Ordering has the same first two steps of setting up online ordering (fully) and adding the license. The associated settings pages would be under Settings > QR Features in the back office (along with Online Ordering 2.0 settings).

Both services require an API onboard and windows services to be up to date and running, as well as DataCap processing/ecommerce license.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Process Management Roles

Please follow this link for current process management roles.   Please notify if this document is found to be out or date and have it corrected.
https://go.gliffy.com/go/share/ste0cwq1efd733wrjjko
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Organization Tree

Please always report if this is out of date and have it updated
https://go.gliffy.com/go/share/sdg6r5pkw33ef8uk51pj
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: New Customer Development Process

https://go.gliffy.com/go/share/sqklvxm10lirtqndjm15
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Kickoff Process for New Deployments Outline

https://ordercounter-my.sharepoint.com/:w:/p/thomas/ETaP77cKyrFEhNysqOBu6ooB3RKi4Ji-zH1xn2bRfAQwCA?e=tzqH5R
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Knowledge Base How To

Team,
There are three permission levels for the knowledgebase.  As you publish articles Please do so as follows.
Agents only:  This is for our internal use only.  This would includes documents that outlined our operations processes and technical instructions that we consider confidential or don't feel comfortable with people outside of OrderCounter preforming.  
Registered users:  We will only be allowing our partners to register.  We expect this to take the place of the forum.  Unclouded herein will be release notes as well as some technical instructions that we feel a partner could handle nd use but which we believe would place OrderCounter in a negative light of would be too complicated for an average end user.
All users:  This is web facing.  Important: this means that anything on here needs to look professional and needs to be reviewed to ensure that it does not make our product look bad.  We not need our competitors getting ahold of things that either imply we have problems or which make us look like a tiny company that doesnt have our act together.  anything posted to be All Users should be run by or done by Scott.
Please use tags when it seems that they mey help with search and organization.  
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: OrderCounter Support, Ticket. & RMA Procedures

https://ordercounter-my.
sharepoint.com/:w:/p/scott/
EZAVa26yg6FKiYEItgc2AwsBGgvqOY
Qx0d6GVbAS51kgLQ?e=9qa8Ug
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Delivery Zones

Setting Up Map Zones
1. 
Visit 
Google Maps
 and in the top left hand corner left click the 
Three Horizontal Lines
 (googles icon for menu).
2
.
 
Select 
Your Places
, and choose the option 
"Maps"
.
  
3.
 
From this page left click 
"All your Maps"
, and you will be directed to 
"MyMaps"
.
4.
 
Select 
"Create a New Map"
, and Google will bring you to a wide view of Earth.
5.
 Zoom in on the region you will be creating your zones in, 
for instructional purposes we will be using Pensacola, Florida.
6.
 
Beneath the Google Search Bar are several icons, to create a zone on your map left 
click the icon that represents a fragmented triangle
 (three points with lines in between). You will be presented with a drop down menu, we will be adding a line/shape.
7.
 Once you have chosen line/shape you may click on the zoomed in map where you would like the perimeter of you zone established. Once completing the zone (connecting allpoints) the option is given to 
name
 and 
describe
 the zone.
8.
 
Repeat as many times as needed for multiple zones.
9.
 To edit or remove zone, left click zone and hover over icons for description of function.
10.
 To share finished zone, on top left corner of screen select 
share icon
. From this screen invite viewers to your map via their email address.
NOTE* Make sure zones are completely touching, when dropping points onzone to have them connected you will see the line lock into place whenthere is no gap between zones. Gaps result in non coverage areas.
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterdv
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Online Ordering Setup & Information Request Form

Setup Options
​
Full Site vs Online Ordering Only
Online Ordering Only 
(Recommended)
 
A link would typically be placed in existing web - site & social media to direct the customer to order on the customers online ordering.
Online ordering is a responsive design to be used easily on both standard computers and mobile devices.
Full Site
Template Site with basic Navigation and branding
No special customizations to the template site that are not a part of the standard template configuration
Updating the template site after launch has a $150 modification fee regardless of the size or scope of the change.
Template site is intended for small restaurants that have no website. Not recommended fo any restaurant that has advanced needs, particular branding requirements that cannot fit the template design, or that has an existing site that they like.
Teh template site is not responsive like the online ordering section of the site. This means that the template website is not designed for smartphone formatting. (Online Ordering is)
Online Credit Cards vs. Pay at Pickup
Online Credit Cards
Must be processed through Authorize.net
Authorize.net can store the card for future use
Pay at Pickup
This allows the customer to pay when they receive the food as they would with a phone in order
This is a good option to avoid the cost of Authorize.net.
Configuration Questions
 
Full Site or Online Ordering only?
 Current website? If so, what is the site?
 
Delivery, Takeout, or Both?
Required Graphics/Copy/Information:
Online Ordering Only
High Res Logo
 - transparent .PNG is best 
Link to existing site
 to model branded color scheme from
Hours of Operation 
Address
Phone Number
Social Media Links
 (Facebook, Instagram, Twitter, etc.)
Main Website Link
Full Website
High Res Logo
 - transparent .PNG is best
Graphics available to use on the site
 with details on use preference (if no preference is provided then our team will make decisions) readjustsments may have additional fees.
All copy
 
must be provided prior to start on site design.
Home Block 1 Title, Copy content, button text, button link
Home Block 2 Title, Copy content, button text, button link
Home Block 3 Title, Copy content, button text, button link
About us Title & Content
PDF Menu
Hours of Operation
Address
Phone Number
Social Media Links
 (Facebook. Instagram, twitter, etc.)
Color Preferences
 or any interior/exterior pictures of the restaurant to assist with matching the colors to restaurant atmosphere.
Setup Process Overview
      Step 1
 - OrderCounter Receives completed form and all graphics/materials/credit ard details to complete site setup
      Step 2
 - OrderCounter passes site synced to POS menu to Partner under a password protected site.
      Step 3
 - Partner works with Customer to make necessary modifications, add descriptions, add pictures, and Sort items for a friendly customer ordering system.
      Step 4
 -  Partner requests OrderCounter remove password protection of site when the restaurant has approved and thoroughly tested all aspects of online ordering to ensure full functionality and operation as desired.
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounteroosi
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Train The Trainer

We use a train the trainer (management) method of teaching users how to operate the OrderCounter System. For our purpose this means that we train one or two people in depth on how the system functions and how to do administrative functions. Our purpose in doing this is to insure a solid diffusion of knowledge from the top down in the organization. This method will mean that the one or two managers we are training will be the trainer for all of the other staff in the restaurant. Any functional questions will go through them before coming to us at OrderCounter. Our training method works the best because it ensures that management knows more than the staff, it reinforces management’s knowledge of the system, it ensures that any potential problems are brought to management before they become a major problem.
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here
: 
tinyurl.com/ordercounterttt
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Online Order Features

Overview
This is a brand-new online ordering system. Completely overhauled with a new look and feel.
Control Panel
This is where you control what happens within the online ordering website.  This is where you set up the menu, opening times, appearance and all other aspects of maintenance for the site. 
Location List
This is where you choose which location you would like to manage. Even if you have one location you will need to choose it here before you can start to manage it. The locations themselves will be added by OrderCounter
Simply click on the location to select it
Location Settings
Enable Loyalty 
– Shows or hides the loyalty header on the online ordering website 
Disable eGift Payments on eGift Orders
 – Enable or disables the ability to pay for an eGift card with an existing e Gift card
Disable Custom eGift Amount for Purchase
 – When purchasing an eGift card there are preset amounts or custom amounts as shown here. If set to “On” then the custom amount box will not be visible on the website
 
Enable Online Orders
 – If set to “Off” then customers will not be able to place an online order and will be presented with a message saying so when they access the site
Enable Scheduled Orders
 – Enables or disables the ability for the website to offer the customer to schedule their order for a future data and time. 
Enable ASAP Orders
 - Enables or disables the ability for the website to offer the customer to choose the option to place the order as soon as possible
Enable Takeout
 – Enables or disables a takeout option on the website
Enable Delivery
  - Enables or disables a takeout option on the website 
If both of the above options are set to “Off” then the customer will not be able to place an order
Enable Promotions
 – If set to “On” then this will show on the payment screen which gives the ability for the system to accept promotion codes 
The promotions themselves are set up on the POS
Enable Curbside
 – Curbside allows you to choose a vehicle type and color. If you do so this will print out on the receipt like a menu item. This allows the customer to stay in the car and for you to deliver it to the curbside and know which car you are looking for.
If set to “
On
” then this section will show on the payment screen. The message is customizable in the “Curbside instruction Text” option at the bottom of this screen
 
Force Curbside
 – Will force you to choose a Vehicle Type and Color from the Curbside order section of the payment screen.
Curbside Instruction Text 
– Allows you to customize the text that shows in the Curbside order section on the payment screen when the customer is choosing their vehicle type and color. 
Maximum Order Total – Allows you to set a maximum amount (Subtotal) that the customer is able to spend in one transaction. This would allow you to stop the customer creating an order you may not be able to fulfill. 
When the maximum order total is exceeded then the customer will be presented with this message when attempting to checkout
 
Minimum Scheduled Minutes 
– When the customer chooses to schedule an order this setting will determine how many minutes from now the system will offer them to schedule that order.
So if the customer places an order at 17:00, and this setting is set to 60, then they will only be given the option to schedule the order from 18:00
Takeout Ready Minutes
 – After the order is placed the customer is told when the order will be ready. This is the amount minutes after the order is placed that the customer will be told the order is ready for collection
Delivery Ready Minutes
 - After the order is placed the customer is told when the order will be ready. This is the amount minutes after the order is placed that the customer will be told the order will be delivered
Website Settings
New Brand Gift Card Image
 - Allows you to upload a custom image to display as a gift card.
Enable eGift Card Design (1-6)
 - Allows you to enable the or disable eGift Card design 1, 2,3,4,5 or 6 individually so they wither do or do not show up when purchasing an eGift Card
                                                    
Button to claim an eGift card to account 
– The test that will appear on the button which will when pressed allow you to redeem a gift card
Button to buy a new eGift card
 – The text that will appear on the button which when pressed will enable you to Purchase a gift card
Header text for customer's eGift card
 – Allows you to change the text that will appear above the customers gift card picture in the eGift section of the website
 
Button to load a balance to an eGift card
 – The text that will appear on the button in the eGift section of the website that allows a customer to add money to their eGift Card
Button to create and load a new customer eGift card 
– Appears when purchasing a card before logging in
Header text for unclaimed cards the customer has purchased
 – Text that shows above any unclaimed gift cards in the eGift area of the site
Prompt line 1 for attempting to add food to an eGift order 
 
Prompt line 2 for attempting to add food to an eGift order
 – You are not able to purchase food and eGift cards on the same order. If you attempt to add food to an eGift order you will get a message. The text of that message can be edited by editing the text in these 2 boxes
Prompt line 1 for attempting to add an eGift card to a food order
Prompt line 2 for attempting to add an eGift card to a food order
 – 
You are not able to purchase food and eGift cards on the same order. If you attempt to add an eGift card to a food order you will get a message. The text of that message can be edited by editing the text in these 2 boxes
Button text when editing an eGift item that is already in the cart 
– If you add an eGift card to the cart > click on the cart > click on the eGift card link, you will be taken to a screen where you can make changed to the eGift card. Once those changes have been made you press a button to save the changes. This is the text for that button
Message that is displayed if customer manually goes to the Gift Card page when eGift is not enabled 
– If a site does not have eGift Cards enabled and someone goes to the URL directly then this message will be displayed
Yes button to cancel an eGift order when attempting to add food to an eGift order 
– Allows you to change the text that appears on this button
No button to cancel an eGift order when attempting to add food to an eGift order
 - Allows you to change the text that appears on this button
Yes button to cancel a food order when attempting to add an eGift item to a food order 
- Allows you to change the text that appears on this button
No button to cancel a food order when attempting to add an eGift item to a food order
 - Allows you to change the text that appears on this button
Email Subject Line for 'Gift Card Sent' Message to sender 
– The text that will appear in the subject line of the email that is sent to the customer that purchased an eGift card 
for another person. 
Banner text for 'Gift Card Sent' Message to sender 
– This is the text that appears as a banner at the top of the email that is sent to the person who purchased an eGift card for another person
Button to claim a purchased gift card for yourself 
- Under the eGift Card section of the sit, all of the cards purchased are shown. Ones purchased for another person can be claimed by the customer so they are able to spend the monies on the card instead. To to this they click on this button. 
 
Label for eGift Card Number
  - Text shown by each eGift card under the eGift Card section of the site
Label for eGift Balance
 – Text shown next to the balance of each eGift card in the eGift card section of the site
Header for claimed gift cards (shouldn't show up under normal conditions)
 
Button to transfer a claimed gift card to their account (shouldn't show up under normal conditions) 
Header text of popup when customer wants to claim a gift card for their account
 – Shows at the top of the page under the eGift section of the website and allows you to redeem a gift card
Header text of popup when customer wants to claim a gift card for their account
 – This the text shown above the input box that shows up when you redeem a gift card
See picture
Placeholder text for input field for claiming a gift card to account
 – Text that shown in the box where you enter the card number or redemption code. See picture
Submit button for claiming a gift card to account 
– The text that appears on the submit button when claiming a gift card. See picture above
 Label for the custom amount field on the eGift purchase popup – Shown in this picture as “1Amount”
Placeholder text for the custom amount field on the eGift purchase popup – Shown in this picture as “1Select an Amount”
Label for the email recipient field on the eGift purchase popup
 – Shown in this picture as “1Email Address of Recipient”
Placeholder for required inputs on the eGift purchase popup
 – Shown in pic as “Required”
Placeholder for optional inputs on the eGift purchase popup
 – Shown in all fields that are optional. Shown in pic as “Optional”
Label for the name of recipient field on the eGift purchase popup
 – Shown as “1 To (Name)”
Label for the name of the sender field on the eGift purchase popup 
– Shown in pic as “1From (Name)”
Label for the message field on the eGift purchase popup
 – Shown in pic as “1Message"
Add to Cart button text on the egift purchase popup
 – “Text on the button at the bottom of this pic
Placeholder text for Amount field on eGift purchase popup when custom amounts is disabled
 – This text will show next to the $ sign in the pic when custom amount is disabled. 
 eGift Nav Link Text 
– The text for the link a the top of the website that when pressed takes you to the eGift section
Button text when loading balance to an existing eGift card – Shown in this pic as “1Load Balance”
Line 1 of the body text when no From name is provided for 'Gift Card Sent' Message to sender
Line 2 of the body text when no To name is provided for 'Gift Card Sent' Message to sender 
Line 2 of the body text when a To name is provided for 'Gift Card Sent' Message to sender 
 Label that preceeds the message to the recipient for 'Gift Card Sent' Message to sender 
– This is the label that will appear above the message in the email sent to the person who purchased a gift card for another person. Shown in the pic on the right as “1MESSAGE TO RECIPIENT:
Link text for 'Gift Card Sent' Message to sender
Label that preceeds the gift card number for 'Gift Card Sent' Message to sender 
– Shown in this pic as “1REDEMPTIOIN CODE:” you will see this in the email sent to the gift card sender
Email subject line for 'Gift Card Received' Message for recipient 
- This is the text that will show in the subject line of the email sent to the person who is receiving the gift card
Banner text for 'Gift Card Received' Message for recipient
 – This text will show as a large banner at the top of the email that is sent to the person receiving the eGift card
Email body line 1 when no to name is given for 'Gift Card Received' Message for recipient
 – If you don’t fill out the “To” name when buying the giftcard this is what will show in its place 
Email body line 1 when a to name is given for 'Gift Card Received' Message for recipient
 – If you do fill out the “To” name when buying a gift card then this is what will show for the recipient.
Email body line 2 when no from name is given for 'Gift Card Received' Message for recipient
 – Shows in place of the senders name on the email sent to the person receiving the gift card
Email body line 2 when a from name is given for 'Gift Card Received' Message for recipient
 – The name of the person that sent the giftcard on the email of the person receiving it. Shown the pic as “Sam Smith”
Email body line 3 text for 'Gift Card Received' Message for recipient 
– Shown in the pic as “Please click below to claim”
Label text that preceeds the Message from sender for 'Gift Card Received' Message for recipient
 – Shown in the pic above as “MESSAGE FROM SENDER”
Link text for 'Gift Card Received' Message for recipient
 – The text that will show on the link that will allow the recipient to claim their gift card.
Label text that preceeds the gift card number for 'Gift Card Received' Message for recipient 
– In the email sent to the person receiving the giftcard. Shown in the pic as “REDEMPTION CODE”
Email subject line for 'Balance Loaded' email 
– Text for the subject line of the email that is sent to you when you load a balance to an eGift card
Banner text for 'Balance Loaded' email 
– Text for the banner that will show at the top of the email sent to the customer when they load a balance onto an e-gift card
Link text for 'Balance Loaded' email 
– Shows on the link that will allow the customer to view their balance
Body text for 'Balance Loaded' email 
– Shows in the body of the email that is sent to the customer after loading a balance to an eGift card
Email subject line for 'Purchase for Self' eGift email 
– Text for subject line of the email sent to the customer when they buy themselves a gift card
Banner text for 'Purchase for Self' eGift email
 – Shows in the banner at the top of the email that is sent to the customer when they purchase themselves a giftcard.
Link text for 'Purchase for Self' eGift email
 – Text of the hyperlink that will allow the customer to see their giftcard
Body line 1 text for 'Purchase for Self' eGift email
 – Shown in this pic as “2Congratulations!”
Body line 2 text for 'Purchase for Self' eGift email
 – Shown in this pic as “2Enjoy your new eGift card”
Item Special Instructions Label 
– When ordering an item the customer has an option to enter extra instructions that will print with the item at store level. This label will appear above that box. Seen on the pic to the right
Item error message when store not accepting orders
 – If for any reason the store is not accepting orders the customer will see this message when clicking on a menu item
Item Add To Cart Button Text
 – Text that will show on the button to add an item to the cart. Shown as “Add To Cart” in the pic above
Item Edit Cart Item Button
 – If you click on the hyperlink on any of the items in the cart you are able to edit the item. This is the text on the button that saves those changes
Item Modifier Set Required Label
 – Appears above the modifier options when adding an item that requires modifiers. It lets you know that you must make a choice. Shown in the pic as “1Required”
Item Modifier Set Quantity Remaining label 
- ? come back to this 
Item Modifier not chosen yet placeholder
 – Shown in the pic as “1Choose one”
Menu Button Item selection label
Menu Error message when store not accepting orders – The error that is shown on the menu page when the site is not able to accept orders. 
Line 1 of the body text when a From name is provided for 'Gift Card Sent' Message to sender 
– Text that appears in the body of the email that is sent to the person sending the giftcard when a giftcard is purchased
Line 2 of the body text when no To name is provided for 'Gift Card Sent' Message to sender
 - Text that appears in the body of the email that is sent to the person sending the giftcard when a giftcard is purchased
Changes or suggestions can be made here:
 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounteroof
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Installing OrderCounter

Overview
OrderCounter is a Windows software application that will need to be installed on each machine you wish to use it on. 
It centers around an SQL database and there for SQL is automatically installed as part of the installation process. 
The general guidelines are that if you are using Intel Core i3 (or equivalent) processors then you can have up to 4 terminals running the software without having to use a dedicated server.
If you have an excessively large amount of throughput then this number may need to be reduced.
By default, Windows authentication is used to connect to that database. A user with admin privileges needs to be created on each machine with the same password in order for this to work. There is an option on install to have this user created for you.
If you do not wish to use Windows authentication then you will need to use the “advanced setup” page and specify a username and password on each machine to connect to the database using SQL Authentication.
The Back Office is a website hosted on the server SQL is installed on. Apache is used for the web server. The default port is 80 but this can be changed in the database connection settings. 
To access the back office outside of the local network you can either use a remote control application like LogMeIn or you can set up port forwarding to the web server from the router at site. 
Installing OrderCounter
⦁
 
Download the software Here Copy and paste this link into a browser 
http://ordercounter.com/downloads/ocpos_setup.exe
⦁
 
Run ocpos_setup.exe
⦁
 
Choose an installation folder. It is recommended that you leave the default of c:\OCPOS and select “Next”
 
⦁
 
Choose Next to perform a full 
installation. If you untick “Setup Windows User” it will be considered a custom installation 
⦁      You have the option to create a shortcut on the desktop and start when Windows starts. It is recommended that both these options are selected
⦁
 
The application will now install. You will be asked to restart the machine during the installation please accept defaults and press next when prompted
⦁
 
Open “Ordercounter Point of Sale” shortcut from the desktop
Connection Setup
As the software requires a database connection to work, that is the first thing it asks for.
“
Server
” is a list of all machines
on the local network with 
SQL installed
“
Database
” will show a list of
databases available on the
chosen machine
“
Refresh Servers”
 will refresh and
Update the list of servers
“
Advanced Setup
” will take you
To the advanced setup screen where
You can enter these setting
Manually. You also get the option to
Enter a username and password
⦁
 
Choose the server that will be hosting the SQL database from the server dropdown box
⦁
 
From the database list you do have the option to create a new database. If you choose this option you will be asked for the name of the database you want it to create. 
This will be a completely blank database which you will have to configure from scratch.
It is likely that you will have a demo or master database that you want to use as a starting point for a new build. If this is the case then you will need to restore that database to this machine through SQL Server Management Studio before choosing it on the “Connection Setup” screen.
Here is a link to a demo database. Copy and paste it into an internet browser 
http://ordercounter.com/downloads/ocpos_ordercounter4.zip
For instructions on restoring a database through SQL then please see the document “Restoring a database”
⦁
 
Enter a terminal Number and hit “Continue” 
⦁
 
Enter a valid serial number when prompted
Advanced Setup
“
Server
” The name of the server you wish to connect to in the format Computername\SQL Instance which by Default is OCSERVER
“
Database
” is the name of the database You want to connect to
“
Username
” You can specify a username that has access to the database you want to connect to using SQL Authentication. If left blank, Windows authentication will be used (recommended).
“
Password”
 You can specify the password for an account that has access to the database you want to connect to use SQL Authentication
“
Terminal Number
” This is a unique identifier for each terminal and is used to store the terminal settings. The example shows “001” but “01” or “1” could also be used
Back Office Setup
“
Password
” This is the MSSQL password that the back-office software will use to connect to the database. It can be any password. 
“
Port
” This changes the port used by Apache. 80 is default
“
Timezone
” Used to set the timezone for the site
“
External Access
”
Changes C:\OCPOS\htdocs\.htaccess to control if external access is allowed. Only enable this on the terminal that port forwarding will be used to access Remote Back Office.
At this point the software is at its very earliest iteration and requires updating. 
⦁
 
The next step will be to upgrade it to the latest release. There are 2 ways to do this
      ⦁
 
Press Ctr + Alt + U on the logon screen > Enter a passcode (123 works for a new database)
      ⦁
 
Run C:\ocpos\update.bat
In either case accept defaults and update the software. “Close all processes” when asked
 Set Service Login. This is a username
And password for the OCSecurity Service. This is used for the new back office and requires a valid windows user account with admin access 
⦁
 
 The “
Back Office Setup
” page will appear again. Make sure the details are correct and press continue
​
 Press “
Set Backup Location
” and choose a backup location. 
When installing OrderCounter you will be prompted for a backup location. Once this is set it cannot be changed without editing the SQL database. If you do need to change this it is in dbo.settings_backup in the backup_location column
It is recommended that you install a cloud backup service on each machine which syncs to a local folder. You then set that folder to be the backup location.
If a machine goes down then you already have access to the backup form every other machine. You would then restore the database to one of the available machines and change the connection settings of the remaining tills to point to it.
Backups are done on the terminal that is set to be the server. The path of the backup needs to be accessible by the server (for instance, if using a network share folder).
 
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here:
 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounteri
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Splitting Tickets

Overview
The Manage Tickets or Split Tickets screen is an area where you can manage the payment or transfer of your tickets.
There are lots of areas around the system that will get you to this screen but for this example we got to it from 
Table service order 
>
 Manage Tickets
2 seats were used so we can take advantage of an additional selection method.
This area allows you to easily split tickets and treat them like completely separate transactions but keeping all the information grouped together. Say for example someone only wanted to pay for the coke they had. 
      1) Select the item from the list
      2) Click on the Ticket Header for a Ticket #2 
      3) Press the Ticket #2 Pay button and pay off as normal
Example 2
You have used seating already and the person at seat 2 wants to pay for the items they had
      
      
1) 
Under Selection Method 
 Choose "
Seat
"
      
2)
 Choose an item belonging to that seat from the list
      All items for that seat will now be selected
      
      
3)
 Select the Ticket Header for Ticket #2 
      
4)
 Press the Ticket #2 Pay button and pay off as normal
The other selection option is 
 This will select every item on a ticket
Once items are split into the tickets as you would like, you have the following options
Prnt
 – Print the bill
Pay
 – Go to the Pay screen
Trans
 – Transfer to another table
Grat
 – Add or removes gratuity
NO
 
TAX
 – Toggles the tax on or off
Edit
 – Takes you back to the order screen
 – 
Will allow you to navigate additional tickets
 - change the selection method for the items in the ticket
Item
 – selects or deselects one or more item by clicking on individual items
Seat
 – selects all items that are linked to a seat
Ticket
 – selects all Items on a ticket
Control splitting and unsplitting items within a ticket
Split
 
item
 –Select 
split
 
Item
 > 
Choose
 
the
 
Item
 > Select 
how
 
many
 
times
 
to
 
split
 
the
 
item
> Click on 
Submit
The item will now show (The number of times you chose) with the price being the full price / number of splits
Unsplit
 
Item
 -  Click on Unsplit Item > Choose an item that has already been split
The Split items will be removed and the original item will return
   
 Will print a bill for all tickets
Setting Max Amount Of Items On A Ticket
This can be done from the back office
Back Office
 > 
Settings
 >
 Printers 
> 
Max Items
Editing the kitchen max items items will result in the printer printing out another receipt once the limit of items has been passed.
If this is set to 0, then there will be no max item set, resulting in a long kitchen ticket.
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterst
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Customer Accounts

Overview
Customer account payments allow you to charge the value of the check to a new or existing customer account to be invoiced at a later date. Very useful for corporate clients. Or VIP guests
They can also be used as an alternative to deposits for events
Creating A New Account
You can create an account from the front end or from the Back Office, however credit limits can only be applied from the back office. From the front end the only way to create an account is to sell something to that new account. If you want to add accounts without charging a sale to them then you will need to do this through the back office.
Log on to the front end
Ring through an item and go to pay it off
On the payment screen 
choose Add to Account
This is the "
Account Checkout
" screen. From here you can create new accounts or charge to existing ones. You can also see the balance of an existing account.  
Enter the name for the new account under 
“
Account Name
”
      
Click on “Select Customer”
Accounts are linked to customers. You can look up an existing customer by typing in the “Select a customer” box or you can create a new customer by entering the details below it
Click on continue to add the customer to the account. 
The details from the customer are now populated and linked to the account. 
Choose “Select Account” to charge the sale to the new account.
Adding An Account From The Back Office
Go to the 
Back Office
 > 
CRM
Click on “
Add Account
”
Enter the following
Account
 
Name
 – The name of the account
Account
 
Description
 – Something to help describe who the account is for or what the account is supposed to be used for
Credit
 
Limit
 – (Optional) The maximum amount of money that can be charged to this account in total.
Settling A Check To An Existing Account
Ring up some items and go to the pay screen
Click on “
Add To Account
”
Choose the account from the list of the left hand side
Choose “
Select
 
Account
”
Confirm by pressing “Continue”
Looking Up An Account
From the front end
Log on to the front end and go to “
Pending
 
Orders
”
Click on “
Accounts
”
Select the Account from the list
Here you are able to see the most recent transactions and the account balance.
From the back office
Go to the Back 
Office
 > 
CRM
This will show a list of all accounts along with the account balance and credit limit.
Editing The Account
Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
CRM
 
To edit the account, click on the pencil icon
You are able to edit the 
Description
 and 
Credit
 
Limit
Settling The Account
At some point you will want to send out an invoice and get paid for the money that has been spent on account.
You can pay part or all of the balance and this can be done from the front end or the back office
From the Back Office
Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
CRM
 > Click on the pencil icon next to the account
Enter the amount to be paid
Inter the Payment method
Click on “
Make Payment
”
From the Front End
Log on and go to Pending 
Orders
 > 
Accounts
Select the account
Enter the payment amount in the Total Payment box 
Click on 
You will be taken to the payment screen where you can pay the transaction as normal
Reporting
There are 2 reports specific to Accounts on the Back Office
Account Transaction Report 
Accounts List
Go to the 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Data
 
Mining 
> 
Customer Reports
Here you will see the two reports
Account Transaction report
 looks like this
You can filter by a specific account, orders charged or payments made off the balance of the account
Starting
 
Balance
 – The balance as it was at the start of the date range
Invoice
 
ID
 – The ID of the invoice that was charged to account or paid off an account
Date
 
and
 
Time
 – The date and time the invoice was paid
Account
 – The name of the account
Total
 – How much the transaction was for
Tip
 – Any tip that was added
Grand
 
Total
 – Total + Tip
Green is payments charged to account
Red is payments received to pay down the balance of an account 
​
Accounts
 
List
 looks like this
Account
 
Name
 – 
Account
 
Desc
 – An account description. This is pulled from Back Office > CRM > Editing the account and setting the “Account Description”
Starting
 
Balance
 – The balance of the account at the start of the date range
Charged
 – How much has been charged to the account
Paid
 – The total amount paid off the balance of the account
Ending
 
Balance
 – Charged minus Paid
Totals will show you a sum of the column. 
Red is payments charged to account
Red is payments received to pay down the balance of an account 
Payments charged to account also show in the 
Operations
 
Report
 and the 
End
 
of
 
Day
 
Report
 under “
On
 
Account
”
When the balance of an account is paid, the money is not counted as a sale. That means that if you sell a beer for $5.00 and charge it to account it will show as a sale. Now you settle the account to cash. The sales will still show as $5.00 as you still only sold $5.00 worth of products. 
Here is an example from the operations report. In the sales summary on the left I sold one beer and $5.33 was settled to account. One beer was then sold for $5.33 and settled to credit.
The screen shot on the right I made a payment off the balance of the account in the amount of $5.33 cash. 
“Adjusted Gross” and “Net Sales” are increased by the payments received to pay down the balance of an account. An account being what is created when you pay using the “On Account” payment method.
This is the only place
 you will see payments used to reduce an account balance affecting sales. 
Below is the same operations report comparing the sales by order method section before and after a payment off the balance of the account
The “
Expected
 
Deposit
 
Total
” and the “
Actual
 
Deposit
 
Total
” has increased by the cash settlement
Under the 
Till
 
and
 
Banks
 Section the 
Cash
 
Reading
 has gone up by the settlement amount
“
Expected Deposit
” and “
Adjusted Gross
” goes up by the settlement amount. The “Payments to Account” shows in red as it is taking the balance from the account instead of adding to the account
Please reference this guide for any updates or changes: 
https://tinyurl.com/ocmanualp
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Terminal Independence

Overview
Terminal Independence is a feature that will allow a site to carry on trading in the event of a server or network outage. When back online the data will merge and maintain its integrity
Each terminal has its own database and a _querylog database. The querylog database contains all database commands that have been executed locally.  A separate application called “Terminal Independence” will read from the querylog databases on the other terminals and update its own local database to make sure they are all in sync.
In the event that the server is not reachable the user will be asked if they wish to use the backup server or the local server.
The Backup server would be set the same on each machine and all terminals would use the database on that machine
There are separate printer settings for Primary, Backup and self server. For instance, you could set up the network printers on the Primary and the backup server. They would be set up with a different name on each. If the primary server goes down then you can switch to the backup server printer settings and carry on printing
The Set Up
There are a few steps that need to be completed in order to enable terminal independence
1)
 Consider how you want to print in the event that you will be using the backup server or the self-server. For instance. If you have an IP kitchen printer called “Bread” set up on the Server, then you would likely still want to print to this printer if the primary server went down
However, if you lost the network then you would not be able to use the backup server or the network printer. In this case you would need to use the self server option and send all of the kitchen tickets to the locally attached serial receipt printer. You could then run those tickets to the kitchen.
2)
 Set up the printers in the POS and the winprtspl. You need to install the network printers on the primary server and the backup server with a different name on each server. Using the same name will cause problems. There is another document on printers which covers all the steps needed to set up a printer but I will go over it briefly in this document.
To use a printer, you need to first set it up in the winprtspl program on one of the machines. (usually the server for network printers) This installs the windows or OPOS driver required for the printer and shares that printer with all of the other terminals.
 
As with the terminals “Printer Settings” there are Primary, Backup and Self Server settings. This allows you to serve the same printer from a different machine only when required.
The Primary Server would use the primary settings which shares the Network printer called “Kitchen”
And the Backup server would have no printers in the control list for its primary settings unless it had a local printer which would be serial or USB.
The Backup server Backup settings would share “Kitchen Back” and the Primary Server would have no printer in the control list for the backup settings
This way the same printer is never shared by 2 servers at the same time
  
You then set the 
 on each of the terminals which dictates which printer station prints to which printer for each terminal
Printer Settings Primary config using “Kitchen” shared by the primary server
Printer settings backup config printing to “Kitchen-Bac” shared from the Backup Server
                                 
      
3)
 Make sure that windows firewall is off or has the appropriate rules in place to allow the other terminals to read from its database 
      
4)
 Go to your server terminal and open 
 
      
5)
 Enter an override that has the “
Settings
” privilege enabled
      
6)
 Click on 
 and set Terminal Independence to "
On
"
            
     
 7) 
Click on 
  The path to the machines SQL server instance should be populated already. This should be your computer name followed by the SQL instance. For example, 
SITESERVER\OCSERVER
.
     
 8)
 
Press enter to save
. since you are on the main server which contains the SQL database it will ask you to create a backup. 
Choose the location you wish to save the backup then transfer it to a USB stick
Go to one of the other terminals and open 
 then 
Click on 
. This time you will be asked to restore the database. Point it to the database on the USB stick.
If you use the wrong database backup then Terminal Independence will not work properly
Repeat steps 10 and 11 for the rest of the terminals
When Terminal independence is enabled you will see a new icon in the task bar on each terminal 
If you 
double click
 this icon you will see the following screen 
This screen allows you to see the communication happening within the application on each terminal. 
Go to Database Settings > Change Connection
Set the “Backup Server” on all terminals to be the machine to have chosen to be the backup server for terminal independence. This is the server that you will be connected to if the primary server fails. 
Using Terminal Independence
When you 
lose connection
 to the server you will see the following screen.
Click on “
Connect to Backup Server
” on each terminal to continue trading. 
The Printer settings and winprtspl settings to not update automatically so you will need choose the correct profile for these on each machine in order for the printing to continue working 
When the 
Primary Server is back online
 then you will see the following screen on each terminal
Click on the
 
large green button
 to connect to the database on the primary server
You will also be informed if the backup database is more than 8 hours out of sync or is not reachable at all
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here
:
 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterti
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: API Setup

Overview
Various parts of the system rely on an API. If this API is not set up then those areas and features will not work.
How To Set Up The API
      
1)
 Go to 
http://localhost/OCPOS/api.php
 
     
 2) 
Enter The information given to you into the relevant boxes
     
 
3)
 Save Settings
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterapi
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Quickbooks

Overview
Quickbooks IIF files are designed to be imported using the Desktop software. However you can, with the help of third party software, import IIF files using Quickbooks Online.
This guide will show you how to do just that
Guru Importer
For the purpose of this document I will be using Guru Importer to import the IIF files. Other software is available
After you have signed up and log in for the first time you will have the option to create online accounts. You will need to create an account that you can use to link to Quickbooks
Make sure you are signed in to Quickbooks online
Click on the link to connect Guru Importer to Quickbooks online 
Choose the company name used in Quickbooks to connect the account
Now you will see the following button 
This allows you to 
import
 an IIF file. But first you need to export that file
Exporting The IIF File
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
Go to the 
Back
 
Office
  > 
Database
 > 
IIF
 
Settings 
Here you can see all of the settings for the export. You can choose which areas you export and which you don’t. 
For example
Include
 
Refunds
 – Means do you want refunds to be part of the IIF export
Debit
 
Account
 
name
 – The name of the account the refund will be debited from 
Debit
 
Account
 
Type
 – This relates to Quickbooks and will either be Asset, Liability, Income Expense or equity.
Credit
 
Account
 
Name
 – The name of the account the refund will be credited from 
Credit
 
Account
 
Type
 - This relates to Quickbooks and will either be Asset, Liability, Income Expense 
or
 
equity
.
Once you have the settings as you want them press 
Save
 and go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Database
 > 
Export
 
IIF
Choose a date range
Select the dates you want to export and click on 
export
 
checked
Importing The IIF File
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
  
On 
Guru
 
Importer
 click on Select File for Import
Choose the file you just exported
Confirm that this is not a duplicate import
Click on 
See all imports 
to see the progres
s
Quickbooks Desktop will create any missing accounts or venders etc as part of the import process. Quickbooks online will not. Instead you will get an error 
You have to make sure that you have matching accounts vendors and customers.
The accounts are set up from 
Settings
 > 
Chart
 
of
 
accounts
Customers are set up from 
invoicing
 > 
Customers
OCPOS Customer 
Needs to be set up here
Vendors are set up from 
Expenses
 > 
Vendors
OCPOS Tax 
Needs to be set up here
When you view the imports you will see the following screen
An X means the import did not work. Click on “”
View Journal Entry Details 
to see the status of the import and any errors
The account (ACCNT) will be shown here. This needs to match what is in Chart of accounts
The name is the customer name that needs to exist under customers in Quickbooks
If you need to edit or create these details in quickbooks, you will need to delete the account in Guru Imported and add a new one, then link it to quickbooks. It is this point that it imports all of the account details.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Datacap Gift Cards

Overview
This is an integration with Datacap allowing us to use Datacap to manage a central repository of Gift cards to be created or redeemed at multiple locations. 
Installation
On the OrderCounter logon screen press 
Ctr + Alt + \
 to get to the processing screen
Go to the 
Datacap
 
Gift
 tab and tick the box
Enter 889479 into the Datacap Gift MID Field
Enter 127.0.0.1 into the Datacap Gift URL Field
Go to this URL: 
http://datacapepay.com/downloadmenu/
 >Click on 
GiftePay 5.0
 and choose 
Valutec Host -VTH
Download the DCIClientX version and install with default setting
On the same page under 
Step 2
 download the 
Gift ePay Valutec Host
 and install with default settings
Go to this URL: 
http://files.datacapepay.com/software/dev-giftepay/valutec/50505/
 > click on link to the EXE file and copy it to the GIFTePay install directory. (Typically C:\Program Files (x86)\Datacap Systems\GIFTePay) and overwrite the version that is already in that location
The GiftePay software has to be running for this integration to work. Open "C:\Program Files (x86)\Datacap Systems\GIFTePay\DSIValutecIP_Gift50.exe"
When you open it you will likely get this screen. Click on 
Obtain Serial Number 
then press OK
On the GiftePay screen go to Setup > Setup Information > Load New Parameters 
Press 
Yes 
Select 
I Have My Deployment ID 
Enter the Deployment ID. Speak to OrderCounter Support to get this
You should now be returned to the GiftePay screen. If so then everything is set up.
Overview Using Datacap GiftePay
The way we use the gift cards is to sell a custom gift card card which communicates with Datacap and stores it on their cloud. That gift card can then be used as payment at multiple locations.
Log on
 to the front end and 
start an order
Go to 
Order Functions 
> 
Sell Custom Gift Card
Enter the amount of money you would like to add to the gift card and press 
Submit
Swipe the card or click on Manual entry and enter the card number
Pay for the gift card as normal.
Before the end of the transaction you will be asked to swipe the card again
.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: OrderCounter Services

Overview
These services allow OrderCounter to run and operate on your system
OC Guardian Service
 - Front End OrderCounter Service for ensuring programs and services are running
OrderCounter Bridge 
- PHP to .Net Bridge for the Back Office
OrderCounter Guardian
 - Service Health Checker
OrderCounter Master Servic
e - Service for handling external cloud communication
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Enable DataCap Store and Forward

Overview
      Enable or Disable Offline Credit Transactions
Step 1:
      On the Login Screen press "
Ctrl
+
Alt
+
\
" to bring up the Card Processor menu
            *Enter password when prompted*
      
Step 2:
      Set "
NETePay Store and Forward
" to 
On
      
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounteroct
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Activating A Licenses

Overview
After installing OrderCounter you will be prompted for a Serial License. Here are the steps for finding a license when setting up for a merchant
Step 1:
      Navigate to the Partner Portal: 
https://partners.ordercounter.com/login
      Use your credentials to login
      
Step 2:
      Click on "
Merchants
" from the left navigation menu
      Find the Merchant you're looking for
      
Step 3:
      Under "
Code Action
" you will find the Serial Number that will be used for activating OrderCounter.
     
 
Note:
 If there Isn't a licenses already for "
OrderCounter POS Saa
S" you will need to add one
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Technician Info (OrderCounter Only)

Additional notes or suggestions can be added here: 
https://tinyurl.com/octechinfo
Phone Extensions
Thomas:
 
337
Scott:
 
400
Jack 
- 
501
Desk Next to Jack
 - 
502
Desk 1 in hallway (Near the water)
 - 
503
Desk 2 in hallway (Middle)
 -  
504
Desk 3 in hallway (Beside James)
 - 
505
Desk 4 (Standing Desk)
: 
600
Splashtop
Splashtop Streamer Link: 
http://tinyurl.com/ocsplash
Partner Portal
Beta
 
https://ocpartnerportalint.z19.web.core.windows.net/login


Release 
https://partners.ordercounter.com/
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Common Errors & Troubleshooting (wip)

Overview
There are a couple errors that you may come across when dealing with tills. Below are some ways to fix them
Table Errors
Problem:
 
Sorry but you currently have items on this table that must be settled or removed prior to resetting table
Solution:
 
Remove the items from the table or cashout.
Till Errors
Problem:
 
You are not assigned to this till and personal banks are not allowed on this order type.
Solution:
 
Add the till to the cashier currently logged in
               
Function
 > 
Tills and Cashouts
 > 
Add Cashier
 > Select the 
Cashier
 
currently logged in
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Online Ordering Guide







Overview






Online ordering consists of a website that is hosted by OrderCounter and enables you to have customers place orders online for takeout and delivery.




If you wish you can restrict your online menu to offer less choice. It can however be exactly the same as your in house offering.




The orders will come through to the point of sale automatically and either print straight away or at a time you choose depending of the collection time cost of the order.




The site is hosted on OrderCounter’s servers which you can link to from your own website. 






The Set Up


There are 2 websites. The site where the customer will go to place the items and the site you will access to decide how that looks and what it contains.




OrderCounter will provide you with the URL and login details for the setup site.




Once you have those, go ahead and log in.




Full Site List


This Tab shows you all of your sites. Sites can have multiple locations. If you have a pizza chain and a burger chain then you would have 1 site for the burger chain and 1 site for the pizza chain. You would then have multiple locations for each site.




The sites will be set up for you. Clicking on each site will take you to the location settings for that site






Site Settings


Full site list and site settings are only available for the dealers. Users will not be able to access these pages. 




If you have more than one site then you need to select the site from the list in the Full site list tab. When you do this, it will take you to the Locations settings. If you then click on Site settings it will select the correct site. 




Site Settings


Site Owner – 
This is how you give people access to the 
Location
 
Settings
. You can give additional people access to location settings by selecting them under Additional Owners. This list is populated from the list of users




Additional Owners – 
If you need more than one person to have access to 
Location
 
Settings
 you can select them here. This list is populated by the list of users. 




Authorize.net Settings 




Site Wide / Per location – 
Determines if the settings for Authorize.net are applied for every location at a site or by each location




Allow Tips – On / Off – 
Will enable or disable the ability to add tips when paying with credit




Authorize.net – On / Off – 
Allows you to turn the service on or off




Vantiv Hosted Checkout – On / Off – 
Allows you to turn off hosted checkout. Speak to OrderCounter before you do this




Merchant ID – 
The merchant ID provided by Vantive for Hosted Checkout




Password – 
The password provided by Vantive for Hosted Checkout




Address verification mode – 






Off – 
Requires no verification


Require Address and Zipcode Match
 – Requires the Address and the Zipcode entered to match the Address and Zipcode registered against the card used


Require Zipcode Match- 
require the zip code entered to match the zip code registered to the card






Regional Settings




Select a date format to use – 
Allows you to choose a date format to use for online ordering




Select a time format to use – 
Allows you to use either 12 or 24 hour time format for any online ordering timestamps




Select a currency code to use – 
This determines the currency symbol that will appear on the website




Select a regionalization – 
Chose between US or UK. This will affect the Address Phone and Receipt formats




        


General Settings




Starter Site – 
A starter site is a site that will be presented before you get to the ordering page. This is used if the customer does not have their own website. If you go to
 
http://pizzazia.com
 you will see an example of a 
Starter
 
Site




Online Ordering – 
Allows you to turn the service on or off for all locations using this site. This is a great way for dealers to disable online ordering if the client has left or has not paid




Test Mode – 
Password protects online ordering. If set to “Yes” then when a customer goes to the online ordering site they will be presented with the following page.  A password if needed to proceed. Useful to check everything is working in a live environment before you allow access to the public 




Previous Orders – 
Enables or disables the ability for customers to see their previous orders whilst ordering




Display Price on Free Options – 
If disabled will show no price for free Modifiers. If enabled will show 0.00 against the free modifier




Coupon Nav Button – 
If enabled then a 
View Coupons
 link will show when checking out the basket which will show any available Coupons




Collapsible Categories – 
Enables or disables the ability for a customer to collapse a category. If a category is collapsed it will have a + symbol next to it. You can then click on the icon to expand the category




Collapsible Categories by Default – 
Determines if the categories are already collapsed when you go to the website. Collapsible Categories need to be set to “Yes” for this feature to work




Collapsible Optionsets – 
Enables or disables groups of modifiers to be collapsed and expanded. 




Collapsible Optionsets by Default – 
Determines
 
if the modifiers will already be collapsed when you see them for the first time. Collapsible Optionsets needs to be set to “Yes” for this feature to work




Accept Offline Transactions –
 Allow the customer to order on the website when the physical restaurant cannot be reached. (Use with caution)




Minimum Offline Transaction Schedule Time –
Earliest time in advance customers can schedule offline orders for the day. Does not affect days past “Today”. Setting this to 1 means that the earliest time the customer can schedule an offline order would 1 1 hour from the time they start the order. 24 hours prevents offline orders from being placed that day. 




Facebook / Google Sign in - Allows
 the customer to use Facebook or Google to sign in to the online ordering site.  (Contact OrderCounter to set this up before use)




Gift Cards – 
Allows gift cards to be used with online orders. (Contact OrderCounter to set this up before use)




Loyalty Cards – 
Allows Loyalty to be used with online ordering. (Contact OrderCounter to set this up before use)


Location settings




My Menu


Sync Menu From Cloud 
– Syncs your menu between the cloud and the website. API details need to be set up for this to work but you do not need a static IP address.Once synced you can choose which products you wish to make available online. See the Cloud Sync section for more information




Sync Menu From Remote Back Office– 
Syncs your menu between the restaurant and the website which allows you to choose which products you want to make available online. Currently a static Ip is required for this to function properly.




Edit Online Menu – 


This is where you decide which items will be available on the online menu. 




    Pos Name
 – The name of the category on the restaurant POS




Display Name
 – How you want the name to display on the website. If left blank then the Pos Name will be used




Description
 – This will be displayed underneath the category description on the website




For example. I set the display name for the Drink menu to “
Drink
 
Online
” and set the descriptions to be “
Description
 
of Drink Online
” 


     


Display
 
Online
 – Decided if this category will be displayed on the online ordering site. If you click the actual words “Display online” then it will tick all boxes to save you clicking each one individually. 




Image
 – Allows you to upload an image for the category.




Edit
 
Items
 –  Edit items exist inside of edit online Menu. It is how you enable individual items See the edit items section further down for more details




Timeset
 – You can apply a timeset so the category is only available at certain times. The timesets are synced from the POS. to create one you must do this on the POS then do a menu sync




Edit Online Menu > Edit Items


Displaying a category online will only display the category. You have to specify which items within that category you want to be available online. The same goes with modifiers. 




Inside of Edit Items you have the same options as you do in Edit Online menu. See above for details




Edit Online menu > Edit Items > Edit Modifiers


Allows you to change the online description for the modifier sets and decide if they will be available online. Applying to all items will apply the changes for all items that have that modifier set. 




For Example




Edit Online menu > Edit Items > Edit Modifiers > Edit Modifiers


Here are the options for the modifiers sets. You also get so decide if they are displayed online and what the display name will be. Applying to all items will apply the changes for any item that uses the modifier set that this modifier is a part of. So, if you want to enable the modifier for every item that uses it you would apply it to all items






Manage Coupons – 
Allows you to sync promotions from the POS to be used online




Sync Delivery Zones – 
Allows you to sync the delivery zones set up on the POS




Menu PDF Upload 




Remove PDF –  
Will remove the previously uploaded PDF menu file




Upload New Menu – 
Will upload a PDF of your choosing. You can then click on the “Click to view PDF” link which will take you to the URL where it is hosted. You can then use that URL in an area of the site, for example the footer, to link to a PDF of your menu.


    


Enable Online Orders – 
Allows you to turn online ordering on or off for this specific location






Enable Scheduling Orders – When
 you start an order you are asked if you want the order ASAP for a Future date and time (which is a scheduled order).  Setting this option to “
No
” will remove the option to schedule the order and it will also remove the ASAP option. This is because it will default to ASAP




Enable ASAP Orders –   
When you start an order you are asked if you want the order ASAP for a Future date and time (which is a scheduled order).  Setting this option to “
No
” will remove the option to have the order ASAP 




IMPORTANT
 
Never set both options to “No” if you do then customers will not be able to place online orders




Enable Takeout – If
 set to “No” then the Takeout option will be removed when starting an order




Enable Delivery – 
If set to “No” then the Delivery option will be removed when starting an order




Enable Quantity – 
Adds or removes the ability for a customer to change the quantity of an item when ordered.




Enabled             Disabled


 
  


  




Enable Coupon Entry – 
Determines if Coupons can be used with online orders




Accept Cash Orders – 
Enables or disables the cash payment option on the checkout screen




Test mode (Multi-Location only) – 
Password protects online ordering. If set to “Yes” then when a customer goes to the online ordering site they will be presented with the following page.  A password if needed to proceed. Useful to check everything is working in a live environment before you allow access to the public 




Takeout ready by ASAP message – 
Allows you to change the message that the customer will be shown when they choose that they want the order to be takeout and ASAP




Delivery ready by ASAP message – 
Allows you to change the message that the customer will be shown when they choose that they want the order delivered and ASAP




Takeout ready by scheduled message – 
Allows you to change the message that the customer will be shown when they choose that they want the order to be takeout and scheduled




Delivery ready by scheduled message – 
Allows you to change the message that the customer will be shown when they choose that they want the order to be delivery and scheduled




Delay schedule Message – 
This message will appear when
 
the amount of time taken to prepare the food will increased due to the price of the order set in “Order Value Ready Time Adjustment) 


For example: Here I have set any order from $50 to $110 to add 60 minutes to the order. This will cause the message specified here to appear when the customer checks out so you can warn them of the additional delay to their order.






Maximum Order Amount – 
The maximum amount in money that an online order can be placed for. Enter less than or equal to zero for no limit




Minimum scheduled Order Time – 
How far in advance orders can be scheduled. If someone chooses that they want to schedule the order then their first option will be at least this far in the future




Base Takeout / Delivery Ready Time – 
When you order online the system will calculate how long it will take before the order is ready. The first way it does this is to use the base time which you set manually


    Takeout – 
Set a time in minutes. When the customer orders takeout they will be told it will be ready in this number of minutes. 




    Delivery – 
Set a time in minutes. When the customer orders Delivery they will be told it will be ready in this number of minutes.




Order Value Ready Time Adjustment – 
Adds additional time to the base ready time based on order price. For example 


From 10.00 to 20.00 ad 5 mins


From 20.00 to 30.00 add 10 mins




My Store


Location Image – 
This image will only appear if you have more than 1location. If you do have more than 1 location then you will be asked to choose which location you want to order from. At that point you can have an image to represent each site




Timezone – 
The time zone that will be used for the location




Store Name – 
The store name will be referenced if it if offline so it should be something you are happy for the customers to see. 




Address – 
The address of the store location. If you have more than 1 location then the customer will be asked to choose a location. If you have the address filled out here then it will show when making that choice. It is also used to calculate the distance on the same page




Store Info – 
Notes about the location. The notes only exist on this page




Store Email – 
This is the “From” email that confirmations are sent from. An email is sent to both the store email and all additional emails




Additional Emails – 
You can add additional emails here. Separate them with a comma. The order confirmations will be sent to the store email and all additional emails




Store Phone# - 
Exists on this page only




Store Fax – 
Exists on this page only




Hours of Operation


Store Hours – 
This is a legacy setting and does not need to be used




Dates Closed - 
Any dates that the site is closed
. 
You will not be able to schedule orders within these times




Delivery Hours – 
Hours for each day that the business will provide a delivery service




Takeout Hours – 
Hours for each day that the business will provide a delivery service




Set Pos Settings –
 This is a tool used by OrderCounter when initially setting up the online site. This tool should not be used. 


Appearance


This is how to control what the website looks like. The following settings control the starter site




 


Reference image






Images


There are 3 tabs under Images.






Home


Logo / About


Background






Home


On the lest we have the home tab images and, on the right, we see how they show on the live site starter page








Logo / About


The logo picture here is what is shows at the top of the starter site, the first page that loads






The “about page image” at the bottom will appear on the about us page of the site




Background


The image or color selected here affects the background of the website. See
 
This image
 for an example


Colors and fonts


Control the background or font color for various areas of the website. Each tab and option have an explanation of what it does. 




Content


Content is where you enter the text for the site.




Here is a side by side image so you can see where the content is reflected on the website. 


The Home / Order Notes tab affects the first screen you see when you have the starter site enabled. *






*The Order notes Message section affects the screen that appears when you click on a menu item. The picture here shows the order notes message text at the bottom




About us


The about us page tab affects the text on the about us page on the site






Social media


This social media tab creates links to twitter and Facebook in the 3
rd
 column of the website’s footer. When you click on the icon it will take you to the URL specified






Footer


This is where you control the content of column 1 and 2 of the website’s footer






Manage Users


You can set up users here which will be allowed to access the online ordering management site.




To create a new user, do the following:






Go to 
Manage Users
 and click on “
Add User
”








Enter the user’s information








Choose the locations they will be able to edit from the Location Access section








If they are just a user then they will not be able to do anything on the site. They need to be linked to a site. Go to site settings and make them either a site owner or additional owner by selecting them from the drop down box. 






When a user logs in they will only get access to the location settings 
























Add Site






Adding a site will also Add a location as your first site becomes your first location.




Site name – 
The name for the site




Location Name – 
What you want to call the location




API ID – 
This should be in your license email. Contact OrderCounter if you do not know it




API Key – 
This should be in your license email. Contact OrderCounter if you do not know it




API Location ID – 
This should be in your license email. Contact OrderCounter if you do not know it




Partner Organization – 
This is the name of the dealer




Username – 
Will already be filled out




Site Group – 
This is used to allow the dealers to have access to only their sites. 




Terms – 
Please read this




Agree – 
Tick to agree to the terms


Add Location


The Site name will already be filled out as you cant have a location without already having a site






Site name – 
The name for the site




Location Name – 
What you want to call the location




API ID – 
This should be in your license email. Contact OrderCounter if you do not know it




API Key – 
This should be in your license email. Contact OrderCounter if you do not know it




API Location ID – 
This should be in your license email. Contact OrderCounter if you do not know it




Partner Organization – 
This is the name of the dealer




Username – 
Will already be filled out




Site Group – 
This is used to allow the dealers to have access to only their sites.




Terms – 
Please read this




Agree – 
Tick to agree to the terms




New Feature


Cloud Sync


Cloud Sync is a new setting on the 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Cloud
 
Sync


It enabled the menu to be synced automatically with a cloud server.


Then go to the online ordering control Panel > Location settings and select “Sync menu From Cloud” 






Auto Sync Enabled
 – Determines if the system will automatically sync data to the cloud


Sync Interval
 – How often the sync will occur in milliseconds. 


Last Menu Sync
 – The last time the Menu sync completed


Last Promotion Sync
 – The last time the Promotion sync completed


Last Delivery Zone Sync
 – The last time the Deliver Zone sync completed


Last Order Sync
 – The last time the Order sync completed


Last Customer Sync
 - The last time the Customer sync completed






If the Auto Sync is set to “
No
” then you will have to sync manually. You can do this from the 
Front
 
End
 > 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
Management
 > There is a button called “
Upload
 
Menu
 
to Cloud"


 


 


Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/orddercounteroog
 


























--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Primary & Secondary Support Roles

Primary Support
Each Weekday there will be a Support Tech handling the Primary Business hours support Calls and Tickets.  Responsibilities in order of Priority.
Take incoming Support Phone Calls and outline call notes in a ticket for every call.  
Request help from Secondary Support Technician at busy periods.
Be sure to escalate calls that you do not feel you have the expertise required to solve...Don't just play the middle man.
On escalated calls always circle back to the technician that handled the call for you and learn what knowledge was missing to promptly sole the ticket.
Manage incoming support Emails and ensure that all tickets are in an acceptable State based on Ticket Standards by the end of the day.
If required enlist the help of Secondary Support Tech and others as needed at 4:00 to ensure that tickets are in acceptable condition to depart at 5:00.
Secondary Support
As Secondary Support Tech your objective is to keep focused on tasks other than support whenever the time is permitting.  First priority must always be taking support calls and keeping support running smoothly BUT other work around the office is equally important and assists with the overall comfort of running support.  
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Release Log

This article will be updated with every release
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Mapping 3rd Party Delivery Items

Steps
1) Navigate to 
onlineordering.ordercounter.com
      Login in using your credentials
2) Find your location and click on it
3) Navigate to 
Menu Configuration 
4) Choose 
External Email Mapping
5) 
Under
 Unmapped items 
click on "*
Not Mapped
" and choose what item to map it to
6) Go to 
Unmapped Mods
 and do the same for mods.
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: No No Words

Overview
This article discusses crucial words and phrases to steer clear of when providing technical support to customers.
Bad
❌
Do not say "
Glitch
" - 
Suggests that our software is buggy and has problems, bad for the confidence of the customer.


❌Do not say "
Known Issue
" - Indicates that we're aware of an issue and blurs the line between us resolving it or not.
​
❌Do Not Mention Names - Caller will end up wanting to contact that person for future inquiries.
❌Do not say "
I don't know
" - Makes you seem incompetent
Good
✔️Say Settings update instead of version update
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Finding Employee Passwords in SQL

Overview
This guide provides instructions on how to retrieve employee passwords from the OrderCounter database using an SQL query. This information is critical for system administrators who need to manage and troubleshoot employee access to the system.
SQL Query
To find employee passwords, you can use the following SQL query:
SELECT 
    password_id,
    employee_id,
    title,
    date_created,
    CONVERT(varchar(max), DECRYPTBYPASSPHRASE('pinetree@hq', password)) AS password
FROM 
    employees_passwords;
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: SNBC BTP-M300 OPOS Limitations

When using an SNBC BTP-M300 impact printer with OPOS drivers, there is a limitation when setting a template option to print red with alignment.  The SNBC printer will only print red using "Left" alignment and will only print black on "Center" and "Right" options.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Printer Visual Quick Reference

Kitchen Printer - U220B
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: How to set up a Star Printer

Setting up Star printers with OrderCounter involves a series of steps that start with making sure the printer is prepared and correctly added to the Star OPOS (OLE for Retail POS) system. This process ensures that OrderCounter can communicate effectively with your Star printer. Notably, Star printers are popular for their reliability and compatibility with various POS systems, including OrderCounter. While specific models such as the Star TSP100 or TSP650 may be commonly used due to their efficiency and support for receipt printing, the general setup guide provided here should be applicable to most Star printer models used with OrderCounter.
Step-by-Step Guide for Setting Up Star Printers in OrderCounter
  
Step 1: Install Printer Drivers and Software:
Begin by downloading and installing the latest driver software for your specific Star printer model (e.g., TSP100, TSP650) from the Star Micronics website. This will ensure the printer can interface correctly with your computer and ultimately with OrderCounter.
Step 2: Add Printer to Star OPOS:
After installing the drivers, you will need to add your printer to the Star OPOS system. This step is crucial as it prepares the printer to be recognized and managed through OPOS software interfaces.
Launch the Star OPOS configuration tool. This software is usually included in the driver package or can be downloaded separately from the Star Micronics website.
Follow the prompts to add your Star printer. You'll typically need to specify the printer model, connection type (USB, Ethernet, etc.), and other relevant settings based on your printer model and setup.
                  
Step 3: Open OrderCounter Printer Setup:
Navigate to the computer where OrderCounter is installed, and access the printer settings by finding and double-clicking the printer icon in the system tray, or open the file directly by navigating to 
c:\ocpos\winprtspl.exe
 if the icon isn't present.
Step 4: add Your Star Printer in Winprtspl:
In the printer settings window, click "
Manage Printers & Draws"
.
Choose "
Opos Pos Printer
" from the "
Select Device
" dropdown menu.
Select Manual Entry
Enter the device name added in the Star OPOS
Click "
Add device
" to complete the addition of the Star printer to OrderCounter.
Testing
: 
Test Device
 to ensure the printer is functional by clicking the "
Test Device
" button
Save Settings
:
 When done, exit out "
Manage Devices
"
, select "
Save
", then "
Save and Restart
".
Step 5: Add Printer to OrderCounter
  
Open Front End OrderCounter:
 Navigate to the front end of OrderCounter.
Access Printer Settings:
 Click 
"Printer Settings
" and enter the password if required.
Configure Printer:
 If it's a Receipt Printer, In the "
Receipt Printer
" Dropdown, select the printer you added in the previous steps. If it's a 
Kitchen
/
Bar
 printer, select a 
Station
 and add it in the drop down for each 
Order Type
. 
Finalize Settings:
 Click "
Save Settings
".
      
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: How to set up Bixolon Printers

To set up Bixolon printers for use with OrderCounter, follow the guide outlined below.
Step 1: Install Bixolon OPOS Driver
  
Locate Printer Drivers:
 After installation, you'll find the printer drivers in the following directory on your computer: 
C:\OCPOS\setup\Printer Drivers\
.
Install Bixolon Printer Driver:
 Install the Bixolon printer driver by installing the "
Bixolon Ethernet OPOS
" Driver.
If it's a Network Printer, Install the
 Bixolon Ethernet Config
 tool as well. This will search for the printer and grab the IP address
Step 2: Setup Printer in Bixolon OPOS Driver (Opos Setup Utility)
  
Open Bixolon OPOS Driver:
 After installing the driver, open the "
OPOS Setup Utility
". This utility allows you to add and configure your Bixolon printer.
Add Printer:
 In the utility, you can add your printer and configure its settings. Make sure your printer is connected and powered on.
      
Test Printer:
 Click the option for "
Check Health
" to test the printer's connectivity and functionality.
Step 3: Add Printer to WinPrtSpl
  
Open WinPrtSpl:
 From the system's tray, open up 
WinPrtSpl
.
Manage Printers:
 Select "
Manage Printers & Drawers
".
Printer Details:
 Ensure "
Opos Pos Printe
r" is selected
Manual Entry:
 Select "
Manual Entry
" and then enter the device name added in the OPOS
Add Printer
: Select "
Add Device
"
Testing: 
Test Device
 to ensure the printer is functional by clicking the "
Test Device
" button
Save Settings:
 When done, exit out "
Manage Devices"
, select "
Save
", then "
Save and Restart
".
      
Step 4: Add Printer to OrderCounter
  
Open Front End OrderCounter:
 Navigate to the front end of OrderCounter.
Access Printer Settings:
 Click 
"Printer Settings
" and enter the password if required.
Configure Printer:
 If it's a Receipt Printer, In the "
Receipt Printer
" Dropdown, select the printer you added in the previous steps. If it's a 
Kitchen
/
Bar
 printer, select a 
Station
 and add it in the drop down for each 
Order Type
. 
Finalize Settings:
 Click "
Save Settings
".
      
Troubleshooting Tips
  
Ensure the printer is properly connected, powered on, and stocked with paper.
If there are any printer errors (e.g., error lights displayed), address these first.
Verify that WinPrtSpl is running and the printer is correctly shared from the device.
Double-check the settings in both the Bixolon OPOS Driver and WinPrtSpl, making sure the printer is configured correctly and recognized by the system.
 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Manually Setting & Resetting The Server In Regedit

Overview
Sometimes you will run into some issues that require you to reset the server connection. It is sometimes locked behind a "Licenses Activation" screen which won't allow you to reset it using the 
Database Settings
1)
 Open up regedit
      
Windows Key
 > Search "
Regedit
"  > Click "
Open
"
      
2)
 Navigate to the "OCPOS" folder
      
Computer\HKEY_CURRENT_USER\SOFTWARE\OCPOS
      
3) 
Right click 
"Server"
 and select 
"Modify"
      
4) 
Clear out the entered value or enter new server connection
      Click "
OK
" when done
      
5) 
Restart OCPOS
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: One Click Deployment - Online Ordering

Setup 
Step 1
:
      Navigate to the 
Partner Portal
            
Production:
 
https://partners.ordercounter.com/
        
    Beta
: 
https://ocpartnerportalint.z19.web.core.windows.net/
Step 2
:
      
Login
      
      
      
Step 3:
      Once logged in Click on "
Merchants
"
            Type in your Restaurants name
                  Click on the 
icon to bring up the 
Deployment 
page
                     
Step 4:
      Click "
Setup Online Service
s" to bring up the deployment menu
            Click "
Begin Deployment
" to begin deploying
                  
*Make sure OrderCounter is running*
               
Once deployed, You are able to configure a few parameters to customize your site
Online Ordering
Overview
      This is where you will configure the 
Brand Logo, Order Acceptance Hours, Primary Brand 
        
Color, 
and
 
Choose which
 Menu Categories 
will be 
Displayed
            You can also 
Enable
 or 
Disable:
            Maintenance Mode
            Takeout
            Delivery
            Demo Processing 
Online Payments
Overview
      This is where you will configure the 
Online Payment Credit Card Processor
            Options for Credit Card Processors
            
          You can also 
Enable 
or 
Disable
 
eGift Processing
Online Menu
Overview
      
This deployment can specify a separate menu from the 
      
Online Ordering Menu. 
Sets the selected Categories and all Items/Modifiers
      
within them to visible. 
QR Ordering
Overview
    
  Creates a Website with the URL structure of <prefix>.qr.ordercounter.com
      
            Similar to 
Online Menu 
This deployment can specify a separate menu from the 
      
         
Online Ordering Menu. 
Sets the selected Categories and all Items/Modifiers 
               
within them to visible. 
QR Pay
Overview
Pings the POS and turns on a setting in the print server that enables QR codes to print on credit receipts. Those QR codes points to a special section of 
Online Ordering
 that grabs the receipt information from the POS and allows the customer to pay online before notifying the POS that the order is paid for.
Loyalty
Overview
Creates a loyalty group or uses a specified group and adds the location to this group. Locations within a group share the same loyalty programs and customers can use their loyalty account across them (Mostly for chain restaurants). It creates a pre-configured loyalty program and then sends a message to the POS that creates a new loyalty promotion there.  The pre-configured Loyalty Program can be edited/changed on the OOACP.
Fore more information on 
Online Ordering
, Visit
 
Online Ordering
         
   Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here:
 
https://tinyurl.com/ococdoo
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: One Click Deployment - Kiosk

Setup 
You'll need to have Online Ordering deployed first. When you deploy Online Ordering you'll be able to setup a separate Kiosk Menu. If a separate kiosk menu is setup it will default to the Online Ordering Menu.
Step 1
:
      Navigate to the 
Partner Portal
            
Production:
 
https://partners.ordercounter.com/
        
    Beta
: 
https://ocpartnerportalint.z19.web.core.windows.net/
Step 2
:
      
Login
      
      
      
Step 3:
      Once logged in Click on "
Merchants
"
            Type in your Restaurants name
                  Click on the 
icon to bring up the 
Deployment 
page
                     
Step 4:
      Click "
Setup Kiosk
" to bring up the deployment menu
            Click "
Begin Deployment
" to begin deploying
                  
*Make sure OrderCounter is running*
               
Once deployed, You are able to configure a few parameters to customize your Kisok.
Verify the following tables are present in SQL
select * from KioskTemplate
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: One Click Deployment - KDS

Setup 
Step 1
:
      Navigate to the 
Partner Portal
            
Production
:
 
https://partners.ordercounter.com/
Step 2
:
      
Login
      
      
      
Step 3
:
      Once logged in Click on "
Merchants
"
            Type in your Restaurants name
                  Click on the 
icon to bring up the 
Deployment 
page
                     
Step 4:
      Click "
Setup KDS
" to bring up the deployment menu
            Click "
Begin Deployment
" to begin deploying
                
  
*Make sure OrderCounter is running*
           
    
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: OrderCounter Tag Team Onsite Hardware Deployment Strategy

OrderCounter utilizes a process of deploying hardware on site that will require as little time as possible form the onsite tech whether that be a partner, outsourced tech, Or an OrderCounter Tech.  Each party has roles that need to be followed efficiently.
Process: Onsite Tech 
Remote Tech
Do a walk through of the business to develop an understanding and strategy for the deployment
verify needed cables are in place (power & network)
verify location of all hardware and mentally confirm the requested location of hardware id the best choice based on OrderCounter Features or Space requirements.   examples to consider:  
Wireless access point is too far from where wireless devices are to be used
multiple wireless access points may be needed for quality experience
ensure that terminals with rear display are being placed where customers can see and use the customer facing screen.
ensure there is space for hardware like cash drawers
point out areas there there are not enough network cables and make note of switched being not preferred as they are potential points of failure
etc
Verify you have access to networking and internet that you will need to set up the system.
Discuss any potential problems with the Manager at OrderCounter before proceeding
IMPORTANT 
Make sure you know of anything you will be needing before you leave.  let key people know you will be needing that and try to go ahead and get it or ensure that the person you need to get it from will be there before you leave.
ALL 
new system need a D&A before leaving
Frequently we need a check which should be gathered before installation starts
Do we have an ACH agreement in place?  we need one!
any other documents should be verified with management to ensure we get them.  
Onsite Tech Setup System Server
Bring in and unpack ONLY the hardware necessary to get the System Server Operating in the location where it will be deployed.  DO NOT do cable management for anything until the end.  
It is vital that it is hooked up to the correct network from the beginning so you must ensure that we are on the network that we will be using from the very beginning unless you get permission to bypass this requirement from OrderCounter Manager.
Turn on Server and provide remote access to Remote Tech
Remote Tech Configure System Server And Network
Install Splashtop if it is not already installed for future access when needed
Upload existing database or add fresh database for the site
Install any necessary applications needed for site including OPOS drivers that will be needed etc
Verify first with Onsite Tech how remote access will be configured and set this up.  if it requires access to a backoffice machine have Onsite Tech give you access to back office computer ASAP so that remote back office can be set up immediately.  
Add Splashtop to any remote machine you are given access to.
setup .pro address for remote back office and email RBO access credentials to onsite Tech.
Setup DataCap Deployment & Test with onsite Tech
Onsite Tech Other Machines That We Need Access To?
Find any other machine at the business that we may need access to for future support when we are not on site.  this most commonly includes back office computer(s)
add SOS access and give to remote Tech to ass Splashtop to the machine for future access needs
Onsite Tech Place Hardware
Unload and place hardware for the business where it will be being installed
Don't unbox yet.
Onsite Tech Unbox Terminals
ONLY
 unbox their terminals
ONLY
 do cable management of routing cables properly through terminal cable management.  cable management from terminal to wall can be done later.
plug in network and power
notify remote tech that they should see machine online and move to the next  until complete
Remote Tech Initial Terminal Config & Terminal Independance
ensure that splashtop is permanently installed on all terminals.
setup terminal independence on all terminals in the loop when 5 or fewer machines are in the loop and hardware is new.  
install appropriate OPOS on machines for printers when they are hooked up.
setup backup DataCap deployment & Test with onsite Tech
Onsite Tech Unbox Kitchen Printers And/Or Kitchen Screens
setup kitchen printers and/or kitchen screens in their locations
all cable management will be done later
notify remote tech when plugged in and ethernet light is blinking so they can test them as you install.
Onsite Tech Unbox And Install Terminal Peripherals
ONLY
 do cable management of routing cables properly through terminal cable management.  cable management from terminal to wall can be done later.
notify remote tech of peripherals that are ready for them when they can set them up
Onsite Tech Unbox And Install Any Remaining Equipement Like Access Points And Tablets
have a remote tech setup access point.  
get tablets connected
ask remote tech to let you know when they are ready to work on tablet configurations and give them splashtop access on the tablet.
Remote Tech Hurry And Test Card Processing On All Terminals
The top priority should be reaching a point where a test card transaction can be run on every machine and full card testing processes can be completed on both the primary and backup deployment of datacap.  
Once this is done remote tech needs to verify batch totals with the processor to ensure everything is operating as it should be.
Onsite Tech can move forward with customer verification and training once this is done.
Onsite Tech Basic Pre Training Tests
Run Through the basics
you have already run some card transactions with remote tech...now lets verify the other basics.
Run transactions  
does everything appear to be operating rapidly and responsibly?
are fees setup like cash discounting (when needed).  
Are receipts looking good?
did everything go to kitchen  screens and printers as would make sense?
Does the menu look complete?
Is the cash drawer popping?
Is the cash management strategy setup as you would recommend?
Remote Tech Finishing Touches:
add logo to receipts
add logo to login screen
set machines to paradigm themes.
Onsite Tech Customer Review
BEFORE cable management let the customer know you are ready to walk through the work done.  
Show them where everything is and explain how you plan to manage the cables.
ensure they agree with the location of everything that has been setup
notify them of anything that they need to do for complete installation
(if applicable) ask them if you can go ahead and get started with the system configuration finalization and training process before you manage all the cables.  (it is preferred by us that training and configuration is finalized before managing cables so that they can be tinkering with the system while you manage cables later)
Manage Cables And Management Pre Departure Call
Go through and manage cables so that they look neat and are out of the way and WILL NOT BE PULLED when the screen is moved.
Have OrderCounter Manager speak to the owner/manager and confirm they are happy with all of the work and installation.
#1 Rule for success: "STAY BUSY"
. Whether you are the remote tech or the onsite Tech you should never be waiting on the other to be proceeding with your job.   If one tech or the other is behind schedule then you can be moving forward on other tasks.  you can even jump to training and configuration ahead of schedule if needed.  There is only one task to wait for the end on and that is 
CABLE MANAGEMENT
.  you should wait because otherwise you will likely be redoing it at the end anyway.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Paymentsense Pay At Table

Overview
Paymentsense is a processor that offer card payment services for either pay at counter or pay at table. This integration is for Pay at Table.
This means that you can settle a check at the customers table without having to interact with the POS at all.
Once the payment is complete then the table will be closed on the POS automatically
All communication between the POS and the PDQ device is through the internet, not direct.
Setting Up Pay At Table
Make sure that 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
POS
 > 
EOD
 > “
Server
 
Terminal
” is set to the actual server
      The communication from the PDQ machine to the database will happen on the terminal that is set as the “Server Terminal”. The       OrderCounter POS software must be open on this terminal or the interface will not function
Open the front end on the terminal specified in the 
Server
 
Terminal
 setting
Press 
Ctr
 + 
Alt
  + 
\ 
Enter the password for an employee that has the privilege of “Settings”
            This area is where you set up the interface
​
 Click on the 
PaymentSense
 tab
Tick the box for “
Pay At Table
”
Enter the connection details you have received from PaymentSense in the relevant boxes
Pay At Table has the following options
Print Credit card Slips on POS
 – Will when settling on the PDQ, print the credit card slips from the receipt printer
Do Not Print Merchant 
Slips
 – If ticked will not print the merchant slips on the POS
Print Itemized Epos Slips
 – If ticked, when you choose to print an epos receipt ( request for payment) will print an itemized receipt from the PDQ including a line for every menu item on the check.
If un-ticked then the menu items will not print
Servers Can See All Checks
 – If when asked you enter zero as a table number, the PDQ will show a list of all open tables. If this box is ticked then servers will see a list of all open tables. If un-ticked then they will only see their own tables. 
Press 
Test
 
Connection
 to make sure the connection details are valid
Press save and restart the POS software
Make sure the PDS machine is connected to the internet. PaymentSenes should already have that PDQ machine connected to the account in the details they gave you
Using Pay At Table
On the PDQ machine Press Menu > F4
Enter the Waiter ID – This is the front end password for an employee
Enter the Table Number – Zero will return a list of tables. The setting “
Servers
 
Can
 
See
 
All
 
Checks
” mentioned above will determine if this list shows just their tables or all tables
The table list will look like this
 
10 – 1
 
15 – 1
 
16 – 1 
 
16 – 2
The first number is the table number. The second number is the ticket. 2 means that it is ticket number 2 for that table. If you have a table with 2 tickets then you will have to settle both of them before it will close the table
From here you can print the epos receipt (request for payment) This can be printed including or excluding the list of Menu Items by using the setting “
Used
 
Itemized
 
EPOS
 
Slip
”
Where are payments settled to? It should be the person who closes the check
Troubleshooting
The logs for the PAT interface are in the database under a table called Paymentsense_log
Please reference this guide for any updates or changes: 
https://tinyurl.com/ocmanualp
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Disable EMV Swipe

Ctrl 
+ 
Alt 
+ 
\
 to bring up the credit card processor settings
      Uncheck "
DataCap Gift Stripe Pass Through
"
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Reading Employee Cards (VP8300/3300)

Open credit card settings (
Alt 
+
 
Ctrl
 
+ 
\
 on the login screen). Go to "
Datacap Gift Stripe
" and turn that off, then enter the secure ID of the card reader into the secure ID box. Once that is saved restart the software and there will then be a "
EMV
" button at the bottom of the password screen to use a card to sign in/override items.
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Support Call Process

Overview
This document will go over the process to take and document a support call. Properly following this document will ensure all information and tickets are properly made available to you, other support members, and sales to ensure everything is being managed properly. 
 
1. Call Comes In
When a call comes in you should immediately open the ticket that is auto created in Zoho and begin to fill out the customer information for who you are talking to.        You can open this by clicking on the pencil icon under the contact info tab, or by clicking the “
E
” key anywhere in the ticket. 
 
2. Fill Out Ticket
Fill in the merchant’s name, email, and restaurant name in place of the account name.  
Set the category and classification based on the issue they are having and if Tier 1 or Tier 2 managed it.  
Choose your name under the ticket owner section.  
Edit the title of the ticket under the Subject Category. This should show what issues they are having but leave the phone number at the end in case we need to call them back. 
 
Once all information is filled out choose the save button.
 
Doing this step is particularly important as it ensures the ticket is attached to the correct restaurant or merchant, allowing us to easily find their tickets without having to search for additional information in Zoho.
 
3. Take Notes Throughout The Interaction
Take notes throughout the call so all issues/steps taken are documented on the ticket. To begin a note, press the Comment button or press Ctrl + C on the ticket. Use this function to take notes throughout the call and then save at the end so all other Order Counter members can see the information about the ticket as well as what was done.
 
4. End Of Call
Investigation 
required:
If the call requires more investigation or additional callbacks, you should email the merchant immediately. You should still do this even if the issue is resolved. This will ensure the merchant sees the resolution and can correct us on any information or if they do not fully understand what we provided them.
  
Send Email Summary To All Involved Parties: 
If the issue is resolved or still needs investigation you should email the merchant letting them know what we did or the next steps if there are any. Choose the reply all button and ensure the customer’s email is set properly as the “to” email (you might need to replace the 
phone@ordercounter.com
 email address with the customers’ email.) Let them know a recap of the conversation that you had and what resolution you had come to. Use this as a spot to ask for additional information if needed, like backups, pictures, etc.
  
5. Resolutio
n
Issue Resolved:
If the issue was resolved set the status of the ticket to closed.  
Issue Not Resolved:
 
If the issue is not resolved there should be an email from you to the merchant with information on the next steps. If you are taking the next steps the ticket should be assigned to you. If someone else is managing them, you should assign the ticket to that person and let them know that it was sent to them. 
By the end of the day all phone call tickets should be closed out or assigned to the correct person with the next steps clearly laid out and communicated with the merchant/caller. 
Following this process will help to clear out all phone call tickets quickly and efficiently, making it easier to see and respond to email tickets that come in throughout the day. 
 
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Support Procedures

Primary/Secondary Roles
 
OrderCounter support team members should be assigned to fill primary and secondary support roles for each workday.  Generally, one team member will be assigned primary support.  There can be multiple secondary support roles assigned depending on scheduling.
 
Primary Support Role
 
 
The goal of the primary support role is to maintain the ticket system focused on Un-responded Open Tickets and answering incoming phone calls.  The primary support role is the first line of support when end users and partners contact OrderCounter support, either when calling the support line or emailing 
support@ordercounter.com
.  The primary support role is responsible for ensuring that calls are answered promptly, and tickets are responded to within the required target times.  The primary support role is responsible for alerting the secondary support role when assistance is needed to ensure these targets are met.  The primary support role is also responsible for alerting OrderCounter support management when these targets are not able to be accomplished by the primary and secondary roles due to volume.
 
The primary role will need to be efficient when answering phone calls.  This means scheduling longer calls and understanding questions/issues the caller is having quickly and efficiently and escalating calls that they do not have the required expertise to solve.  On escalated, the primary role should circle back to the technician escalated to and learn what knowledge was missing to solve the ticket promptly.
 
At the end of the day, the primary technician needs to verify that all tickets are in an acceptable state based on ticket standards.  Enlisting assistance from secondary support may be needed and should be done at least an hour before leaving for the day if assistance is needed, to ensure that ticket requirements are met.
 
Summary of Primary Support Role Responsibilities
 
Answer phones promptly
 
Respond to tickets and assign out as needed within required target times
 
Alert secondary support when assistance is needed
 
Alter OrderCounter support management when targets are not being met by primary and secondary support
 
Escalating calls that require additional expertise
 
Ensure that ticketing system requirements are met before leaving for the day.
 
 
Secondary Support Role
 
 
The goal of the secondary support role is to provide backup to the primary support role as needed and to fall into the primary support role to cover lunches and any schedule meetings/appointments that the primary support role may have scheduled for the day.  At times when primary support does not need assistance, the secondary support role will be focused on other assigned support tasks, such as preparing deployments, handling support tickets, repairing equipment, and ensuring that tickets are up to date and communicating with end users and partners.
 
Summary of Secondary Support Role Responsibilities
 
Focus on non-primary support tasks
 
Assist primary support as needed
 
Track all support tasks through the ticket system and maintain proper communication/updates on both internal and external tickets on tasks
 
Zoho Desk
 
 
 
OrderCounter Support will utilize Zoho Desk to manage tickets and communicate with customers.  All customer communication with end users and partners should be done through Zoho Desk.  Tickets should also be added for all support tasks including deployments.  Zoho Blueprints will be used for a lot of standard support tasks to assist in following processes.
 
Login to Zoho Desk at the following link: 
https://desk.zoho.com/support/ordercounter
 
Use your OrderCounter email to login.  Make sure to set your profile picture (under My Profile by clicking your user icon at the top right) and click on the generic icon.  Use your OrderCounter headshot.
 
Views
 
 
The Zoho Desk Views are a great way to see what needs to be responded to and what is due.  Unlike Deskun, Zoho Desk seems to encourage switching views when checking for different items.  The following views should be favorited (click the star next to the name when selected) for easier access.  The view that should be checked most is the Un-responded Open Tickets.
 
 
This will show all tickets which the customer was the last responder.  This tab should be checked often.  Replies are required to incoming tickets.  Respond to the customer and provide them with an update on when to expect resolution and assign to the appropriate support user or, in the case of tickets that can be resolved right away, respond to the customer letting them know a resolution and close the ticket.
 
 
My Open Tickets is a view to review all open tickets.  This is needed to verify that tickets that are due are responded to accordingly.  Overdue tickets will show their Due Date in red.  
 
 
Open Tickets should be reviewed by everyone 3 times a day by support to verify that the entire team is on track.  Again, no tickets should be overdue at the end of shift.
 
 
More views will be added as needed and this live document will be updated as they are added.
 
Ticket Requirements
Someone is assigned
 
Due date is set
 
Account Name is set correctly
 
Contact is set correctly
 
Any additional contacts are CC’d
 
Priority is set
 
Category is set
 
OrderCounter user is the most recent responder in communication
 
Comments should be made if internal information or notes are needed in the ticket
 
Ticket renamed to a descriptive title
 
Replying to tickets is always required before any of the following actions: closing a ticket, scheduling a due date on a ticket, re-assigning to another technician.  This is to keep the customer informed of what is happening with their ticket.  This in turn reduces follow-up phone calls to support.
 
Ticket Status
Check tickets frequently throughout the entire workday.  Initial reply time should be within 10 minutes if possible, and 30 minutes during peak hours.
 
After hours: Try and check tickets periodically through after-hours time.  Review tickets first thing in the morning and before sleeping.
 
End of shift: All overdue tickets need to be resolved/customer updated daily before leaving the office at the end of shift.  And all tickets should have the above requirements set.
 
 
RMA & Returned Equipment
Proper tracking of equipment that is being sent in for repair or returned to OrderCounter should always be tracking through the ticketing system.  The type of RMA (advanced replacement or depot repair) will need to be referenced in the ticket.  All RMA/return tickets should remain open until the equipment is repaired and either installed back at the location or returned to OrderCounter (if an advanced replacement was provided by OrderCounter).
 
Ensuring Equipment
If providing a shipping label to the customer/partner, it should be attached to the ticket.  If a shipping label is not provided, it is required to get the tracking number of the shipment from the customer/partner.  After providing the shipping label or requesting the tracking number from the customer/partner, the due date of the ticket should be set to 3 business days from the current date.  Before this due date, support will need to check the tracking information to ensure that the package was shipped.  If the tracking information shows that the package has not been shipped, a follow-up with the customer/partner needs to take place.  After following up, a due date of 1 business day from the current date should be set and repeat as needed until the package is shipped.
 
Receiving Equipment
Once tracking is available, the due date of the ticket should be set to the scheduled delivery date of the shipment.  If the equipment is shipped to OrderCounter, the ticket should be updated once the shipment is received and closed if the equipment is just being returned to OrderCounter.  If the equipment requires repair (either at OrderCounter or through the manufacturer), the ticket should be updated with the appropriate repair/RMA process and remain open with the due date set to 3 business
 
days for OrderCounter repairs and 1 business days if requires shipping for RMA.  If the equipment was shipped directly to the manufacturer, the manufacturer should be contacted to ensure that the equipment was received and receive an estimate on when the repair will be completed.  The due date of the ticket should be set to the estimated date the equipment will be repaired.
 
Manufacturer RMA
​
​​​
If a manufacturer RMA is required, the manufacturer will need to be contacted and the support user will need to follow the manufacturer’s RMA process to create the RMA.  The RMA reference number provided needs to be added to the ticket and to the subject of the tick
​​​
et (example “RMA: 12345678 – Broken touchscreen”).  The manufacturer's contact also needs to be added to the ticket in an internal note.  The return shipping address should be directly back to the customer (or to OrderCounter if a support technician will be going on-site to replace) if the equipment is returned to the customer.  The return shipping should be OrderCounter if an advanced replacement was done.
 
Returned Completed RMA/Repair to Customer
 
​
​​​
For depot repairs (non-advanced replacement), once equipment has been repaired the ticket will need to be updated and customer communicated when they will receive the equipment (either shipped back from the manufacturer directly or delivered/installed by OrderCounter).  If the equipment is being shipped to the customer, the due date of the ticket will need to be set to the estimated delivery date of the shipment.  Otherwise, the installation date of the equipment should be scheduled with the customer and the d
​​​​
ue date should be set to the installation date.  Once the equipment has been received by the customer and installed, only then should the ticket be closed with any relevant details added.
 
Closing RMA/Repair Tickets
 
Tickets for return/repair/RMA equipment should only be closed once the process is complete and either the customer/partner has possession of the equipment, and it has been installed (for depot repairs) or OrderCounter has possession of the repair equipment (advanced replacement or returned equipment).
 
RMA/Repair/Return Ticket Requirements Summary
 
All standard ticket requirements still apply
 
Due date is set appropriately as laid out in this process
 
RMA reference number added to subject
 
Manufacturer contact added to note/comment
 
Proper communication with the customer/partner on each step of the process
 
 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Support Sprint Management Process

Overview
Managing support sprints is very important as it will help to see what tickets, calls, and items you were working on throughout the day. This will also help to see the total number of calls that you should be expected to work on.  

Support Sprints are managed through Azure DevOps under the OC Technical Team. At the start we will be working to map out the sprints and get a good idea of what each call and task requires from the support team.
  
Primary Support
The Main role of Primary is to take support calls, answer tickets, and quickly resolve or find a path to resolution for issues.
Phone Calls 
You should follow the Support Call Process to fully handle and resolve support phone calls. If this is done properly Zoho will give you the time it took to resolve the ticket. We can use this to determine the total amount of time spent on calls and tickets throughout the day.
Adding Support Calls to Azure
 
At the end of every day you should go through Zoho to look at your completed tickets and calls for the day. Using the time to resolution shown on each ticket you can determine the total number of tickets and time spent resolving those tickets.
1.2.1
 Using Zoho’s time to resolution determine how much time was spent on phone calls and answering tickets. As we build out the process this will evolve, but to start 1 Story Point will count as 15 minutes.
 

1.2.2
 Using that time you should create a new issue in Azure showing the time spent that day. You should create one for the phone calls that you took and one for the email tickets that you responded to. Follow section 4 to see how to make a ticket
 
Secondary Support
As secondary support your job will be to focus on other things but be available to assist the primary support tech if they need help with phone calls or tickets.
2.1
 You will follow the same process as Primary Support when entering phone calls and tickets into Azure.
 
2.2
 You should continue to do other things while not taking calls. This will include helping pack orders, making menus, and keeping the inventory room organized. You       should follow section 4, below, to add issues in Azure for everything else that you do throughout the day as well.
 
2.3
 
When making issues you should follow section 4 to make the issues in Azure
 
Deployment Assignments
 
As deployment there are many things that need to be added to Azure for sprints each day. 
There are currently three main ways a deployment will take place, either we will control the whole deployment, the deployment will be completely controlled by the partner, or it will be a hybrid where the partner gets everything ready, and we mainly help on install day to get everything connected. By following the below information, we can ensure we are putting everything in correctly based on the type of deployment.
 
Kickoff Creation
Kickoff creation should include any time spent talking with the rep, restaurant contact, and filling out/sending the kickoff email. For a deployment completely controlled by us and for a hybrid deployment this should take about 1-2 hours to complete the call and email and to keep up with the email throughout the entire deployment process. To create the Kickoff issue, follow the steps in section 4. 
 
Menu Creation
Menu Creation will either be done by you or by the secondary support tech. For a menu that is being completed by you, you are responsible for adding the issue within Azure. Follow section 4 of this document to see how to create an issue and the story point amount to use.
 
If you are already at 5 story points for the week and do not have time to complete the menu you should reach out to secondary support to see if they have availability to complete the menu for you. If they do, send the menu to them and they will create the issue and assign story points within azure. 
 
If neither you nor Secondary have available story points to complete the menu you should reach out to your management to see if someone else might be able to 
help
 make the menu. 
 
Training
Training is another aspect that should be added into Azure as a story. In most cases training should be done by you to ensure the merchant is dealing with the same person throughout their entire deployment. If you will be completing the training, you should follow section 4 of this document to make the training issue within azure.
 
 
If you are not able to complete the training and it is necessary to be completed immediately, reach out to your management to see if someone else is available to complete the training for you. If someone else completes the training, they will be responsible for adding the issue into Azure following section 4.
 
Issue Creation
4.0.1
 To make a new issue go to DevOps click on boards on the left side bar. Choose “+ New Work Item” and select Issue.
4.0.2
 In the title enter a title that clearly shows what you will be doing during that time. 
 
4.0.3
 In the description box enter the information about what is being done. If this is being done for a specific merchant, enter their information there and note exactly what will be done. If you are entering information for phone calls and support tickets, you should also note the total number of calls/tickets made during this       time.
  
4.0.4
 For the Iteration Path put the current sprint that covers the current dates or the dates that you will be working on this issue.
 
4.0.5
  Enter yourself on the “Assigned To” Category 
 
4.0.6
 Enter the priority based on what will be done first. Support should be everyone’s number one focus so you should only put 1 priority for support tech issues, or       when told to by management. 
4.0.7
 Due Date should be set to the date the issue should be solved by or the last day of the Sprint if that date is not known yet.
 
4.0.8
 Under the Story Points section you should put the total amount of time spent on that issue. At the start 1 story point will be calculated to 15 minutes while we       fully work out the system and determine the best amount of story points for each process. Follow the next sections to see the total time that you should need for       different types of issues.
 


Menu Creation
Once the story is created you will fill out the Story Points based on how long the menu should take to program. In most cases menus can be done in 2-4 hours. If you believe the menu should take more than 4 hours, get with your manager to make sure everything is being done correctly and efficiently for the menu that is needed.
 
Training
Training will usually take about an hour for front of the house and an hour for back-office training. 
Kickoff Creation
Kickoffs will include a lot of different things, not just the kickoff ticket creation. The kickoff will include calling the rep and merchant as well as emailing the kickoff ticket to both. This section will also include the filling out and management of the Deployment Process within Zoho.
Packing Orders
When packing orders ensure the restaurant name/invoice numbers are noted within the Description for the issue in azure.
Inventory Management
This time should be used to stock, organize, and process all new orders into the inventory system.
 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: On call Process

Taking Calls
When on calls you should take calls as you normally would when in the office. Anytime a call comes in it should be answered as soon as possible, but you should aim for it to be done within a minute. You should use the Sangoma Connect application on your phone to take these calls. As soon as your on-call time starts go into the Sangoma app and click on your extension number in the top left. Make sure that Do Not Disturb is turned off. With this off all calls should begin coming to your device. 
Multiple Calls At Once
Just like taking a call at the office, you should attempt to try to solve customer issues as soon as possible. 
 
Time To Resolve
If the issue takes a bit to resolve, you should not stay on the call with them, and instead offer to call them back once resolved. 
 
Additional Calls
If you are unable to call them back and an additional call comes in, try to put the merchant on hold and answer the other call. If it is not possible to put the customer on hold you should message or text your secondary on call to ask them if they are able to help take the additional call. If you know for sure you will not be able to answer the call within 10 minutes you should immediately ask your secondary on call for assistance. Do not wait to ask for help if you are not able to take the call.
Clearing Tickets
 
Clearing tickets should be done just like when you are in the office but is not needed as often. While in the office we strive to have a response to tickets within 10 minutes. While on call you should check the tickets at least twice a day, once at 11AM and once at 8PM. You should respond to all unanswered tickets. 
 
Not An Emergency
If the issue is not an emergency, you should let them know that we will get with them the next day that we are in the office. 
 
Emergency
 
If the issue is an emergency, you should assist the customer immediately. This can either be done by calling them if you have their information or emailing them back with the next steps as well as telling the merchant to call support.
 
Phone Call Tickets
 
For phone call tickets you should close them as you would, following the support call process. These should have a merchant added with notes on what happened during the call. 
 
 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Deployment/Kickoff Full Process

The purpose of this document is to ensure that all checklists are maintained throughout the deployment process, leading to an efficient and successful deployment from all teams involved. By following the established checklists and processes, all teams can stay informed of the progress of the deployment without having to take the time to reach out to other teams to see what phase the deployment is in. This allows for a more streamlined and efficient deployment process, ultimately resulting in a higher level of customer satisfaction. Additionally, by documenting all steps and maintaining the checklists in Zoho, the team can reference the information in the future if needed, leading to a more effective and efficient deployment process overall.
There are five total phases that must be followed to ensure a successful deployment process. The first phase is Shipment, which involves creating an invoice, gathering all necessary information, and sending the invoice to the support email to be dispatched. The second phase is the Kickoff Call, during which the team contacts the merchant, completes the call, and sends the necessary documents for review. The third phase is Menu Creation and Review, which involves working with the merchant to create and review the menu to ensure it is accurate and complete. The fourth phase is Installation/Go Live, which includes setting up and testing the equipment and training the staff. The final phase is Management Review, during which the team reviews the project and identifies any issues or areas for improvement. By following these five phases, the team can ensure that the deployment process is efficient, effective, and successful.
Throughout all phases, it is important that the owner of the project ensures that the project is maintained and all checklists are completed in Zoho. This includes making sure that all tickets are created and assigned to the appropriate team members, and that all necessary information is included in the tickets. The owner of the project should also ensure that all documents, such as invoices, agreements, and checklists, are uploaded to Zoho for easy access and reference. By maintaining the project and completing all checklists in Zoho, the owner of the project can ensure that all team members are informed of the progress and status of the project and that any issues are addressed in a timely and efficient manner.
To ensure effective communication and accountability, it's important to keep all communication within the original kickoff ticket. This means that every email, text, or call should be logged within the ticket, and the project owner should ensure that the rep and the business contacts are included in all communication. By keeping all communication in one place, it's easier to keep track of progress and ensure that all parties are on the same page. This also ensures that if there are any issues or misunderstandings, there is a clear record of what has been discussed and agreed upon. 
It is crucial to document every conversation and decision made between the rep and the business owner throughout the project. If there is no email or other form of documentation to confirm a conversation or decision, then it did not happen. This is because verbal agreements or discussions are often forgotten or misinterpreted, and there is no record of them for future reference. Therefore, it is essential to document every conversation, decision, and action taken in a clear and concise manner, and to ensure that all parties are aware of and agree to the documentation process. By doing so, the project team can ensure that all aspects of the project are completed as planned and any issues that arise can be addressed promptly and effectively.
Phase 1:
The first phase of the process is shipment and initial information gathering. The sales team completes the invoice and sends it to the team. The team member checks if the invoice includes all necessary information, including customer and rep details. Once confirmed, the team member should create a project in Zoho and assign it to themselves to ensure all steps are followed through.
Once the invoice to be shipped is received, the shipment team checks if the invoice is correct and if all items are present. If there are any discrepancies or missing items, they communicate with the sales team to resolve the issue before proceeding. The shipment team also confirms the shipping address from the invoice. If the shipping address is not available on the invoice, they should reach out to the owner of the project and have them reach out to the rep to get the shipment information.
The team packs all the equipment to be sent out and creates labels with all tracking numbers. Once all the equipment is shipped, they send the tracking numbers to the rep. The shipment team then assigns the ticket to the deployment team for further action.
Upon receiving the equipment, the deployment team confirms that all equipment has been delivered. The deployment team sends a report to the manager for review. The manager reviews the report and provides feedback to the team if required.
By following this process, the team can ensure that all necessary steps are taken, and the checklist is followed thoroughly, resulting in a successful shipment and delivery.
1: In the event that the shipment team is not available, the ticket should be assigned directly to the deployment team, bypassing the shipment team. The deployment team should then follow the same steps as the shipment team would have done. They should ensure that the invoice is correct and all necessary items are present. They should also confirm the shipping address and pack all equipment to be sent out. Labels with all tracking numbers should be created, and the tracking numbers should be sent to the rep. Finally, the deployment team should confirm that all equipment has been delivered and send a report to the manager for review. By following these steps, the team can ensure that the shipment and delivery process is completed successfully, even if the shipment team is not available.
Phase 2:
The first step is to contact the rep and set up a time for the kickoff call with the merchant. Once the time is scheduled, a team member should send a text and email to the merchant reminding them of the scheduled time and when the team member will be reaching out to them.
During the kickoff call, the team member should complete the call with the merchant and ensure that all information is covered and any questions are answered. After the call, the team member should send a kickoff email with all the information filled out and completed under the "New installation Checklist." The team member should also send the OrderCounter Agreement and Installation Checklist on DocUSign.
Once the kickoff call is completed, the team member should confirm that they have received the OrderCounter Agreement and Installation Checklist. The team member should send these documents to the manager for review.
In the event that the manager identifies any issues or discrepancies, the team member should address them and make the necessary changes. Once any issues are resolved, the team member should send the finalized documents to the manager for approval.
By following these steps, the team can ensure that the Kickoff Call phase is followed thoroughly, and all necessary information is provided to the merchant.
Phase 3:
The first step is to create the menu and table diagram, import the employee list, and add the non-cash adjustment if needed. The non-cash adjustment should be set up and added to credit transactions under Back Office Settings > Service Fees with the correct settings. The project owner should refer to the image in Zoho Projects for guidance.
Next, the team should change the Estimated Cash Discount Fee under Back Office > Settings > POS > End of Day/Reports. "Show Estimated Cash Discount Fees In Store" and "Show Estimated Cash Discount Fees Online" should be turned on with the calculated percentage.
Once the menu is created and all settings are adjusted, the team should create a stage file and set a time for installation with the merchant and the team member who will be installing the equipment. A time should also be set for the menu review with the merchant.
During the menu review, the team member should ensure that all menu items and prices are correct, and any changes should be made accordingly. 
After completing all steps above the project owner should send all phase 3 information to their manager to ensure everything was completed.
Phase 4:
Phase 4, Installation/Go Live, is a critical stage in the deployment process as it involves physically installing and testing the new system at the merchant's location. The Installation/Go Live Checklist should be followed thoroughly to ensure a smooth and successful deployment.
The checklist includes setting up a time for a settings interview and training, completing a merchant dry run, and confirming the go-live time with the merchant. It is important to review the dry run with the merchant and address any hiccups or questions they have.
Extra emphasis should be placed on the Credit Card Checklist, which includes adding the Payments License to the merchant, updating credit settings on all terminals, downloading EMV if necessary, and performing test transactions on all terminals. It is essential to ensure the test batch goes through and the first batch is done correctly.
The day after the go-live, the owner of the project should sign into the terminal and ensure the first batch was done by the restaurant. They should confirm the amount of the deposit is the same as the batch amount showing from the batch report.
Following the Installation/Go Live Checklist and Credit Card Checklist thoroughly will ensure there are no issues during this crucial stage of the deployment process. The completed checklist should be sent to the manager for review, and the merchant should be contacted one week and one month after the go-live to ensure everything is going well. Any necessary changes should be made based on the merchant's concerns.
Phase 5
 - Management Review
This phase is dedicated to reviewing the entire project and ensuring that all steps have been completed as per the checklist. This phase will be managed by the project owner's manager, who will ensure that all steps have been followed thoroughly and any necessary changes have been made.
The manager should first confirm that the equipment has been sent and received. They should also verify that the kickoff ticket has been created and that all DocUSign documents have been received.
Next, the manager should check that the menu has been created and that the installation has been completed. They should also confirm that the merchant has been contacted after go-live and that the batch has been confirmed with the merchant on the day after go-live.
Throughout the entire project, the manager should be reviewing the progress and ensuring that all steps are being followed according to the checklist. They should also be prepared to make any necessary changes or adjustments to ensure the project is successful.
By following these steps, the project owner's manager can ensure that the project is completed efficiently and effectively, and all parties involved are satisfied with the outcome.
In the Event of the original project owner not being available or being out for an extended period of time the project owner must designate another team member to oversee the project and ensure that all steps in the checklist are completed as planned. This team member should be thoroughly briefed on the project and provided with access to all necessary documentation and resources. It is essential that the project progresses without any delays or issues, and this can be achieved by having a backup team member to take charge when needed.
It's also important for the project owner to provide clear instructions on what needs to be done while they are away, as well as any relevant project information and resources. The temporary project lead should be updated with all project details and tasks that need to be completed, including any upcoming deadlines or important milestones.
Additionally, it's important for the project owner to communicate with their team members and provide a clear timeline for when they expect to return. This will help to alleviate any concerns or confusion about the project's progress and ensure that team members can plan accordingly.
Overall, communication and preparation are key when the project owner is out for a period of time. By appointing a temporary project lead and providing clear instructions and communication, the project can continue to move forward smoothly even in the owner's absence.
Even though the temporary project owner is only responsible for overseeing the project for a limited time, it is still crucial that they complete and fill out all the checklists as if it were their own project. This ensures that the project stays on track and that all necessary steps are taken and completed, even in the absence of the original project owner. By following the established process and completing the checklists thoroughly, the temporary project owner can maintain the efficiency and quality of the project until the original owner returns. It is essential to maintain continuity and accountability for the project, and completing the checklists is an integral part of that process.
Possible issues and ways to avoid them:
Missing or incomplete documentation: It's important to ensure that all required documentation is completed and submitted before moving onto the next phase. This includes items such as the OrderCounter Agreement and Installation Checklist.
Missed or delayed communication: The process relies heavily on timely communication with the merchant, project owner, and manager. Any missed or delayed communication could cause delays or misunderstandings during the installation and go-live phases.
Incomplete equipment setup: The installation and go-live phases require the proper setup of all equipment, including terminal and credit card settings. Any incomplete or incorrect setup could result in issues during credit card processing.
Inadequate training: The training phase is crucial for the merchant to understand how to properly use the equipment and software. Any inadequate training could result in confusion or errors during operation.
Failure to follow credit card checklist: The credit card checklist is particularly important to ensure that credit card processing is properly set up and tested before go-live. Any missed steps could result in issues during credit card processing and delay the go-live phase.
It's important to note that this checklist is an ever-changing document and may be updated at any time. As such, it's crucial to keep up-to-date with any changes or additions that may occur. To ensure the success of the project, the checklist must be followed diligently and consistently throughout the entire process. Any updates or changes will be communicated through the appropriate channels and it is the responsibility of all parties involved to make sure they are aware of and understand the changes. By staying current with the checklist and any updates or changes, we can ensure that the project will be completed efficiently and effectively.
If anyone involved in the project notices any potential issues or suggests changes that should be made to the process or checklist, it is important to bring it up to their management as soon as possible. This will ensure that the issue or suggestion is passed along to the appropriate channels, and that the necessary changes can be made to the process or checklist. It is crucial to maintain open communication and ensure that everyone is on the same page. Any potential issues or changes should be addressed promptly to prevent delays or mistakes in the project.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Deployment Checklist

Phase 1 - Shipment And Initial Information Gathering
Initial Checklist
Invoice made
Rep information received
Customer information received
Invoice sent to support email to be assigned to dispatch
Once an invoice is made and ready to be shipped, send invoice, customer, and rep information to support email to be dispatched.
Assign ticket to shipment team in Zoho
Shipment Checklist
Invoice received and looks correct
Once we receive the invoice to be sent out, ensure all items seem to be present. (Ex: multiple terminals with no server, no printers on invoice, etc…)
Shipping address received
Get shipping address from invoice, if not on invoice reach out to Rep to confirm
Pack all equipment to be sent out
Labels Created
Get labels created and note down all tracking numbers
All equipment shipped
Tracking numbers sent to Rep
Assign Ticket to Deployment Team
All equipment delivered
Sent to Manager for review
Phase 2 - Kickoff Call
Kickoff Call Checklist 
Rep Contacted
Kickoff Time setup with merchant
Call the merchant and set up a time for the kickoff call. Once this is schedule send a text and email to the merchant reminding them of the time that was scheduled and when you will be reaching out to them
Complete kickoff Call with merchant
Sent Kickoff email 
Send kickoff email with all information filled out and completed under the “New installation Checklist”
OrderCounter Agreement sent on DocUSign
Installation Checklist sent on DocUSign
Kickoff Call Completed
Order Counter Agreement received
Installation Checklist Received
Sent to Manager for Review
Phase 3 - Menu Creation and Review
Stage File/Menu Review Checklist
Menu Created
Table Diagram Created
Employee List Imported
Non Cash Adjustment added if needed
Non cash adjustment setup and added to credit transactions under Back Office Settings > Service Fees. Should be setup following these settings (change the service fee amount based on the percentage the location is using):
Estimated Cash Discount Fee changed
Change Estimated Cash Discount Fee under Back Office > Settings > POS > End of Day / Reports - “
Show Estimated Cash Discount Fees In Store” and “Show Estimated Cash Discount Fees Online” should be on with the calculated Percent
                                      
The calculation is ```rate/(rate + 100)```
Stage File Made
Set time for installation with merchant and whoever is installing the equipment
Setup time for menu review with merchant
Menu Review Completed
Sent to Manager for Review
Phase 4 - Installation/Go Live
Installation/Go Live checklist
Installation Completed
Setup time for Settings interview and Training
Settings interview Completed
Training Completed
Merchant Dry Run Completed
Review Dry Run with merchant
Review the dry run with the merchant and ensure any hiccups or questions they have are resolved
Confirm Go Live time with Merchant
Go Live completed
Contact merchant day after go live
Contact the merchant and make sure the go live went smoothly. Answer any questions they have or make changes to any settings that need to be made
Sent to manager for review
Contact Merchant 1 Week after Go Live
Contact the merchant 1 week after go live to ensure everything is going well. Make any necessary changes based on mechant concerns
Contact Merchant 1 Month after Go Live
 
Contact the merchant 1 month after go live to ensure everything is still going well. Address all frustrations and make any changes as necessary
Credit Card Checklist:
Payments License added to merchant
Credit settings updated on all terminal
EMV Download done on all terminals if necessary
Test Transaction on all terminals
Ensure Test Batch goes through
 
Run a test batch for those test transactions to ensure it goes through.
Ensure first batch was done
The day after go live sign into the terminal and ensure first batch was done by the restaurant. Ensure numbers look correct between the batch and the EOD reports
Check first deposit numbers
 
Work with the owner to ensure the deposit for the first batch went through.   Confirm the amount of the deposit is the same as the batch amount showing  from the batch report
Sent to Manager for review
Phase 5 - Review - Should take place throughout process and reviewed by someone else
Equipment Sent
Equipment Received
Kickoff ticket created
DocUSign documents received
Menu Created
Installation Completed
Merchant contacted after go Live
Batch confirmed with merchant day after go live
If you see anything that should be updated/changed to the above checklist please note your comments below and do NOT change anything above.
Comments:
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Basic Point Of Sale Troubleshooting Guide

Don't Panic. (Many Computer problems appear more serious than they really are.)
It may look like the computer has crashed and all your data is lost forever. But there are a host of problems that keep you from reaching your data or the network that can be fixed, sometimes in a matter of minutes.
That's not to say catastrophic data loss doesn't happen - it can, but it is rare.
The best way to avoid data loss is to properly care for and maintain your equipment. The biggest cause of POS data loss is improperly turning off the machine.
Make sure there really is a problem. ( Can't start your computer? Check the basics.)
Examine the cables, connectors, and power cords to make sure they're plugged in securely. Often times a loose cable or connector (power, network, keyboard, mouse, speaker, monitor cable, etc.) is the cause of the problem.
If you're using a power strip or a surge protector, make sure it's on and that it works. Remember that a surge protector may not b e working because it is designed to self - destruct. When an electric jolt is too much, your surge protector takes the hit saving your more expensive hardware from the voltage.
Try plugging something else directly into the electrical outlet to make sure there isn't a power problem.
Check to see if your monitor is on. Sounds silly, but it has happened more than once that was the problem.
POS software/windows/terminal is locked up or frozen on a screen (take notes to inform support of the transaction details i f this ever happens around a credit transaction to avoid double charges)
Pressing Alt + F4
.
 If a software program stops working or freezes up, try pressing the ALT+F4 keys to close the window that you’re currently working in. This can shut down a frozen wi ndow and bring the computer back to life.
CTRL - ALT - DEL
 When you press the Ctrl - Alt - Delete buttons together, you will bring up a control panel where you can select “Task Manager” and see if any of the programs are shown as “not responding”. You may be abl e to shut down the offending program from there.
Rebooting can do wonders. Don’t just pull the plug! 
A simple reboot may clear up the problem. Go to the Start Menu and select Shutdown then reboot the machine.
Systems continues to lock up
 – move to Networking
Networking
Problems that may be caused by a networking failure
Charge cards will not process
Software is locking up
Back office cannot be accessed
Simple Definitions
Modem
 – network device frequently provided by an internet service provider(ISP) which converts signals from the ISP to provide internet access
Router 
– network device that manages communication between multiple devices on a network
Modem/Router
–
network device that functions as both a Modem and a Router (most 
commonly 
provided by an ISP)
Switch 
– 
network device that expands the available Ethernet connections for a router
(switches do not have a WAN port)
Ethernet cable
–
cable that connects devices to a network this cable has 8 wires and looks 
similar to a large phone 
cable.
Patch Panel
–
Network panel that consists of 
multiple 
Ethernet Jacks that connect to network 
wiring 
which runs to other areas 
to connect devices throughout the building
Device
–
something that provides a function on your system. (A broad term tha
t could
describe a computer, POS terminal, printer, etc)
Port
–
inlet where you plug in a network cable
POS Network
–
This is the secure network on which your Point of Sale operates. This
network facilitates the communication of information between termin
als, displays, and
networked printers.
 
Power cycling 
network 
devices
If you are open for business and are partially operational it may be better to wait until a slow 
period to attempt power cycling your devices. Ultimately this depends on whether you can 
currently operate effectively or not.
One of the first steps for ne
twork connectivity 
troubleshooting 
is power cycling your network 
devices such as the modem, router, and switch.
Power cycling your devices will cut off all network communication while your router reboots.
Most routers can reboot in around 3 minutes. Howe
ver some more advanced routers can 
take longer 
Troubleshooting 
connections
 
(always remember exactly how things were plugged in. changing where 
something is plugged in can cause network malfunction
)
Checking
Connections from the Device Side
 
Check to make 
sure the network cable is connected from where it is plugged into 
the comp
uter to where it enters the wall. If the 
network light on the computer isn’t 
on or flashing then you are
n’t 
receiving a signal to the computer.
Also try 
unplugging the 
Ethernet 
conn
ection and plugging it back in
.
This 
can fix a 
lose connection issue. (if you notice the lights only come on when you hold the 
connection a certain way you should check for corrosion or obstructions)
Check to make sure there is not any corrosion inside
the jack or on the cable’s pins.
Checking Connections from the Switch, Modem, or Router Side
Check to make sure the network cable is connected from where it is plugged into 
the switch, modem, or router 
to where it enters the wall or another network device.
Check to make sure your connections between network devices are plugged in
securely. (example: if you have a switch then you should have a Ethernet cable 
connecting it to a router or modem/router) (example: You may have a separate 
POS router that is us
ed for your POS network and it should have a cable going from 
it to your Modem/router, Modem, or Router depending out your network 
configuration.)
If the network light on the switch, modem, or router that corresponds to the port you 
are plugged into isn’
t on or flashing then you aren’t receiving a connection form a 
device plugged in on the other end. This could be because:
There is no device that should be connected on the other end of the cable you are testing (in this event you should determine whether this cable needs to be plugged in at all)
The cable is not plugged in somewhere between the modem, switch, or 
router
 
Also try unplugging the Ethernet connection and plugging it back in. This can fix a 
lose connection issue. (if you notice the lights on
ly come on when you hold the 
connection a certain way you should check for corrosion or obstructions)
 Check to make sure there is not any corrosion inside the jack or on the cable’s pins.
 I
f you find unplugged Ethernet connections try plugging them back 
on
e by one 
to 
see if one of them addresses your connection problem
. When you see a 
corresponding light t
or the port you plugged in 
turn on this means 
the port that you
just plugged in 
has successfully connected 
a device on the other end. You can then 
check if the problem you are troubleshooting is fixed.
 
Be sure to leave unused Ethernet connections unplugged for security purposes.
You should always ensure that only necessary devices are plugged in and they 
have virus protection.
 
It is best practice to 
keep unused Ethernet connections away from anywhere that t
hey could be plugged in if possible
(this avoids future confusion)
Blue Screen
The dreaded “Blue Screen of Death”. There’s 
not a lot to be done except 
to 
Reboot t
he 
machine. If it 
keeps occurring,
this is an indication of a major problem with the computer.
Error Messages - Write Them Down
What tipped you off to the problem?
Sometimes it's an error code or message displayed on 
screen. Be sure to write it down
—
it may 
describe the problem and how 
serious it is. Be sure 
to document the exact wording of any error 
mes
sages. This can make the job 
the Tech
Dept. much faster.
Other times you get no warning
—
everything just freezes. Message or no message, be sure 
to 
note 
what was going on when the 
problem occurred. Were you starting your computer? Were 
you on the 
Windows Desktop? Were y
ou adding a tip? Were you Reinging up a specific item? Were you swiping a 
card?
Think about what changed recently on your computer.
Try to 
pinpoint when the trouble 
first started. Did the problem coincide with any recent 
changes?
Did 
anyone 
change any settings? If
t they 
did you might want to change them back the way they 
were.
Any peripherals been added or removed recently (such as a printer or external Memory 
Card 
rea
der?)
Has anyone 
new been using the computer recently?
Have 
you
d ownloaded anything off the Web? File sharing and free MP3’s are an easy way to get a 
virus 
on your machine.
 
No Internet (Most commonly affected POS functions are Charge Cards, Remote Access,
Online Ordering, Hosted VIP and Gift Cards)
Loss of internet acce
ss is most frequently caused because the Modem has had an 
error and needs to 
be reset.
Many time
s 
the modem can be reset without affecting the POS operation. If your POS uses a 
separate 
r
ou
ter from your modem 
or modem/router 
then you can reset 
the modem 
without concern that 
the POS network will go down
.
You may also lose the internet because of a loose connection.
Check to be sure there are not loose or disconnected cable that connect your mod
em to a 
switch or router
(DSL internet)
be sure that your phone line is plugged in securely and that there isn’t anything 
plugged into that line that could be causing 
interference
. (
If t
here are persistent problems get 
a phone and plug it into the line th
at you have entered your modem to see if it sounds clear 
through that line.
)
(Cable internet) be sure that your 
Cable 
line is plugged in securely and that there isn’t 
anything plugged into that line that could be causing interference.
 
Be sure that the 
power is on
 Try contacting your ISP to determine if there is an area or line problem
You may also have very slow or sluggish internet which may be caused by having too little bandwidth.
Typically things that will cause low bandwidth are having too little provided by the ISP, sharing internet 
with computers that are using too much internet 
and devices like camera DVR’s that could be using too 
much.
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here:
 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterbpost
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Back Office Won't Open

What to do if
 http://localhost/ocpos
 will not load
Is the Apache service running?
1)
 From the start menu type 
services.ms
c and hit enter

2)
 Locate 
Apache2.4
 in the list and see if its running

3)
 If the service is not running then 
right click
 the service and select “
Start
”
If the service does not start then this could be for the following reasons
The account the service is running under does not have permission to start the service
To fix this problem you need to change the account the service uses to run. 
Restart The Service
      
1) 
Right Click
 the service and choose 
Properties
      
2) Go to the “
Log On
” Tab
      
3) Choose the “
This Account
” option
      
4) Enter 
.\ 
followed by the account name of ad administrator. Eg .
\admin
      
5) Press 
Ok
      6) Restart the service
Another service is already running on the designated port
You can find the program using port 80 and force it to use another port /uninstall that application. Or you can change the port used by Apache. If you do the latter then you will have to specify the port when logging into the back office.
Open the 
Front
 
End
 
Go to 
Database
 
Settings
 > You will need the privilege of “
Settings
” to get past the override
Click on 
Change
 
Connection
 > 
Yes
 > 
Yes
 > 
Advanced
 
Setup
 > 
Continue
 > 
OK
This will save the current settings and force the following box to appear
Enter the new 
port
 and press “
Continue
”
The POS will now restart
Either use the link in the start menu to access the back office or remember to specify the port in the url. For example, if you changed the port to 9091 you would enter 
http://localhost:9091
Errors
There is a database error. 
code: 18456 
Array ( [0] => 28000 [SQLSTATE] => 28000 [1] => 18456 [code] => 18456 [2] => [Microsoft][ODBC Driver 17 for SQL Server][SQL Server]Login failed for user 'ocpos_bo'. [message] => [Microsoft][ODBC Driver 17 for SQL Server][SQL Server]Login failed for user 'ocpos_bo'. )
This error can be fixed by refreshing the database connection.
Database Settings
 > 
Connection Setup 
> 
Refresh Servers
After refreshing make sure the server & database selected is correct.
Click continue on the "
Connection Setup
" screen and the "
Back Office/Setup
" screen
​
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here:
 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterbowo
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: End Of Day Is Still Running

The Problem
When you try and perform an End of Day you are told that  you cannot run End of Eay when another End of Day is already running.
The Solution
To clear the End of Day running flag, open and close the data compiler on the POS login screen by pressing 
CTRL
 + 
ALT
 
+ 
C
.
 
Once the data compiler opens, you can close it, as just the process of opening the data compiler will clear the flag
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here:
 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercountereodsr
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Batch Errors

1) 
"The batch summary has not been processed. Reason: COULD NOT FIND 02."
      
Generally means the batch has completed on the processor side and that the processor has a timed batch set up to automatically process it at a certain tim
e
2) "
The batch summary has not been processed. Reason: Not Found
"
      Means that the batch has automatically ran on the processor side or that it's already been ran by the merchant
To print a batch report that's already been processed, you can do so by pressing 
Ctrl
 +
 
Alt
 + 
'
 on the login screen.
Change or additions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterbe
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Black Screens

Overview
      
Black screens can be annoying but here's 2 solutions to fix one
Solution 1: Is It On?
Step 1
      Check to make sure that the Terminal is on. Some Terminals
      Have an illuminated LED Power light that will indicate if a
      Terminal is on. If the Terminal is on and there's still a black
      screen, move on to 
Solution 2
Solution 2: Restart
Step 1
      Hold down the power button on the 
Terminal 
until it's off
      Note: Some Terminals will have an illuminated 
LED Power 
light. 
      If that light is off, then the Terminal is off.
Step 2
      Turn the Terminal back on using the power button.
      
Explanation:
This is a soft reset. By power cycling the Terminal, it'll refresh it's
software and hardware components. This usually fixes most
minor black screen problems.
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ocblackscreen
      
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Troubleshooting Cash Drawers

Solution 1
      Check the Terminal "
printer settings
" to ensure cash drawer is setup correctly
Solution 2
      Ensure the Terminal shows 
restaurant information
 at the top of the login screen
    
 
    if it does not restart
 
OrderCounter
Solution 3
      Ensure 
WinPrtSpl
 is running in the system tray if not open C:\OCPOS\winprtspl.exe
            Test Again
Solution 4
      Double click the 
WinPrtSpl
 icon and check to see if the drawer is showing under controlled drawer list
Solution 5
      In 
WinPrtSpl
  click on "
Manage Printers & Drawers
"
            Find the cash drawer in the device list and choose "
Test Device
" then choose "
Refresh
" and check for any errors
    
 
  
 
    If successful go to Solution X, if not successful go to step 10.
    
 
  
 
  
 
    If successful restart OC and click on Exit on the printer settings
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Frozen Screens

Overview
There are numerous processes and applications that can cause a frozen screen. Below are a couple of solutions you can use for troubleshooting them
Solution 1: 
Alt+F4
If the application freezes you can close it out manually by processing 
Alt+F4
 
together. This will force close the window.
If you do not have a physical Keyboard, use your On-Screen Keyboard
Solution 2: Task Manager
You can close the window or application in Task Manager.
     
 Step 1:
 Press 
Ctrl+Alt+Del 
together to bring up this window
      
     If you do not have a keyboard, hold down any area on the task bar and select "
Task Manager
"
      
     Click "
Task Manager
"
      
            
Step 2: 
Select the frozen Program from the Task Manager list and select "
End Task
"
            
Note
: Click the "
CPU
" & "
Memory
" to sort by which program is using the most resources
               
Solution 3: Restart Your Computer
If you're unable to do 
Solutions 1 & 2
then your next best option is to restart your computer. That's if you're able too. If the entire screen is frozen and you're unable to click anything then simply unplug & replug your computer.
Solution 3: RAM
Frozen Screens can also be caused by a lack of memory on your device. RAM is responsible for handling data on your computer. When your computer runs out of RAM(Memory) it can cause applications to freeze. In order to see if you're computer is suffering from RAM issues open up Task Managed (See 
Solution 2
) and check to see how much memory is being used by your computer
Example:
Modern day computers typically come with 8GB of RAM. Normal RAM usage for these systems is typically around 40-50% for Idle and 70-90 when using applications. If you're RAM is hovering in the higher 90s then your computer is lacking RAM. One way to fix this is by upgrading the RAM in the system if possible. 
Note:
 To check how much RAM your system has go to the 
Performance
 tab in Task Manager
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ocfrozenscreen
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Printer Troubleshooting & Problems

Overview
These are a couple of procedures you can do when trying to troubleshoot a printer that won't print or any related errors.
Troubleshooting
1. 
Ensure Printer is 
Plugged In
 & 
Powered On
 and has 
Paper.
2.
 
Ensure the Terminal shows 
Restaurants Information
 at the 
top of the login screen
      If it does not, restart 
OrderCounter
. Once showing correctly go to the login screen
      choose "
printer settings
" and ensure the printer is setup and selected correctly there.
3.
 
Check to see if there are any 
error lights
 displayed on the printer. If there are error lights skip to 
9
4.
 
Ensure 
WinPrtSpl
 is 
running 
in the system tray. If it is not, open C:\OCPOS\winprtspl.exe - test again
5.
 
Double Click on 
WinPrtSpl
 icon and check to see if printer is 
being shared
 from this device
      If we are having issues with a printer not being controlled by this terminal we will have to find what 
      Terminal/Server it is being shared from.
6.
 
Once on the Terminal the printer was setup on, in 
WinPrtSpl
 go to "
Manage Printers & Drawers
"
            
Click on the printer and choose "
Test Device
" then "
Refresh
" you will then see the
            
test results and if it was successful or 
 
if there were any errors. 
                  
Successful: Close 
all
 
WinPrtSpl
 windows and test in 
OrderCounter
 again.
                  
Fail: Close the "
Manage Printers & Drawers
" window then choose "
exit
" on the
                  
"
printer settings
" window
7
.
 If the POS is using 
EPSON 
printers open up the 
Epson ADK
 and ensure the printers are setup there. Find the correct printer 
and right click "
Check Health Interactive" 
If a box comes up asking where you would like to print, the check passed and you can choose to cancel and close Epson ADK.
8.
 
Go to "
C:\OCPOS\winprtspl.exe
" Right click and choose to run as administrator. 
Double click on 
WinPrtSpl
 again and try the health check again. If it passes this time use the red x to close both windows and test again in order counter.
9.
 
If there are 
error lights
, start with a restart of the printer. If the lights continue to show, open 
Epson ADK
 and attempt to run "
Check Health Interactive
". If a box comes up choose to print a receipt 
often times it will show the error in the box just below those test options. You might have to send a test print twice for this to show up.
10.
 
If it shows a mechanical error, turn the printer off and back on and try again. If the same error shows
 
follow the next steps
 
 
- Turn off the printer then hold the feed button as you switch it back on.
           A self check should print. 
If a check does print, turn off the printer and
            
back on regularly. Test in Epson ADK Again
 
- Ensure there is receipt paper in the printer. If there is try to put a different roll of paper in the
           printer and test again.
 
- Ensure lid is fully shut after putting in new roll
 
- In most cases if the "Mechanical"  issue continues after this it will be a hardware issue
           with the printer
 
- Ensure you get the serial number from the printer
11. 
Sometimes the Backup server is set to a different server than on the Terminal. This may sometimes cause some printer issues. 
      To fix this open "
Regedit" (
Windows Key + R
 --> Type in "Regedit")
            Remove the value for "
server_backup
"
                  
(Right Click --> Modify --> Delete text in "Value Data)
                        
Restart OrderCounter
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ocprinters
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Troubleshooting RabbitMQ

Overview
Some new Terminals such as hanesis will run into issues with RabbitMQ. This a quick troubleshooting guide to fixing them
Step 1:
      Open the file explorer and go to 
C:\OCPOS\Setup\Software
            Right Click "
Install_rabbitmq
" and select "
Edit
"
            
                  Change "
C:\Windows\System32\config\systemprofile
"
 to x "
C:\Windows\SysWOW64\config\systemprofile
"
                  
                        Save Changes and re-run "
install_rabbitmq
"
Note:
To access RabbitMQ: 
http://localhost:15672/
Troubleshooting
If you have a customer that is seeing lag or slow downs after updating to 4.5.x.x (or a new installation using 4.5.x.x), the most likely culprit is that RabbitMQ did not get configured properly or is not running.
The easiest way to check the RabbitMQ is properly configured is to navigate to 
http://localhost:15672 12
 on the server.
On a system where RabbitMQ is setup properly, you will see the RabbitMQ Management Login:
You can test the login by using the following credentials:
Username: ocpos
Password: ocpos
A successful login will show the following dashboard:
This indicates that RabbitMQ is configured properly and running.
If you are unable to login or are not able to load the login page, such as in the image below, follow the instructions below on how to configure RabbitMQ.
Check that RabbitMQ Service is running.
Open the Services management window (Win Key + R, type in services.msc and click Run).
Right click the RabbitMQ service and choose “Start”. After the RabbitMQ service starts, try the steps above to verify it is configured properly.
If the RabbitMQ service is not present, doesn’t start, or you are still unable to login after starting the service, do the following:
Navigate to C:\OCPOS\setup\Software
Locate install_rabbitmq.bat
Right click on install_rabbitmq.bat and select “Run as administrator”
Let the RabbitMQ installation script complete.
NOTE After the initial setup in the command prompt, you will see a message with a countdown from 30. Let this complete. If the window is closed before the countdown is complete, the final setup after the countdown will not complete and RabbitMQ will not be configured properly.
Try the steps in the beginning of this thread to see if RabbitMQ is setup properly.
Changes or suggestions can be made here:
 
https://tinyurl.com/trabbitmq
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Manually Importing Gift cards

On the attached Excel Spreadsheet you'll want to put the gift card number in column A and the balance in column B. 
Fill the rest of the columns from Columns C,D,E, and F. Copy and paste the F column into the update_giftcards.php file, 
replacing the existing lines. 
They should look like the below example with the account numbers and balances (one line for each card).
$giftcards['1234567890']=50;
Replace the section above in the file 
C:\OCPOS\htdocs\OCPOS\update_
giftcards
.php
 and then navigate to 
http://localhost/OCPOS/upda
te_giftcards.php
 to import.  You'll just see a white screen if successful.  You can then check a balance of a 
gift
 card from the system.
    
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Troubleshooting PAX Devices

Networking Setup
Make sure that the PAX device is setup properly and that no cables are plugged into the wrong spot. Reference this diagram below
Errors: "RECV DATA TIMEOUT"
Usually means that the device is receiving a timeout from the processor. In other words, it can't connect to the terminal. This is usually
a network issue.
Solution 1: Check Cables
      Make sure that the ethernet cable is plugged into the red port. This cable should lead from that port into the router.
Solution 2: Restart
      Have them restart the device either by unplugging the cable going into the terminal or if a power button is present on the device
Solution 3: Configure IP
      Have them provide the IP of the PAX device.  Verify that this IP matches the IP set up in the "PAX" settings (ctrl+alt+\)
      If they need help getting the ip, provide this guide: 
https://certek.com/kb4/pax-sp30-payment-terminal/
      Also good practice to ping the ip to verify that's receiving data
       f it's not receiving data, manually change the IP and set it to static. Ping again to see if it'll receive data.
Solution 4: Restart Router
      If solution 1 & 2 didn't work, then they may have to restart the router linked to the pax device. Once they've restarted the router, have them
      restart the device as well. Run a test transaction
      
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Disable VP3300 NFC

You'll need to use the uDemo app (
https://atlassian.
idtechproducts.com/confluence/
download/attachments/30479625/
dot%20NET%20SDK%20Demo.zip?
api=v2
) from ID Tech.  
Once you install that app, open it up and the VP3300 should show in the top left and be pre-selected (unless the computer has multiple ID Tech devices).
You want to download the config from the device so that you can edit it and remove the tap processing.  To download the config do the following:
Once completed (about 30 seconds or so), it will prompt where to save the file.  Save the file and then open it with notepad.
You'll want to find the sections called "aids" and remove all the data from inside the square brackets.  
Before:
After:
Save that file and then we need to load it back into the device in the uDemo app.
Once that's completed Tap will be disabled.  The device will show "INSERT/SWIPE/TAP" quickly and then change to "INSERT/SWIPE".  If it does that, you've completed it.
NOTE: Performing an EMV Param Download through the POS will revert this and will re-enable Tap.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Kitchen Items Printing After Transactions

Overview
This is usually caused by a conflict between the "ticket notifications" setting and "print edited items". This can cause kitchen tickets to print twice when doing a transaction. 
1) 
Navigate to the printer settings
      
Back Office
 > 
Settings 
> 
Printers
2)
 Turn "
Print Edited Items
" under "
General Printer Settings
" to "
Off
"
3)
 Save settings & restart the Terminal(s)
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Server Performance

Overview
Servers have the potential to overload and these overloads can cause disruptions during service. Below are a few ways of increasing the performance & preventing system downtime.
Increase Virtual Memory
Increasing the virtual memory on the server computer can sometimes help improve the performance. Virtual memory basically uses space on the computer as a substitute for physical ram. 
Step 1
) Navigate to the Control Panel
   
   Windows Key/Start
 > 
Control Panel
      
Step 3)
 Navigate to the 
Virtual Memory
 settings
      
                        
                              
 
                                    
            
                                          
Step 3) 
Increase 
Virtual Memory
      Uncheck "
Automatically manage paging file size for all drivers
"
            Click "Custom Size"
                  Enter Size (Initial = Device Ram | Maximum Size = Device Ram x 2)
                  Click "Set" then "Ok"
                  *Restart your computer*
            
      
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Different Date And Time From The Server

This error occurs when there's a mismatch between the time on the 
Server
 and the 
Terminal
. To fix this, you can simply edit the time settings on the 
Terminal 
to match with the time on the 
Server.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Server Terminal Connectivity

Overview
It is essential for computers to communicate with the server computer. Sometimes server connectivity issues can arise, preventing other computers from discovering or accessing the server. 
Check the SQL Server Browser Service
The SQL Server Browser Service is responsible for assisting client computers in identifying the SQL Server instances on a network. If this service is not running or misconfigured, it can prevent other computers from discovering the server.
On the server, verify if the SQL Server Browser Service is running.
Open the Windows Services Manager.
Locate the "SQL Server Browser" service and check its status.
If the service is disabled or not running, enable it and set it to automatic startup.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Timeout Error When Receiving Response from Payment Server

Overview
If you encounter an error code "
TIMEOUT
" with the message "Could not receive response from Payment Server in the time allocated," it indicates a problem with the system setup related to OC Payment for refunds.
Check for OCPP
Access Terminal Settings
Enable "
Check for OCPP
"
Ensure that the "Check for OCPP" option is checked or enabled for the specific terminal encountering the Timeout error.
Save Settings
By enabling the "Check for OCPP" option, the system will appropriately handle OC Payment for refunds, resolving the Timeout error.
Conclusion
The Timeout error with the description "Could not receive response from Payment Server in the time allocated" typically occurs when OC Payment for refunds is not properly configured in the system settings. By ensuring that the "Check for OCPP" option is enabled for the affected terminal in the terminal settings, you can fix this error and ensure smooth communication with the Payment Server.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Troubleshooting Apache 2.4

Windows Could Not Start The Apache2.4 On Local Computer
Solution
Install vcredsit from ocpos\setup\.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Closing A Left Over Open Ticket

Overview
A ticket can be left open when you're paying for multiple tickets if the item on the ticket is removed or moved to a different ticket after doing a partial payment. In this video below I recreate the scenario. I am able to cash out the ticket by adding an item to the empty ticket and cashing it out.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Card Reader Tap Issues

Overview
In the even that Tap Payments stop working on your card readers, you will sometimes need a redownload of EMV Parameters in order for tap to work properly. In the example below we will be using a VP8300.
Navigate to the 
EMV Parameters Download 
button
​
Control Panel
 > 
Credit Card Tips
 > 
EMV Parameters Download
Click "
EMV Parameters Download
"
Once the download finishes, retest the card reader with a test transaction
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Remote Back Office Troubleshooting

Dual Routers
If they're are dual routers and the Remote Back Office suddenly stops working, Figure out which router leads to the internet. From there, verify that the port forwarding for that router is set to the LAN IP of the other router with the port for Remote Back Office.
Example below
Port forwarding is setup for port 777 to the Asus router where the server computer lies. 
*The 2nd router should have port forwarding setup to the server computer's LAN like usual*
In conclusion
Router 1 (Port Forwarding Router 2 IP > Port) - Router 2 (Port Forwarding Server Computer IP > Port)
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Services Troubleshooting

SQLAgent
If you're having trouble connecting to a server, make sure that the "
SQLAgentOCSERVER
" server is running. If it's set to automatic, right click and click "
Start
"
Note: The service name depends on the name of the server: "
SQLAgent$variable
"
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Database Error 18456

Overview
This error occurs whenever the SQL login fails for the user '
ocpos_bo
'. 
Troubleshooting
Enable SQL Server and Windows Authentication Mode
Change ocpos_bo user login password
The password set should be the same set in OrderCounter (Database Settings > Change Connection > Continue > Back Office Password)
Add ocpos_bo user password to the "pwd" field in regedit.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Database Error During ScratchWrite

Usually happens to the older version of NetEPay when the IP of the computer changes
Restarting NetEPay should resolve this​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Credit Transaction Errors

MSD Contactless Not Support
No Service Code Found
Card Reader: 
VP8300/VP3300
Solution: 
Download EMV Parameters
Tablets 
Unknown Exception
Card Reader: 
S300 Connected to iPad
Solution:
 
Restart Paygixstix Service on the iPad
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Socket Connect To prod2.netepayhosted.dcap.com Failed

Overview
This error is usually an indication of it not being able to connect to the processor. This error is usually on the processors side. 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Software Activation And License Prompt

A Software Activation screen can usually appear sometimes if the User Config file is corrupt. One big indicator is that after entering the license information and pressing enter, you'll see an exception message box for an "Unhandled exception has occurred in your application." 
This can be resolved by rollbacking the user config file in this folder path: C:\Users\PC\AppData\Local\OCPOSSuite\OCPOS_-_Point_of_Sale_Sui_Url_pvvvib4uqwccvdzo03t5arvovzmeuseo\1.0.0.0
Remove the current user config file and replace it with one of the previous ones. This can also be used to troubleshoot various issues with the OrderCounter exe not starting. Make sure to check the terminal afterwards for any possible changes tot he credit card settings or terminal settings.
Make sure you're logged in as the correct user as well. Being logged in as the wrong user will cause the Software Activation Screen to appear as well.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Already Clocked In

If an employee can't access a terminal because it says they're not clocked in, make sure to check the employee's hours or punch report for a future clock out date. This will prevent the employee from clocking in.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Auto Batch & EOD (End Of Day) Not Running

There are a couple of things that oculd prevent the Auto Batch & EOD from not running. 
Pending Orders
 
 
Pending Orders will prevent the end of day from running. This is a safe measure to prevent theft.
 
There is a way to set the End of Day so that pending orders do not stop it from processing but it is not recommended due to adding a need to check the pending orders daily to ensure that employees are not stashing pending orders and pocketing money.  It can be turned on with this command: update settings_pos set eod_open = 'Y'
How To Tell If The End Of Day/Batch Ran
There should be a log entry in the ocpos_exe.txt file with an entry for "Auto EOD result:BATCH_EOD_RUN" around the time set for Auto EOD and Batch.
There is also a table in SQL you can check to verify if the Auto EOD/Batch Ran.
Command: select * from log_auto_eod
Use this command to figure out which terminal is set to run the Auto EOD/Batch
Command: select * from log_auto_eod
Testing
The best way to test Auto EOD & Batch is by running it manually off the terminal set to run it. When you run it manually, check for any errors.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Google Whitelisting

Whitelisting specific domains for your Google login is a security measure ensuring only users from those approved domains can sign in with their Google accounts. This can be especially helpful if you're running a Google Workspace or have a company domain you'd like to restrict access to.
Prerequisites
You must have administrative access to your Google Admin console.
Step-by-Step Instructions
Access your Google Admin console
Visit 
https://admin.google.com
 and sign in with your administrator account.
 
Navigate to "Domains"
In the navigation menu, click 
Account
, then select 
Domains
.
Opens in a new window
support.google.com
Add Trusted Domains
Click 
Add domain
.
Enter the domain or subdomain that you want to whitelist. You can also add multiple domains (separated by commas).
Click 
Add
.
 
Review and Troubleshoot (Optional)
You can check your allowlist under "Sharing options" in the Admin Console. Review any troubleshooting errors if they appear.
 
Important Notes
Once you have whitelisted a domain, only users with email addresses on that domain will be able to sign in with their Google accounts.
You can whitelist up to 200 domains at a time
Whitelisting a domain doesn't automatically grant users access to all Google services. You may need to manage those permissions separately.
Example
If you only want users from "example.com" to access your Google services, you would whitelist the example.com domain.
Additional Considerations
Whitelisting domains can be a valuable security feature but may need to be carefully considered if you collaborate externally.
Regularly reviewing your whitelist ensures that only the necessary domains have access.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Facebook Whitelisting

Whitelisting domains for Facebook can be useful for security and access control purposes. This process lets you specify which websites or apps are allowed to use Facebook's login or social features.
Where to Find Whitelisting Settings
Facebook's whitelisting settings are generally found within the developer sections of your account settings. Keep in mind that the exact instructions might vary depending on whether you're managing a personal profile, a Facebook Page, or a Facebook app.
Here's a general path to find them:
Log into Facebook.
Settings:
 Access your Facebook settings. The location of your settings may vary.
Opens in a new window
www.sontiq.com
Developer Settings (If applicable):
 If you're managing a Page or App, you'll likely need to navigate to the "Developer Settings" section.
Whitelisting Options:
 Look for a settings area labeled "whitelisting," "trusted domains," "allowed domains," or something similar.
Steps to Whitelist
Identify the Domain:
 Determine the exact domain name you want to whitelist (e.g., 
www.example.com
).
Add Domain to Whitelist:
 Locate the whitelisting section in your Facebook settings, and add the domain name to the list.
Save Changes:
 Ensure you save the changes to your whitelisting settings.
Important Reminders
App vs. Site:
 Clarify whether you are whitelisting a domain for a standalone website or a Facebook app.
Specificity:
 Consider whether you want to whitelist the entire domain or specific subdomains.
 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Comp Items

1.
 
Login
2.
 Select the 
Menu Items
 from the 
Order
 you want to 
Comp
3.
 Select 
Comp
4. 
Select 
Comp % & Reason.
 
When done, select 
Comp Items
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterci
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Order Types

Order Types
Order types change how the system behaves. If you choose “Takeout” for example the first screen will ask you to choose a customer.
If you choose “Table order” it will ask you to choose a table. This is not something to be overlooked and is a very important part of the system. 
Order types are set per terminal. You can have multiple order types per terminal or you could restrict one terminal to one order type. 
Controlling Order Types
Go to 
Front
 
End
 > 
Terminal Settings
 
You will need the security privilege of “Settings” to be allowed into this area
Enter a Passcode and press “
Override
”
The Order Types are listed at the top of the screen. Turn each one on or off to control its availability on this terminal.
You also have “
Order Start
” This is where you can choose which order type will be used by default when you first log in. “
None
” will allow you to choose from any of the order types you have enabled
Here is a list of all of the order types and an overview of how they behave. It is assumed that you have set the order start to each one before use
Table Service
The 
Table
 order type is intended for use with table service.
When you first log on you will be presented with a table plan. If you click on a table you will be able to add Menu Items to the check and send items to the kitchen without paying for them. To pick up the table, when you log on just select the same table. To Pay you will need to go to manage tickets which is where you can pay or split the check. 
To make a sale with this order type do the following
Log on to the terminal
Choose a table from the table diagram
Enter a number of guests (can be turned off)
Ring though some items
Click on Manage tickets
Click Pay
Choose a payment method to complete the sale
There are some settings that are specific to this order type
Back Office 
>
 Settings 
>
 POS 
>
 Table Service
Assign Sections
 – Determens whether a table section is assigned to a server upon clocking in. Sections must be set up in 
Settings
  >  
Table Sections
Advanced Table Statuses
 – This will turn Advanced Table Statuses On or Off. Please see Coursing and Advanced Statuses document for more information
Auto Table Reset
 – If set to “Yes” then the table status will be set back to Open when all tickets are cashed out. If set to No, then you will have to go into that table and hit “Reset Table” to put the status back to Open. This is used if you want to clean the table before allowing it to be used on the system
Table Check
 – If turned on then servers cannot clock out with open tables
Open
 
Gratuity
 – Determines if the Gratuity amount can be entered when gratuity is added. If set to Off then the gratuity button will toggle the gratuity to zero or what is set in the “Gratuity Amount” box
Gratuity
 – Determines if the Gratuity is added before or after tax
Before Tax
 
After Tax
Gratuity
 
included
 
Discounts
 – Determines if Gratuity is calculated including or excluding discounts
Excluded Discounts
 
Includes Discounts
Gratuity
 
Amount
 – The Percentage of Gratuity to be added to tickets
Gratuity
 
Edit
 –  If set to On then at the checkout screen under 
 there will be an option called  
 Which will allow yout edit the Gratuity 
Number
 
Of
 
Guests
 – Prompts for a number of guests when a table is opened
Drinks
 
Per
 
Guest
 – If set to “
On
” then a prompt will appear when the number of drinks is not equal to the number of Guests. You need to set the drinks attribute on the drinks to get this to work.
Server
 
Accepts
 
Cash
 – 
Server Accepts Credit
 – 
Server Accepts Check
 – 
Server Accepts Gift Card
 – Server Accepts * is used for Personal Banks. Personal Banks or just Banks are money belts. They are when the server is responsible for the money alone. This is normally just for table service. 
You have to use this in conjunction with Back Office > Settings > Tills > Personal Bank Settings. Each order type is listed here an you have to enable personal banks for the order type in question. Again, this is normally just Table Orders.
If personal banks are allowed then the Server Accepts settings will determine what type of payment method the server is able to use to close out an order. If the Payment Method is not allowed then in will not show in the list to choose. 
Action After Send
 – Determines what will happen after the send order button is pressed. Options are:
Nothing – Keeps you in the current order on exactly the same screen
Table Diagram – Takes you to the table diagram
Sign Off – Puts you back to the sign on screen
Print Category Sales on Bank
 – Determines whether a servers category sales print on their Bank report
Print Button
 – If set to yes then a Print Button 
 will appear at the top of the screen allowing you to print all tickets
Table Service Checkout Button
 – When set to yes changes the 
 button to a  
 button when you ring through an item. This means you do not have to click on manage tickets then Pay. 
To Go
This is a quick service order type and will not allow you to suspend a sale. It is used mostly in quick service restaurants where the order will generally be to go.
There is no Send order button as the order will be sent automatically when the “Checkout” button is pressed. If you do not complete the payment process then a 
void ticket 
will be sent to the kitchen so they don’t make the order.
In the Receipt Template you should make sure to have a line for Order method so you can see that the order is “To Go”.
You can have the system prompt for a name which will print on the Ticket so you can call out the name when the order is ready .
For Here
For Here is Almost exactly the same as To Go. It is used mostly in quick service restaurants where the order will generally be For Hear.
The order method of “
For Here
” instead of “
To Go
” will print on the ticket so the kitchen knows not to put the food in take away containers.
Print stations are mapped to terminals by order type, which means that you can have “
For
 
Here
” orders print to a different printer than “
To
 
Go
” orders for the same items.
There are also other areas of the system that are linked to the order type
Quick Service
Quick Service will give you the option to choose from either “
For Here
” or “
To Go
” and is used where a mixture of the 2 options is common like a MacDonald’s
You can choose either “
For Here
” or “
To Go
” from the bottom of the screen before you hit the Checkout button. If you do not make a choice then you will be presented with a screen and forced to choose
Retail
Retail is intended for a retail environment. It is similar to quick service but it will allow you to save and send before the item is paid for. It will however warn that you are submitting the order without payment and ask you if you want to continue.
When you save and send it will print out a slip which is the request for payment
The intended purpose for this function is so that if a customer forgets their wallet or purse you can send the order, serve another customer and then pull up the order again without having to re-ring all the items. 
In order to retrieve a saved order go to 
 > 
You can edit cancel or close out these orders. 
Edit takes you back to the order screen, Close takes you to the Manage ticket screen and cancel removes the order from the system
Delivery
Deliveries are supposed to be for a restaurant with delivery drivers. It will manage the orders and what order is where.
The first thing you will be asked is for customer details
If you type in the first box it will look up existing customers. You can enter either a name or a phone number, wildcards such as * are not required. 
To add new customers, enter the details in the boxes below it.
The minimum information required can be set in 
Back
 
Office
  > 
Settings
 > 
Customers
 and 
Addresses
To find out how far it is to a customers address from the business address just click on “Map Address”
The Notes section is what will be printed against “Driver Instruction” on the ticket
When you complete an order for a customer who’s details you have just entered it will save them for next time.
If you select an existing customer their previous orders will be shown in the “Previous orders window” 
If you select a previous order you can click continue and add order. This will add all items in their previous order to the new order. If you Just press continue it will add a blank order. 
Customers can have multiple addresses. Make sure you choose one or you will be prompted to do so.
When you have added the Menu Items to the order you can save and send the order or you can pay for the order using the checkout button. 
If you save and send it will ask if you want to submit the order without payment. When confirmed it will print the order as well as a receipt as a request for payment. This can be presented to the customer upon Delivery.
Next go to 
 > 
All of the delivery orders will show in a list on this screen.
You can filter the list by Pending Delivery Orders or Out Delivery Orders
The next step is to sign the order “
Out For Delivery
” by selecting the orders 
and pressing this button 
Choose a driver from the list (If Driver is on the job title assigned to that employee then they will be in the list) and choose “Out for Delivery”
When you select the 
 button you will see this screen.
Select the order then choose a button
Delivery Details
 – Will show you more information including the full address
Reprint Receipts
 – Will re-print the receipt incase the origional is damaged or lost
Re-Assign Driver
 – Allows you to assign a different driver
Delivery Failed
 – Will mark the delivery as failed and set the total to zero
Complete Delivery
 – Takes you to the payment screen so you can pay for the order with the money 
received when you delivered the items
Back on the delivery pending orders screen you have the following options
Driver Check-In
 – Will mark all of the tickets assigned to that driver as complete. It does this if the deliveries have been paid for or not. 
Cancel
 
Order
 – Removes the order from the list and a cancelled order is sent to the kitchen
Edit
 
order
 – takes you to the order screen
Delivery
 
Details
 – shows you information about the order including the items and the full address
Print
 
Tickets
 - will print tickets for all of the orders selected
Map
 
address
 - will bring up a google map of the address for the order
Out
 
For
 
Delivery
 – allows you to assign a driver to the order and mark it as Out for delivery
Show Future Orders 
–
 
will show orders that are scheduled for 12 or more hours into the future
Takeout
There is a To Go Order Type already but Takeout takes it further. It is specifically for people taking out food and will let you manage orders placed over the phone or at the counter
The first screen for this order type is the same as Delivery but will only require a Name and a phone number, not an address
You can also search for an existing customer by typing either the customer name or the phone number in the “Select a Customer” box
If you do select an existing customer their previous orders will be shown in the “Previous orders window” 
From here you have 3 options
Cancel
 
Order
 – Will cancel the order
Continue
 
with
 
default
 – Clicking on Continue with Default will allow you to create a takeout order without entering any customer info
Continue
 
and
 
add
 
order
 – You get this option if you have selected a previous order from an existing customer. The items in the order you selected will be added to the check.
Continue
 – Will take you to the order screen without adding any items from a previous order
When you have entered all of the menu items to the order you can save and send the order or you can pay for the order using the checkout button. 
If you save and send it will ask if you want to submit the order without payment. When confirmed it will print the order as well as a receipt as a request for payment. This can be presented to the customer upon collection.
If you use the checkout option it will ask if you want to mark the order as picked up. This is because they could be ordering over the phone or they could be in the store. If marked as picked up it will not show in pending orders.
When the customer comes to collect you would go to “
Pending
 
Orders
” > 
Takeout
 and select the customer’s order.
From here you can 
Print
 
Receipts
 – Will print duplicate receipts for orders
Edit
 
Order
 – Will take you to the order screen so you can add or remove items
Cancel
 
Order
 – Will remove the order (But only if it has not been paid)
Close
 
Ticket
 – Takes you to the Manage Ticket screen so you can take payment. If it has been paid previously it will be marked as paid already. In this case you can press “Mark as complete” Which will take it off the pending orders screen
Orders are assumed ready to collect 15 mins after order. They will be white before this and red after.
There is a caller ID option which requires a piece of hardware and will allow you to look up customers automatically
Back Office 
>
 Settings 
>
 Pos 
>
 Order Wait Time Settings
Display Takeout Wait Time
 – Displays or hides the takeout wait time on the logon screen
Default Takeout Time
 – What the display will show as default with no orders
Auto Time Reset
 – If turned on, the default takeout and delivery wait times will be reset each day at a specific time
Auto Time Reset Time
 – This is the time the default wait times for takeout and delivery will be reset if Auto Time Reset is set to “On”
Bar Tabs
Bar tabs is a quick service Order Type that will allow you to save tabs
If you ring through some drinks and pay straight away it works just like one of the quick service options
If you press “Save and Send” you will be asked for a name for the tab. or it can be set to pre-authorize a credit card
and pull the name off the card (except with NFC/Tap/Contactless transactions).
After this you will go to the bar tabs
screen where you can see a list of all of your open tabs
If you sign off after entering items then it will save the bar tab with a customer name as the time it was entered and the employee name. 
Transfer tab
 -  Allows you to transfer to a different employee
Page up or down
 - Will navigate the tabs on the screen if you have tabs which take up more than one screen.
Change view
 - Shows you either a list of tabs with details or icons with the name of the tab and the cost. 
Change font
 - Will only affect the icons. It will make the font bigger or smaller so that you can see the price if it is off the screen.
Print tab
 - Prints the bill for that tab
Spit tickets
 - Will take you to a screen where you can put some items onto a different ticket inside the tab. 
Combine
 – Allows you to combine 2 tabs. Click on combine > in the pop up window tick the tabs you want to combine >click combine tabs > Enter the new name and press enter.
Rename Tab
 – Will allow you to change the name of the Tab
Edit
 
Tab
 – Takes you back to the order screen to make changes or additions to the tab
Close
 
Tab
 – Takes you to the payment screen
Drive Thru
Is used for Drive Thru orders where you can have multiple windows 
Continue
 - will send through the items currently on the order. This is so that if there is a long order the staff can be preparing it whilst you continue to take the order
End
 - Will send through any other items that were rang through since pressing Continue along with a notification to say that this is the end of the order
Fast Cash / Fast Credit
 - 
 when pressed will settle the check for exact cash or exact credit. 
Under Back Office > Settings > POS 
There are options to confirm Fast Credit and Confirm Fast Cash. These will prompt to confirm that you do want to settle
Pressing save and send will allow you to send the order to the kitchen
Pending Orders
 > 
Drive
 
Thru
 – This is how you pick up the pending drive through orders
Edit Order
 - takes you to the order screen
Cancel Order
 -will remove the order and send a ***Cancelled Order**** ticket to the kitchen
Print Receipt
 - will print a request for payment
Next Window
 - will move the transaction to the next window. This means it will no longer show in your pending orders screen
If, in terminal settings, you have dual drive thru enabled and multi screen disabled, then any other terminals that have drive thru order type will receive the next window.
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here:  
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterot
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Table Service

The Table Service order type is intended to be used with table service.
If Table Service is enabled, you'll be presented with a table diagram after you login.
 
If you click on a table you will be able to add Menu Items to the check and send items to the kitchen without paying for them. Use the "
Send Order
" button to send items to the kitchen.


To pick up the table, when you log on just select the same table. To Pay you will need to go to manage tickets which is where you can pay or split the check. 
Check Functions
Print
 - Prints out the check
Pay
 - Clicking this on a check will take you to the payment screen where you can pay for the order.
Move
 - Allows you to transfer a ticket to a different table or create a bar tab.
No Tax
 - Makes the selected ticket Tax Exempt
Edit
 - Takes you to the order screen where you can add or remove items.
Table Service Settings
Additional table service settings can be configured in the back office under 
Back Office 
>
 Settings 
>
 POS 
>
 Table Service.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: To Go

This is a quick service order type and will not allow you to suspend a sale. It is used mostly in quick service restaurants where the order will generally be to go.
There is no Send order button as the order will be sent automatically when the “Checkout” button is pressed. If you do not complete the payment process then a 
void ticket 
will be sent to the kitchen so they don’t make the order.
In the Receipt Template you should make sure to have a line for Order method so you can see that the order is “
To Go
”.
You can have the system prompt for a name which will print on the Ticket so you can call out the name when the order is ready .
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: For Here

For Here
 is Almost exactly the same as the 
To Go 
Order Type. It is used mostly in quick service restaurants where the order will generally be For Here.
The order method of “
For Here
” instead of “
To Go
” will print on the ticket so the kitchen knows not to put the food in take away containers.
Print stations are mapped to terminals by order type, which means that you can have “
For
 
Here
” orders print to a different printer than “
To
 
Go
” orders for the same items.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Quick Service

Quick Service 
will give you the option to choose from either “
For Here
” or “
To Go
” and is used where a mixture of the 2 options is common.
You can choose either “
For Here
” or “
To Go
” from the bottom of the screen before you hit the Checkout button. If you do not make a choice then you will be presented with a screen and forced to choose
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Retail

Retail
 is an Order Type intended for a retail environment. It is similar to quick service but it will allow you to 
Save and Send
 before the item is paid for. It will however warn that you are submitting the order without payment and ask you if you want to continue.
When you save and send it will print out a slip which is the request for payment
The intended purpose for this function is so that if a customer forgets their wallet or purse you can send the order, serve another customer and then pull up the order again without having to re-ring all the items. 
In order to retrieve a saved order go to 
Pending Orders
 > 
Retail
Edit
 - Takes you to the Order Screen where you can make changes to the order
Cancel
 - Removes the order from the system.
Checkout
 - Takes you to the checkout screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Delivery

The 
Delivery
 Order Type is for restaurants that use delivery drivers.. It will manage the orders and where the orders are located.
The first thing you will be asked is for customer details
If you type in the first box it will look up existing customers. You can enter either a name or a phone number.
To add new customers, enter the details in the boxes below it.
The minimum information required can be set in 
Back
 
Office
  > 
Settings
 > 
Customers
 and 
Addresses
To find out how far it is to a customers address from the business address just click on “
Map Address
”
The Notes section is what will be printed against “
Driver Instruction
” on the ticket
When you complete an order for a customer who’s details you have just entered it will save them for next time.
If you select an existing customer their previous orders will be shown in the “
Previous Order
" window 
If you select a previous order you can click continue and add order. This will add all items in their previous order to the new order. If you Just press continue it will add a blank order. 
Customers can have multiple addresses. Make sure you choose one or you will be prompted to do so.
When you have added the Menu Items to the order you can save and send the order or you can pay for the order using the checkout button. 
If you save and send it will ask if you want to submit the order without payment. When confirmed it will print the order as well as a receipt as a request for payment. This can be presented to the customer upon Delivery.
Pending Orders
 > 
Delivery
 will show all current delivery orders.
You can filter the list by 
Pending Delivery Orders
 or 
Out Delivery Orders
The next step is to sign the order “
Out For Delivery”
 by selecting the orders and pressing this button
Choose a driver from the list and choose “
Out for Delivery
”
If the employee has the driver job title assigned, they'll appear on this list. Otherwise, you can click "Show All" to show all employees.
Click "
Out For Delivery
" to confirm the delivery order.
Clicking the green "
Out Delivery Orders
" button will show the following screen
Delivery Details
 – Shows you more information including the full address.
Print Receipts
 – Prints out the receipt.
Re-Assign Driver
 – Allows you to assign a different driver.
Delivery Failed
 – Marks the delivery as failed and set the total to zero.
Complete Delivery
 – Takes you to the payment screen so you can pay for the order with the money received when you delivered the items.
Driver Check-In 
– Marks all of the tickets assigned to that driver as complete.
It does this if the deliveries have been paid for or not. 
Cancel
 
Order
 – Removes the order from the list and a cancelled order is sent to the kitchen
Edit
 
order
 – Takes you to the order screen
Delivery
 
Details
 – Shows you information about the order including the items and the full address
Print
 
Tickets
 - Print tickets for all of the orders selected
Map
 
address
 - Brings up a google map of the address for the order
Out
 
For
 
Delivery
 – allows you to assign a driver to the order and mark it as 
Out For Delivery
Show Future Orders 
–
 
Shows orders that are scheduled for 12 or more hours into the future
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Takeout

There is a 
To Go
 Order Type already but
 Takeout
 takes it further. It is specifically for people taking out food and will let you manage orders placed over the phone or at the counter
You will be prompted to enter customer information. Same as the Delivery order type.
​
Only a name and phone number is required.
You can also search for an existing customer by typing either the customer name or the phone number in the “
Select a Customer
” box
If you do select an existing customer their previous orders will be shown in the “
Previous orders window”
 
3 Options:
Continue
 
with
 
default
 – Clicking on Continue with Default will allow you to create a takeout order without entering any customer info
Continue
 
and
 
add
 
order
 – You get this option if you have selected a previous order from an existing customer.
 
The items in the order you selected will be added to the check.
Continue
 – Will take you to the order screen without adding any items from a previous order.
When you have entered all of the menu items to the order you can save and send the order or you can pay for the order using the checkout button. 
If you save and send it will ask if you want to submit the order without payment. When confirmed it will print the order as well as a receipt as a request for payment. This can be presented to the customer upon collection.
If you use the checkout option it will ask if you want to mark the order as picked up. This is because they could be ordering over the phone or they could be in the store. If marked as picked up it will not show in pending orders.
When customers are ready to pay for a Takeout order, You can find the order in the 
Pending Orders
 > 
Takeout screen.
\
Print Receipts
 – Prints the receipt for the Order
Edit Order
 – 
Takes you to the Order Screen so you can add or remove items.
Cancel Order
 – Removes the Order
Only removes orders that haven't been paid.
Checkout 
– Takes you to the checkout screen where you can pay for the order. 
If it has been paid previously it will be marked as paid already. In this case you can press “
Mark as complete
” Which will take it off the pending orders screen.
Orders are assumed ready to collect 15 mins after order. They will be white before this and red after.
There is a caller ID option which requires a piece of hardware and will allow you to look up customers automatically
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Bar Tabs

Bar Tabs
 is a quick service 
Order Type 
that will allow you to save tabs
If you ring through some drinks and pay straight away it works just like one of the quick service options.
If you press “
Save and Send
” you will be asked for a name for the tab.
It can also be set to pre-authorize a credit card and pull the name off the card
 
NFC/Tap/Contactless transactions not currently supported
After this you will go to the bar tabs 
screen where you can see a list of all of your open tabs
I
f you sign off after entering items then it will save the bar tab with a customer name as the time it was entered and the employee name. 
These buttons are available on the pending orders screen for bar tabs:
Search Name 
- Allows you to sort through the tabs by name
Search OrderID
 - Allows you to sort through the tabs by Order ID
Transfer Tab
 -  Allows you to transfer the tab to a different employee.
Page Up or Down
 - Navigates the tabs on the screen if you have tabs which take up more than one screen.
Change view
 - Shows you either a list of tabs with details or icons with the name of the tab and the cost. 
Change font
 - Only affects the icons. It will make the font bigger or smaller so that you can see the price if it is off the screen
Print Tab 
- Prints the bill for that tab
Spit tickets
 - Takes you to a screen where you can put some items onto a different ticket inside the tab. 
Combine
 – Allows you to combine 2 tabs.
 
Click on combine > in the pop up window tick the tabs you want to combine >click combine tabs > Enter the new name and press enter.
Rename Tab
 – Allows you to change the name of the tab.
Edit Tab
 – Takes you back to the order screen to make changes or additions to the tab
Close Tab
 – Takes you to the payment screen
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Quick Reference Guide

Changes or suggestions can be made here
: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterrg
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Equipment Reference Guide

Equipment Reference Guide
A collection of the various equipment we use and explanation of it's purpose in your point of sale system
Terminal
A Terminal is a specialized computer system used to manage sales transactions in a retail or hospitality environment. This is the heart of your operations when operating the OrderCounter POS software
Cash Drawer
This hardware component is used to store the cash for transactions. The drawer is typically located under the 
Terminal
 and can be locked to provide security for the money inside. The cash drawer can be opened from OrderCounter by using the "
No Sale
" function.
Receipt Printer
This device is used to print receipts or other types of documentation in retail, hospitality, and other business environments. These printers are typically connected to a 
Terminal
 or 
Cash Drawer 
and are designed to print receipts quickly and efficiently. They are typically connected to a cash register via a RJ-11 (Telephone) Cable and connect to the terminal directly using a printer cable or through the network using an ethernet cable.
Card Reader
The card reader is
 
used to read payment cards, such as credit or debit cards, during a sales transaction. The card reader is typically connected to the 
Terminal
 
 or 
Switch
, and it enables the merchant to accept payments from customers who use payment cards. We do not store information from these devices.
Switch
A switch connects multiple 
Terminal
, 
Card Readers
, 
Receipt 
Printers
, and other peripherals to create a local area network (LAN). The switch is responsible for routing data between devices on the network and ensures that information is delivered to the appropriate destination. Unlike a 
Router, 
a switch does not provide a network connection but connects them.
Router
A router connects the local POS network to the internet or to other networks. The router is responsible for routing data between the local network and external networks, ensuring that information is delivered to the appropriate destination. The router controls your connection to your internet. 
Ethernet Cable
An Ethernet cable connects various devices, such as 
Terminals
, 
Card Readers
, 
Receipt 
Printers
, and 
Routers
, to each other and to the network. Ethernet cables use a standard interface called RJ-45 and are designed to provide high-speed data transfer rates over relatively long distances.
Telephone Cable
Telephone cables to connect peripherals such as printers or card readers. This is because some older systems were designed to use the same cabling infrastructure as telephones, which made it easier to install and maintain the system. You will mainly see telephone cables used to connect 
Receipt 
Printers
 to 
Cash Drawers
Printer Cable
A printer cable is a type of cable used to connect a terminal or card reader to a 
Receipt 
Printers
. The cable is typically a serial or USB cable, and it allows the 
Terminal 
or 
Card Reader
 to send print commands to the 
Receipt 
Printers
.
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: What are Modifiers?

Modifier
s allow you to make adjustments to 
Menu Items
 after they are rung through. For example, you could sell a burger and have a 
modifier
 for 
no cheese
, or sauce on the site. 
Modifiers
 are extremely useful and there a few different types in 
OrderCounter
 which make them very versatile. You even have modifier mods which allow you to modify the modifiers.
​
Modifier Sets
 are groups of modifiers. The modifiers themselves are created in the group and only exist in the group.
To Manage these, go to
 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
management
 > 
Modifier
 
sets
 
(Create / Edit)
The fist thing to do is to create a modifier set by selecting “
New Set
”.
There are 3 different types of Modifier Sets
OptionSet
TypeSet
Split Quantity Typeset
To edit existing Modifier Sets, select a modifier set and select "
Edit Set
"
 On the edit set screen, there is an option to delete the modifier.
To duplicate existing Modifier Sets, select a modifier set and select "
Duplicate Set
" 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Introduction to Order Types

Order types change how the system behaves. If you choose “
Takeout
” for example the first screen will ask you to choose a customer.
If you choose “
Table order
” it will ask you to choose a table. This is not something to be overlooked and is a very important part of the system. 
Order types are set per terminal. You can have multiple order types per terminal or you could restrict one terminal to one order type. 
Configuring Order Types
Order Types can be configured from the Terminal Settings. Setting an Order Type to "
On
" will have it appear on the Order Screen
"
Retail
" Order type shows up after enabling it.
You also have “
Order Start
” This is where you can choose which order type will be used by default when you first log in. “
None
” will allow you to choose from any of the order types you have enabled.
For more information on
 Order Types
, visit the articles below.
Table Service
To Go
For Here
Quick Service
Retail
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Introduction to Inventory

Inventory will allow you to keep track of your physical inventory, suggest orders and if you set up recipes will automatically deplete inventory items.
You will usually have the following:
Sale items
 – The buttons on the till which allow you to sell your products
Inventory Items
 – These are the items which you purchase, such as eggs, buns, meat, boxes etc
Recipes
 – link sale items to inventory items. 
Orders 
– Allow you to place orders for delivery
Deliveries
 – Allow you to receive Products into the business
Processing
 – The inventory Count
Inventory can be accessed in the 
Back Office
 under the "
Inventory
" tab.
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: How to Navigate the OrderCounter Knowledge Base

The OrderCounter Knowledge Base is your one-stop shop for getting the most out of your OrderCounter system. Whether you're just starting or you've been using it for a while, we've got you covered.
 
Quick Reference Guide
This guide gives you a detailed overview of what OrderCounter can do. It's great for new users and a handy resource for experienced ones.
Exploring the Knowledge Base Sections
  
 
Getting Started
  
  
In the 
"Getting Started"
 section, you'll find everything you need to know about setting up and beginning to use OrderCounter. This includes an introduction to order types, menus, and the various order functions you’ll encounter.
Terminal Settings
This section allows you to configure various settings specific to a terminal. You can determine if delivery or drive-thru orders can be processed at the terminal, set the auto logoff time, choose the default category and table section, and more.
Control Panel
The control panel is a centralized interface where you can access and manage different aspects of the point-of-sale system. It provides options to perform tasks such as opening and closing the cash drawer, processing payments, and accessing reports.
Back Office
The back office is the administrative area of the point-of-sale system. It allows you to configure system-wide settings, manage employees and their privileges, set up menu items and pricing, generate reports, and perform other administrative tasks.
Inventory
The inventory section enables you to manage and track the stock of items in your business. You can add new items, set their prices, track quantities, and receive notifications when stock levels are low. This helps you keep track of your inventory and ensure that you have enough stock to meet customer demand.
KDS (Kitchen Display System)
The KDS is a system that displays orders in the kitchen or food preparation area. It replaces traditional paper tickets and allows kitchen staff to view and manage orders digitally. The KDS helps improve order accuracy, streamline communication between the front and back of the house, and enhance overall efficiency in food preparation.
Submitting a Ticket
  
  
Should you require further assistance or have specific questions, the knowledge base also includes a process for 
submitting a ticket
:
Sign In:
 Access your OrderCounter account or sign up if you're a new user.
Navigate:
 Go to the knowledge base section on the OrderCounter website.
Search:
 Look through the articles for information relevant to your query.
Submit a Ticket:
 If your question remains unanswered, click on 
"Submit a Ticket"
 to get direct support.
Fill Out Form:
 Provide a detailed description of your issue or question in the ticket submission form.
Confirmation:
 After submission, a confirmation email with a ticket number will be sent to you.
To view a ticket after submitting it in the OrderCounter knowledge base, you can follow these steps:
Sign in to your OrderCounter account using your credentials 
.
Once you are signed in, navigate to the “
Tickets
” section or "
My Area
" in the knowledge base 
.
In the “
Tickets”
 section, you will be able to search for your submitted ticket using relevant keywords or filters.
Locate your ticket in the search results and click on it to view the details and status of your ticket.
Chat
      There is also a Chat should you need more assistance. Just click the widget and enter your message!
 
 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: What are TypeSets?

TypeSets
 are what you would choose if you wanted to limit the number of items the end user can choose. For example: 3 scoops of ice cream with different flavor options.
To Manage these, go to
 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
management
 > 
Modifier
 
sets
 
(Create / Edit)
To create a new 
TypeSet, 
Selecting “
New Set
” on the 
Item Modifiers Sets
 screen.
To edit existing 
TypeSets
, select a 
TypeSet
 and select "
Edit Set
"
To duplicate existing 
TypeSet, 
select a 
TypeSet
 and select "
Duplicate Set
" 
To see all type sets, select the "
All Sets
" dropdown and select "
TypeSets
"
“
Sort
 
order
” - This will set the 
modifiers print order
. Lower numbers print first 
“
Font Size
” - Will determine the 
size of the font
 on the modifier buttons
“
Text position - 
Determines 
where the text will show
 on the modifier buttons
“
Button
 
Layout
”: Will determine the 
size of the modifier buttons
 when they display
“
Required
” - With Typesets, if “required” is ticked and then a modifier is required when the item is selected. 
“
Min
” – This field only appears when you tick “Required” This will set the minimum number of modifiers you are required to enter. This only works with typesets, not optionsets
“
Print on customer receipt
” - If enabled will print on the customer receipt. If not then it won’t. It will print to the kitchen either way
“Allow multiples Max =”
 - The maximum total items you can put through. Unlike optionset if you set the max to 4 then you can only choose 4 options total
“
Auto Add All Options
” will automatically add one of each modifier In this group to the item when it is sold
“
Availability
” Sets which order types can sell this modifier 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: What are OptionSets?

OptionSets
 allow you to choose as many options as you like. This is used for example for pizza toppings where each topping has a price. Alternatively, it can be used to allow any toppings you like but they are all free.
To Manage these, go to
 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
management
 > 
Modifier
 
sets
 
(Create / Edit)
To create a new 
OptionSet, 
Selecting “
New Set
” on the 
Item Modifiers Sets
 screen.
To edit existing 
OptionSets
, select a 
OptionSet
and select "
Edit Set
"
To duplicate existing 
OptionSets
, 
select a 
OptionSet
and select "
Duplicate Set
" 
To see all type sets, select the "
All Sets
" dropdown and select "
OptionSets
"
“
Sort
 
order
” - This will set the 
modifiers print order
. Lower numbers print first
“
Font Size
” - Will determine the 
size of the font
 on the modifier buttons
“
Text position - 
Determines 
where the text will show
 on the modifier buttons
“
Button
 
Layout
”: Will determine the 
size of the modifier buttons
 when they display. 
“
Required
”: Does not apply to Optionsets
“
Print on customer receipt
” - If enabled will print on the customer receipt. If not then it won’t. It will print to the kitchen either way
“
Allow multiples.
 
Max =” – 
When using Optionsets the number set here is the amount of each option you can sell. So if you set up cherry and chocolate as options and set this number to 4 you could sell up to 4 of each option but there is no overall maximum
“
Auto Add All Options
” will automatically add one of each modifier In this group to the item when it is sold
“
Availability
” Sets which order types can sell this modifier 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: What is a Split Quantity Typeset?

In this mode when you choose a modifier it will 
prompt
 for 
how many
 of that modifier you want to apply. For instance you could have a deal to sell 20 hot wings with your choice of sauce; with this mode you could set modifiers of hot, 
BBQ
 
sauce
, 
no
 
sauce
, etc. When you choose the 
bbq
 
sauce
 modifier it will ask 
how
 
many
 of the 20 wings you want with BBQ sauce. This number is removed from the total and you can only enter what is remaining.
To Manage these, go to
 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
management
 > 
Modifier
 
sets
 
(Create / Edit)
To create a new 
Split Quantity TypeSet
, 
Selecting “
New Set
” on the 
Item Modifiers Sets
 screen.
To edit existing 
Split Quantity TypeSet
, select a 
TypeSet
 and select "
Edit Set
"
To duplicate existing 
Split Quantity TypeSet
, 
select a 
TypeSet
 and select "
Duplicate Set
" 
Notes
: To see all type sets, select the "
All Sets
" dropdown and select "
TypeSets
"
“
Quantity
” - The amount of modifiers it wants you to choose. If you have 20 wings with a choice of sauces you would put 20 in here.
“
Sort
 
order
” - This will set the 
modifiers print order
. Lower numbers print first
“
Font Size
” - Will determine the 
size of the font
 on the modifier buttons
“
Text position - 
Determines 
where the text will show
 on the modifier buttons
“
Button
 
Layout
”: Will determine the 
size of the modifier buttons
 when they display
“
Required
” - In this mode if set to required and the Quantity is set to 20 then you will have to make a choice for all 20 items. If not set to required then you don’t have to choose any modifiers or you can choose any number up to the amount set in the Quantity field.
“
Print on customer receipt
” - If enabled will print on the customer receipt. If not then it won’t. It will print to the kitchen either way
“
Auto
 
Add
 
All
 
Options
”- will add 1 of each modifier In this group
Availability: Sets which order types can sell this modifier
“
Auto Add All Options
” will automatically add one of each modifier In this group to the item when it is sold
“
Availability
” Sets which order types can sell this modifier 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Adding Modifiers To A  Modifier Set

Once you have a modifier set created, you'll need to add modifiers to the set. 
Modifiers
 allow you to make adjustments to 
Menu
 
Items 
after they are rung through. 
For example, you could sell a burger and have a modifier to add 
Bacon. 
To add 
Modifiers
, go to
 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
management
 > 
Modifier
 
sets
 
(Create / Edit)
Select the 
Modifier Set
 you're trying to add 
Modifiers
 to.
On the right, you'll see the following options:
​
“
Modifier Price
” - If you are charging for the item or not you will want to tick this box. Just enter 0 in there if the item is free. If you do not set a price then you will not be able to sell the modifier on its own. You will only be able to use it with a modifier mod. Which are the grey options at the bottom of the screen.
Modifier Mods
 – This section is highlighted in red in the adjacent image.
To use them tick the box and enter a price. If the box is not ticked then you will not be able to use that modifier mod
Printers 
– You can set the modifiers to go to 3 different printers. If no printers are selected then the modifier will print to wherever the item is set to print. 
“PLU
” – Used with Forth inventory. This a location to store a unique identifier for each modifier. It is used as part of the export that goes to fourth. 
“
Print Priority
” Determines what order the modifiers will print in. Lower numbers appear first on the print out
“
Sort
 
Order
” The order in which the modifiers will show in the list when selecting them. Lower numbers appear at the top of the list
“
Delete Selected
” – Will delete the selected modifier in this group
“
Save
 
Selected
” – Will save changes to this modifier
“
Save
 
As
 
New
” – Will save this modifier as a new modifier. 
This is the way you would add a 
new
 modifier
. Make changes to an existing one and save it as new.
“
Modifier
 
Image
” You can 
add
 or 
remove
 an image for the modifier from here
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Creating Menu Categories

“
Menu Categories
” are groups that contain 
Menu Items
, the buttons used to actually sell an item.
Each menu item must belong to a 
Category
To manage 
Menu Items
, go to 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
management
 > 
Menu Categories
 
(Create / Edit)
You can display up to sixteen categories at one time and you can switch between three sets using the “
Menu Categories
” button on the front end.
You have the options to 
Move Categories
 or to 
Create Report Categories
 on the bottom left.
To move a category, select 
Move Category
. After selecting the category, select an empty location. You can select an existing category to swap locations.
Creating A New Category
Select a Black Space (Grey Square)
You will be presented with the following screen
Category Name -
 What will appear on the button
Description 
-
 
Only displayed here. It is not available anywhere else
Website Position
 Legacy feature
Button Color
 - The Color of the button graphic for the POS
Font size
 - size of the text on the button
Text position
 - location of the text on the button
Timeset 
– 
Timesets
 are objects that represent groups of time. They are created from Backoffice > Menu > Timesets
Once created they can be applied to multiple areas of the system. 
When applied to a “Menu Category” that Category will only available during the times defined in the “Timeset”
Order Method Availability
 – Determines if the category will show when using a particular order method. If it is ticked then it is available.
If Unavailable it will show as a blank square
Category Image 
– An image can be used instead of a name. This is where you would upload that image
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Adding & Creating Menu Buttons/Items

Menu items 
are the sale items that are available for customers to purchase. They are grouped into categories and can be represented as buttons or images on the system interface
.
Each menu item must belong to a 
Category
To add/create a 
Menu Item,
 go to
 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
management
 > 
Menu Items
 
(Create / Edit)
Choose a 
Category
 and Select an empty 
Item slot
.
For more information on
 Menu Items
, visit this article 
menu item
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: How to Schedule Orders

Schedule An Order
1.
 
Login
2.
 Enter an
 Order 
then select 
Order Functions
3. 
Select 
Schedule Order 
from the
 Order Functions 
Menu
4. 
Enter 
Date & Time
. 
When done, Select 
Set Time
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Creating Custom Items

Creates A Custom Typed And Priced Item For Sale
​
1.
 
Login
2.
 Enter an
 Order 
then select 
Order Functions
3. 
Select 
Custom Item 
from the
 Order Functions 
Menu
4.
 
Enter Custom Item Information.
 
When done, select 
Submit Item
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounteroci
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Selling and Redeeming Gift Cards

Overview
Gift cards prepaid cards for customers to redeem at a later date. They are not linked to an account of any type. 
Selling a Gift Card
Sign on to the till and start an order
Go to 
Order
 
Functions
 > 
Sell
 
Custom
 
Gift
 
Card
Enter the value amount and press 
Submit
 
If the terminal has an MSR reader attached the user will be able to swipe the card. If not select 
'Manual
 
Entry'
 and type the number of the card.
Once this has been done press '
Add Gift Card'
.
The gift card will now be added to the check. Pay off the check as normal
Using a Gift Card
Open a sale and ring through the items on the till
On the payment screen enter the amount to pay and select the Payment Method of 
Gift Card 
Either swipe the card or enter the card number manually. 
select 
'Process
 
Gift
 
card'
The payment has now been processed
Checking a Gift Card
Go to Control Panel
Select Gift Cards
This will allow you to check the balance or history. For both of these, you can swipe or manually enter the gift cards number.
The 
'Balance
 
Inquiry'
 option will display the remaining balance of the gift card
The 
'History
 
Inquiry'
 option will display all the transactions made using this Gift Card, You can also print the history of some predefined time periods
Creating a Gift Card Group
On the Back Office, you can create predefined gift cards with a set value. The value of the giftcard can be more than the cost.
You could use these groups if you have a run of cards printed with pre-defined balances. This way you can control what the cards are sold for. You can also report on how many have been assigned
Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Database
 > 
Insert
 
Gift
 
Card
Select 
Enter a name for the group, for example, Valentines Day 5.00
Set the card value (How much money is actually loaded onto the card)
Set the selling price (How much it costs to buy).
You can have the card be worth more than the cost of purchase
Once entered select 'Add New Group'
Now you can create the gift cards that will be contained in this group.
Select the Pencil icon next to the group you just added
Enter the gift card number and select 
Repeat this for all the Gift Cards in the group
Activating a Gift Card
Activating a gift card allows you to sell a Gift Card that is a member of a Gift Card Group
Log onto the till and go to 
Order Functions
 > 
Activate
 
Gift Card
Either swipe or enter manually
The number will be recognized and the card will be activated
 Now pay the bill as normal
Menu Item Gift Card
You can have a Menu Item be a button that sells a Custom Gift card.
Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Menu
 > 
Menu
 
Item
Click on a blank space to create a new Menu Item
Select 
Gift
 
Card
 from the 
Item
 
Type
 at the top of the screen
Add the following details
Item Name
 – The name that will appear on the button
Button
 
Color
 – The color of the button
Gift
 
Card
 
Price
 – How much it costs to buy this card
Gift
 
Card
 
Value
 - How much money will be loaded onto this card. This can be different than the cost of the card
VIP
 
Point
 
Modifier
. How may VIP points will be awarded by purchasing this card. This will be 
in
 
addition
 to the cost of the item. For example. If the VIP reward system is set to add 1 point for every $ spent, you set the cost of this Gift Card to $10 and you added a VIP point qualifier of 100, then when the gift card is sold, 110 points would be added. 
Reports
Back Office 
>
 Database 
>
 Insert Gift Card
Here you can see the Gift Card Groups and information on how many active and inactive cards there are
Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Data
 
Mining
 > 
Sales
 
Reports
 > 
Gift
 
Card
 
Report
This will show the number, activation date, starting amount and remaining balance. You can also see the transaction history similar to the function within the control panel. This, however, allows you to see the specific transaction by running the transaction detail report.
Clicking on 
View
 
History
 will show you the individual transactions
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: How to Reopen a Paid Check To Add New Items

Overview
Sometimes, after a check has been paid for, you may realize the need to add additional items to the transaction. This guide will walk you through the steps to reopen a paid check and add new items.
Step By Step Guide
1. Navigate to the 
Control Panel



2. Click "
View Transactions
"




3. 
Find the Specific Transaction 

      
You can find the transaction either using the Order ID or Invoice ID. You can also find it by the date.
4. 
Void the Transaction

      Once you have identified the desired transaction, you need to void it. This step cancels the original payment while preserving the details of the transaction for editing.




5. 
Re-Ring the Transaction

      After voiding the transaction, you should now have the option to re-ring or recreate it.
      Choose the re-ring or recreate option, and a new transaction window should open.
      Select "
Open as Same Tab
"
      
Ensure that the new transaction window opens in the same tab or screen as the previous transaction.
6.
 Navigate to Pending Bar Tabs
      
Pending Orders 
> 
Bar Tabs
      
      
7. 
Find the Bar Tab and Click "Edit"

You should see the details of the original check.
8. 
Add New Items

      With the tab open for editing, you can now add the new items or modifications to the check. Use the appropriate options within your POS system to input the new       items accurately.
9. 
Complete the Transaction

      Once you have finished making the necessary changes, close the tab or complete the transaction as you would normally.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Changing Tip Amounts

If you enter the wrong tip amount, you can change it by highlighting the transaction again and entering the correct amount.
If you already batched out with the improper tip amount, the tip amount will need to be changed on the processor side.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Combine Tables

You can combine tables by using the "Move" button under "Manage Tickets"
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Where is the gratuity button?

To add a gratuity button to table orders, follow these steps:
1. Access the manage tickets screen.
2. Look for the "
Grat
" button and click on it to add the gratuity amount.
Only the 
Takeout
 & 
Table Service
 order types have the manage tickets screen
The gratuity amount will be based on the percentage that you have set for gratuity.
For takeout orders, follow these steps:
1. Save and send the takeout order.
2. Go to pending > takeout to access the order.
3. Select the order and press "
Checkout Order
"
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Managing Account Balances in OrderCounter

Adding a Balance to an Account
In the OrderCounter POS system, adding a balance to an account often occurs during the checkout process when the 
Add to Account
 option is selected. This feature allows for charges to be assigned to a customer's account, which can be settled at a later date. Here’s how to add a balance:
Initiate Checkout
:
 Begin the checkout process for the items or services the customer wishes to purchase.
Select Payment Option
:
 At the payment screen, select the 
Add to Account
 option. This adds the total amount of the current transaction to the customer's account balance instead of requiring immediate payment.
Confirm Transaction
:
 Confirm the details and complete the transaction. The balance will be updated to reflect the new amount owed by the customer.
This feature is particularly useful in settings where customers have ongoing relationships with the business, such as in corporate or hospitality environments.
Paying Down an Account Balance
To pay down an existing balance on a customer's account within the OrderCounter system, follow these steps:
Navigate to Accounts
:
 From the main menu, go to 
Pending Orders
 > 
Accounts
. This section lists all accounts with outstanding balances.
Select the Account
:
 Find and select the account for which the balance needs to be paid. You can search by the account name or other identifying details.
Enter Payment Details
:
 Enter the amount being paid towards the balance. If the full balance is being cleared, ensure the full amount owed is entered.
Complete the Payment
:
 Confirm the payment details and finalize the transaction. The account balance will be updated to reflect the payment made.
These steps ensure that balances are accurately managed and that payments are correctly applied to the appropriate accounts, maintaining the financial integrity of the business operations.
Notes
Ensure all transactions are properly authorized by the customer or account holder to maintain trust and compliance.
Regularly review account balances and follow up with customers to encourage timely settlements, which will help maintain a healthy cash flow for the business.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Add Timeset To Category

Add Timeset To Category
1.
 
Login
2.
 Select 
Functions
 from the top right corner
3. 
Select 
Menu
 
Management
 from the 
Functions
 Menu.
3. 
Select 
Menu
 
Categories
​
.
4.
 
Select a 
Category
 to add a 
Timeset 
to.
5.
 
Select the 
Timesets
 for the 
Category
. 
If no 
Timesets 
are selected, the 
Category
 will remain 
Visible at all times.
 
When Finished, Select 
S
ave
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterattc
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Adding/Editing Timesets

1.
 
Login
2.
 Select 
Functions
 from the top right corner
3. 
Select 
Menu
 
Management
 from the 
Functions
 Menu.
4. 
Select 
Item Availability
 from the 
Advanced Menu Management 
menu.
5. 
Select 
Add Timeset
 to add a new timest. 
To edit an existing Timeset, 
Select the Timeset 
and select 
Edit Selected Timeset.
6. 
Enter or edit the Timeset Name.
 
Use the menus to set the start and end time for each Timeset. 
Select 
Save
 when you're done.
Changes or suggestions to this article can be done here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounteraet
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Multi-Item Edit

1.
 
Login
2.
 Select 
Functions
 from the top right corner
3. 
Select 
Menu
 
Management
 from the 
Functions
 Menu.
4. 
Select 
Multi-Item Edit
5.
 To change the details of several 
menu items
 at once, 
Check the items you want to edit by selecting the checkboxes.
When finished editing, Select 
Save
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercountermiefe
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Limited Menu Category Access

Overview
There is a requirement to have a user be able to edit specific categories when full menu editing is not enabled. 
There are 2 employee privileges that are related to editing a menu.
⦁
 
Edit Menu
⦁
 
Full Menu Editing
If Edit menu is set to “Yes” but Full Menu Editing is set to “No” then this enables limited menu editing.
The user can then only edit the items counter and availability.
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterlmca
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Editing Menu Items On The Back Office

Overview
This document will explain all of the options available when creating and editing Menu Items on the Back Office.
Security Settings
You can enable or disable access to the Menu Items section of the back office.
To do this do the following
Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Employees
 > Choose the employee > 
Privileges
 Search for Menu Items
Change the setting to 
Yes
 or 
No
Save the changes
Menu Items
Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Menu
 > 
Menu
 
Items
On the left-hand side of the screen you will have the different menu categories (screens) and on the right a grid 7×8 for the menu items. To navigate to a different set of categories use the menu categories buttons
Categories are the groups that contain the Menu Items. Every Menu Item belongs to a menu Category
Menu Items are sale items. The buttons that will be pressed to sell an item. These can be text or images
Along the bottom you have 6 large orange buttons. These allow you to modify the menu items
Move Item
Select “
Move Item
”. When selected (highlighted blue), the system will stay in the “Move Item” mode until you de-select it.
Select a button you wish to move
Now select an empty location (grey) or an existing button for the buttons to switch positions
Merge Buttons
Allows you to increase the size of a button
Select “
Merge Buttons
”. When selected (highlighted blue), the system will stay in the mode “Merge Buttons” until you de-select it.
select a button you wish to enlarge
Now select a grey button, the sale button will now stretch to the button you selected
Reset Size
Sets the size of a Menu Item back to 1 square
Select “
Reset Size
” When selected (highlighted blue), the system will stay in the mode “Reset Size” until you de-select it.
Select any Menu Item that is larger than 1 square
The menu item will now be set to occupy the space of 1 square
Alphabectical
Places all the buttons currently on the screen in alphabetical order. There is no undo so be sure you want to do this when confirming the change
Select the category you wish to alphabetize
Select Alphabetize
Agree to the warning
The Menu Items will now be in alphabetical order
Create Standalone Modifiers
“Standalone modifiers
” - Modifiers which appear on the same screen as menu items. They allow you to modify the menu item after it has been rung though. They can also be automatically selected when the item is sold. This allow you so see what modifiers are included on screen and is useful for example with pizzas. 
To create a stand a lone modifier click on “Create Standalone Modifier” then click an empty space in the Menu item section. 
The following screen will appear
“
Modifier
 
Name
” - what the modifier is. This will appear on the button itself and print on both the customer receipt and the order printers.
“
Modifier Price
” - the default selling price for the modifier
“
Modifier Mods
” – These are the settings for the modifier mods, which are the buttons that always show at the bottom of the order screen. 
The tick box sets if you are allowed to use that modifier mod and the box next to it is where you would enter the price. Please see the “Modifier Mods” document for more information of how they work. 
“Multiples”
 - How many times the modifier can be chosen. The user can select up to 10. As the button is presses a number will appear on it to keep count 
“
Print Priority
” - The order the modifiers will print in. The lowest numbered modifier will print first
“
Request
 
Quantity
” - Ignores any multiples that have been selected. Opens a keypad for the server to enter the quantity for the modifier
“
Button Color
” - The Color of the button graphic for the POS
“Printer 1”
 - printer location for the modifier
“Printer 2”
 - printer location for the modifier
“Printer 3”
 - printer location for the modifier
Print to closest Bar. The closest bar can be set up in table sections
“Current Image”
 - an image for the modifier if there is one
“Upload Image”
 - If used this will overwrite the modifier name
Copy Item
Allows you to duplicate the selected item
Select an existing menu item
Select an empty location for the new menu item
You will be asked if you wish to add a sales reference. This is asking if the item you are creating is the same as the item you just copied. It allows the user to put the exact same item in multiple locations. You could for example have bottled water, or Fries in every category. When you run your sales report, each menu item will report to the item selected in the sales reference. 
Create Label
Al label is a button that’s only function is to show you its name. It is used to label sections of a screen like red wine white wine etc…
To create a Label 
click on “
Create
 
Label
”
Choose the Label Name (What will show on the Label)
Choose the Font Size
Choose the text position (Top Left, Center etc…)
Create A Menu Item
Select the 
Category
 on which you wish to place the new “
Menu Item
”
 Select an empty space
There are different types of Menu Items
Normal Item
 – A regular sale item
Item with Sub Item
 – An item that when selected will take you to another screen allowing you to choose from a list of sub items. Think a category of drink, item of Red Wine then a list of all your red wines. 
"
Inventory Item"
 – When selected you will be asked for details to Crete an Inventory Product. This will create a Menu Item and an Inventory Item/Product but will not link one to the other. See Inventory Documentation for more information
Timed Item 
– Is an item that allows you to charge for time. A pool table, equipment Hire ect…
Open Item
 – Will allow you to sell an item that does not exist on the menu. 
Open
 
Option
 – Will allow you to sell a custom modifier
Special
 – Allows you to create groups of items and choose 1 or more items from each group for a set price. This can be used for a meal deal
Gift
 
Card
 – lets you sell a Gift card with a specified price and value
Batch
 
Inventory
 – Used for when you want to make a batch of something. For example, you could create a batch of spicy mayo. Mayo and hot sauce would be depleted from inventory and spicy mayo would be added to inventory. This allows you to account for the inventory before the batch is sold. 
Press Save to add the Item. The following shortcut buttons are available
Alt + S
 – Saves the Item
Alt + D
 – Deletes the Item
Normal Item
“Menu Category” 
–
 
The Menu category the item belongs to. As you had to select the category before you created the Item, this is already populated and cannot be changed
“Item name”
 – receipt/button description 
“
Alternate name
” – Will be shown on the order printer. If left blank then the 
Item
 
Name
 will be used
“
Item description”
 – This will show on the button when using the 
order function “
Show Item Information
”
This is a very useful feature and is not to be overlooked. It can be used for allergy information, recipes, a general description of the item or anything else you can think of 
“
Ticket order”
 – The order the modifiers will print in. The lowest numbered modifier will print first
“Item Tare Weight”
 – There is a feature that deducts an allowance for packaging from an item. See the Tare Weights documentation for more information
“
Button Color
” - The Color of the button graphic for the POS
“
Report category”
 – Reporting categories are groups used for reports. These need to be created prior to the item being created and cannot be done from the POS. Go to 
Backoffice
 > 
Menu
 > 
Report
 
Categories
 
“
Font size
” - size of the text on the button
“
Text position”
 - location of the text on the button
“
Timeset”
 – Timesets are objects that represent groups of time. They are created from 
Backoffice
 > 
Menu
 > 
Timesets
Once created they can be applied to multiple areas of the system. 
When applied to a “Menu Item” it will only be available during the times defined in the “Timeset”
“Category Availability”
 -  Allows you to choose which Order Types will be able to sell this item
“
Special item types”
 - 
Appetizer
 – When this is checked and the item is sold the server will be presented with two options – appetizer or entrée. The item will then show under either "
Appetizer
" or "
Entree
" on the order ticket. All other items rang through after this point will print under entrée unless they are also marked appetizer at which point you will be asked the same question
Drink
 – Used in conjunction with 
settings
 > 
POS
 > 
Table
 
Service
 > 
Drinks
 
Per
 
Guest
. This will prompt when number of drinks is not equal to the same number of guests
Don’t allow Modifiers
 – Will not allow modifiers to be used with this Menu Item
Doesn’t Print
 – Zero priced items will not print on the receipt
No
 
Gratuity
 – Means that when you add gratuity either automatically or manually this Item will be excluded and Gratuity will not be added
Unavailable
 – If Selected then when sold there will be a message appear to say that the item is unavailable. You will be given the option to sell the item anyway 
 
Discountable
 – Whether discounts are allowed on this Item or not
Doesn’t
 
Allow
 
Tax
 
Override
 – You can override tax based on order method (There is a separate document on this). If you do not want tax to be overridden on this item then you can tick this box
Speed
 
Mods
 – If ticked then all of the modifier screens will appear side by side so they are all shown on the screen at once. If not ticket then the modifier screens will appear separately.
Hidden
 – Hides the button so the user cannot see it or click on it. 
“Current Image”
 – If an image for the button has been uploaded then it will appear here
“Upload image”
 – Choose an image to use for the button.  If used this will overwrite the Item Name
“Request Quantity” 
- is a scalable item. You select a unit of measure from the list and when you sell the item you will be asked for the total weight
“
Course / Label
” – Sets the course or label for this item by changing the color indicator in the “Current Ticket” box. It is also possible to prefix the item description.
If you look at this example the Ribeye does not have a course attached whereas the Filet Mignon does. See Coursing Documentation for more info.
“
Item Price” 
Default selling price of the item
“Taxcode
 
1”
 - From the drop-down list the user can select from any tax codes which have been set
“Taxcode 2”
 - From the drop-down list the user can select from any tax codes which have been set
“Taxcode 3”
 - From the drop-down list the user can select from any tax codes which have been setr
“Printer 1”
 - From the drop-down list the user can select a printer for the item to print to
“Printer 2”
 - From the drop-down list the user can select a printer for the item to print to
“
Printer 3
” - From the drop-down list the user can select a printer for the item to print to
KDS
 
1- 6
 - From the drop-down list the user can select a kitchen display screen to user for the item
“Prep Time”
 – Used for KDS
“
Barcode
” - The barcode number for retail items
“
Sales Reference”
 - Item reference is used when there are multiple buttons for the same item. 
It allows the user to put the same exact item in multiple locations. You could for example have bottled water, or Fries in every category. When you run your sales report, each menu item will report to the item selected in the sales reference.
“Counter Enabled”
 - This is a feature that keeps track of how many of something you have left to sell 
Perfect for specials etc. To use this, you tick the box and enter an amount into “
Counter Value
”. Each time one is sold the counter 
decreases
 by 
1
. Note that this feature uses the bottom line in the button text, if a button has a name that is already using the second line the counter will not show. 
Also, on the login screen there is a button I,A,N 
 “
Item Availability Notice
” This is where you can see all of the items that have counters set. You can adjust the amount and disable the counter from this screen.
If the I.A.N button is not displayed then enable it in 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
POS > Show I.A.N
Counter Multiplier 
– The number you enter here is the number that will be removed from the counter when the item is sold.
“
Price Levels
” – You can set up to 10 Price Levels to be used in other parts of the system to adjust the price. An example of this would be a promotion. An item could go to price level 2 to facilitate a happy hour
These price levels can be filled out automatically based on rules elsewhere in the system. See piece levels documentation for further information
Item With Sub Item
When selected it turns the menu item into another category that can store up to 
5 pages
 of additional items. For example you can have a category of drink then have Menu Items which are set to have sub items for wine, brandy beers etc…
Select “
Item has sub items
”
Note that options relating to pricing and printing disappear. These will now be set on the buttons within this Menu Item. 
Select “
Setup Sub Items
”
Set up the new items as normal.
If you only have items on page 1 then the other pages will not be displayed on the POS
Inventory Item
This is the same as a normal item but when  selected you will be asked for the following details to Crete an Inventory Product. This will create a Menu Item and an Inventory Item/Product but will not link one to the other. 
Name
 – The Name of the Inventory Product
Stock
 
Number
 – A Unique reference number
Cost
 
Per
 
Unit
 – The cost per unit excluding Tax
Unit
 
Type
 – Volume Liquid, quantity or weight
Unit
 – Ounce etc…
Department
 – Dry, Wet Retail etc. 
Type
 – Wine, Beer Frozen food etc
See 
Inventory
 for further information
Timed Item
Timed Items allow you to charge for time. For example, a pool table or equipment hire.
The options are all the same as a Normal Item but it has the following extras
Unit of Time
 – Choose from 
Minute
 or 
Hour
Time Increment
 – How long it takes for the item to charge the Item Price
Minimum Price
 – How much will be charged when the item is initial rang though
If the item price is set to 5, the unit of time is Minutes, the time increment is 5 and the minimum price is 0 then when you sell the item the timer starts and the price goes up. After one minute it will have charged $1.00. and after 6 minutes it will have charged $6.00.
The price is calculated per second and will continue to charge until you hit stop.
To stop the timer, you need to click on the item > then press “
Stop
 
Timer
”
You can override the price by clicking on the item and adjusting the quantity to the correct amount. Editing the price will change the unit cost but it will still multiply this by the quantity
If you set the minimum to 5 and keep the other settings the same then the price will not increase till after 5 mins.
Open Item
Open Item allows you to sell an item that does not exist on the system. You can sell an open item from the Order Functions screen but the benefit of doing it from a Menu Item is that you can preconfigure some of the options such as printer and Taxcode
This allows you to have separate buttons for open food open drink etc that go to the right printer and charge the correct amount of tax and report to the correct category. This cuts down on user error and improves the accuracy of reports



Open Option
Much Like Open Item Open Option allows you to sell a custom stand alone modifier whilst making sure that other attributes such as reporting category are correct
Special
“
Item Is A Special
” – A way to sell items like modifiers. You make groups of items and when you sell the special you get to choose from the list of items just like you do with modifiers. The difference being that they will report to items not modifiers and you can charge a different price for them. Allowing you to have say burger and a drink for 5.00 and being able to dictate how much money gets allocated to each item.
Select “
Special
”
Select “
Add Group
”
Enter a name for the group (this will be displayed on the POS)
Enter the number of Items to be selected from that group
Select “
Add Item
”
Choose an item from the list
Select a price you wish to sell this item at
Repeat steps 2 – 7 until you have all of the groups you need. 
When you sell the items they will be sold for the price defined here. So you could sell a sandwich a drink and some chips for 5.00 and 
define how much from each group will go the revenue for the category it belongs to
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounteremi
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Front End Menu Catagories

Overview
This section of the system allows you to add, edit or delete categories straight from the POS without having to go to the back office. 
There are security settings that allow you to restrict access to this area
Security Settings
To restrict access to the Menu, edit or you need to turn on the override for that area and then set the employee or the job that the employee is using to deny them access to get past the override.
1) 
Go to 
Back Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Overrides 
http://localhost/OCPOS/settings_overrides.php
2)
 Set "
Menu
" to "
On
"
3)
 Go to 
Employees
 > E
mployee Manager
 > S
elect Employee
 > 
Edit Privileges
 >
      Find "
Edit Menu
" and set it to "
No
"
Setting the 
Override
 makes the system ask for a passcode when you press the button related to that override. In this case it will ask for a passcode when you press 
control panel
 > 
Menu Management
Setting the employee privilege “
Edit
 
Menu
” to “
No
” means that when you are asked for the passcode that employee’s passcode will not allow them to get past the override. At this point they could ask a manager to enter their code. 
     Setting an override will make it ask everyone for their passcode. This could get tedious for someone who does have access and accesses an area frequently. To avoid this, you can turn on “
Auto Authorize
”
4)
 Go to 
Back Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Overrides
5)
 Set "
Auto Authorize
" to "
On
"
6)
 Save Settings.
Menu Categories
“
Menu Categories
” are groups that contain “
Menu Items
”, the buttons used to actually sell an item.
You can display up to sixteen categories at one time and you can switch between three sets using the “Menu categories” button on the front end.
The orange button at the bottom of the screen allows you to move a category.
Move Category
1)
 Select "
Move Category
". When selected (Highlighted blue), the system will stay in the "Move Category" mode until you de-select it.
2)
 Select a category you wish to move
3)
 Now select an empty location (grey) or an existing category for the two categories to switch positions
4)
 Repeat this until you are happy with the order of the categories
Creating A New Category
1) 
Select a Black Space (Grey Square)
2)
 You will be presented with the following screen
“
Category
 
Name
” is what will appear on the button
“
Description
” will only show here. It is not available anywhere else
“
Website
 
Position
” is no longer used
“
Button Color
” - The Color of the button graphic for the POS
“
Font size
” - size of the text on the button
“
Text position”
 - location of the text on the button
“
Timeset”
 – Timesets are objects that represent groups of time. They are created from 
Backoffice
 > 
Menu
 > 
Timesets
Once created they can be applied to multiple areas of the system. 
When applied to a “Menu Category” that Category will only available during the times defined in the “Timeset”
“
Order Method Availability
” – Determines if the category will show when using a particular order method. If it is ticked then it is available.
If Unavailable it will show as a blank square
“
Category Image
” – An image can be used instead of a name. This is where you would upload that image
3) 
Enter the details for the category. The minimum required is the "
Category Name"
4) 
Press Save
Editing An Existing Category
1)
 Select an existing category
2)
 Edit the details as outlined above
3) 
Press "
Save
"
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterfemc
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Counter System

Overview
The counter system is like a mini inventory system that allows you to see how many of something you have left and deplete it each time one is sold. It is not linked to inventory and can be adjusted on the fly.
This can be used for keeping track of sale items rather than individual Inventory products. For example, you can make an Item called soup of the day and assign a counter value to it. Each time one is sold the counter will go down. When it reaches zero you will not be able to sell that Item.
You also have Menu Counter Sets. These allow you to essentially create a new Product or item and deplete that item each time one of your actual Menu Items are sold.
For example, you may want to keep track of a special bottle of vodka which is used in several cocktails. You would create a Menu Counter Set for the Vodka and assign that set to each Menu Item that contains it. That way you can keep track and know exactly when the Vodka has run out. As soon as the Vodka has gone, you will no longer be able to sell any of the cocktails that used it. 
The Setup
To add a counter to a Menu Item, do the following
Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Menu
 > 
Menu
 
Items
Select the Menu Item
Tick “
Counter
 
Enabled
”
Add a value under “Counter Value” (This is how many of that Item you currently have)
Add a value under “Counter Multiplier” (This is how many Items will be removed from the counter when the Item is sold)
Save
You have the option to turn on I.A.N which stans for “Item Availability Notice”. This is a button on the logon screen that gives you a list of all Menu Items with counters enabled. It shows you how many of each are left and allows you to remove the counter or set it to a new value. 
Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
POS
 > 
Set “
Show I.A.N.
” to “
On
”
Save Settings
Item Availability Notice
Once enabled by going to Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
POS
 > and setting “
Show I.A.N.
” to “
On
”
 
You will see the following button on the login screen
Click on the button and you will be taken to the following screen
This screen lists all of the items that currently have counters. In this screen you can do the following
Print
 – Print the list to the receipt printer
Remove
 
Counter
 – This will remove the counter from the Item which means you are no longer tracking it and it will no longer appear on this screen
Edit Count / Availability
 – Here you can change how many of that Item are available
Menu Counter Sets
Menu Counter Sets allow you to create a new temporary Product and relate that product to multiple Menu Items. Each of these Items will show the same availability. When one gets sold then the count for all of them will be depleted
For example, you may want to keep track of a special bottle of vodka which is used in several cocktails. You would create a Menu Counter Set for the Vodka and assign that set to each Menu Item that contains it. That way you can keep track and know exactly when the Vodka has run out. As soon as the Vodka has gone, you will no longer be able to sell any of the cocktails that used it
Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Menu
 > 
Menu
 
Counter
 
Sets
Click on 
Enter the details of what you want to track
Counter
 
Name
 – What you want to call the Counter. We will add “
Patty
”
Quantity Left 
–
 
How many you have in inventory. We will add “
10
”
Active
 – If Yes then the counter set will be used. If set to No then it will not
Affected
 
Item
 – A list of the Items that can Deplete this Counter Set
Add
 
Item
 – Choose an Item from the list. This is how you add an item that you would like to take away from the Counter Set. We will choose a selection of Burgers
Press “
Save
 
Set
”
Now when you look at the Menu Item Button on the front end you will see that they all have the same counter number. If you sell 1 of them, they will all be reduced by 1, or whatever you have the counter multiplier set to
The I.A.N Will show a separate line for each Menu Item. If you change the value of 1 of the Items it will affect the others
Using the Counter System
Once enabled, the quantity available will show on the button provided the following is true
The name of the button is not using the bottom line
The button does not have a graphic
Each time you press the button to sell the item one will be removed from the quantity available. If the Menu Item is related to a Menu Counter Set then one will be removed from the quantity of every Item in that set.
The figure updates when the button is loaded, this means you have to leave the category and go back into it to see the updated quantity. If someone on another till logs on after you have pressed the button then they will see the updated counter amount.
The counter in the database goes down as soon as you hit the button. If someone tries to sell the Item when the counter is at zero they will be met with the following Message
It is a flexible system so you are able to sell the Item anyway.
As this is a simple feature, removing the item after it has been rang through will not increase the counter. If you want to increase the counter you will need to do it through Menu Management by editing the counter for the Item or through the I.A.N
Changes or suggestions can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercountercs
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Tare Weights

Overview
Tare weights are a fixed adjustment to the quantity of the item for each item entered. Quantity can be represented as weight. If you have a tare code of 0.03 and you enter 3 ham then it will sell as 2.97 ham. 
The tare will only apply once, as it is supposed to represent the packaging 
Setting Up Tare Weights
Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
POS
 >  and set 
Show
 
Tare
 to 
Yes
This will show the tare as a deduction against the line item. See the difference between the setting being off or on below
Weigh you packaging. If you are selling the product in ounces then weigh the packaging in ounces
Tare weights can only be added from the back office. Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Menu
 > 
Menu
 
Items
Enter the packaging weight Under 
Item
 
Tare
 
Weight
. This needs to be entered as a decimal. If the packaging weighs 0.03 ounces then enter 0.03
Save the item
Using Tare Weights
Tare weights will be used in combination with a scale. Either the scale will automatically add the amount into the system for you or you will enter it manually.
You can set the item to Request Quantity then set the unit of measure such as lbs or ounces.
Weigh the product to be sold including the packaging
Enter this amount into the system as you see it on the scale. For example, 10
The tare weight will be removed from the amount entered and added to the system. If the tare weight is 0.03 then the amount entered on the system will have been changed to 9.97 and the price will be adjusted accordingly
Changes or suggestions can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercountertw
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Multi Item Edit (Speed Editor)

Multi Item Edit allows you to select multiple items and assign various attributes to them all at the same time. This can save you a huge amount of time.
To access the 
Multi Item Editor
, go to 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
management
 > 
Multi-Item Edit (Speed Editor)
Choose the menu items from the list. 
You can sort the list by categories by selecting the "
All Categories
" dropdown
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Add A Modifier Set To A Modifier

As well as being able to add sets of modifiers to a Menu item you can also apply them to the modifiers themselves. For example if you have a 
Modifier Set
 called “
Side” 
and one of the modifiers is 
Fresh cut Fries 
you could have another 
Modifier Set 
with options for those fries, such as toppers like cheese, chili, spicy salt and more. 
To access the 
Multi Item Editor
, go to 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
management
 > 
Add A Modifier Set To A Modifier
Choose the 
Modifier Se
t from the dropdown box.
Choose a 
Modifier
 then choose 
Modifier Set 
and check the box next to it
Choosing a modifier from the list will be populate with the modifiers contained in that set
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: What are Menu Items?

Menu items 
are the sale items that are available for customers to purchase. They are grouped into categories and can be represented as buttons or images on the system interface
.
Each menu item must belong to a 
Category
To manage 
Menu Items
, go to
 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
management
 > 
Menu Items
 
(Create / Edit)
Choose a 
Category
 and Select an empty 
Item slot
.
Menu Item Editor
“Item name”
 – receipt/button description 
“
Alternate name
” – Will be shown on the order printer
“
Item description”
 – This will show on the button when using the 
order function “
Show Item Information
”
This is a very useful feature and is not to be overlooked. It can be use                                                                                                                                             d for allergy information, recipes, a general description of the item or anything else you can think of 
“
Ticket order”
 – The order the modifiers will print in. The lowest numbered modifier will print first
“Website position”
 – No longer used
“
Button Color
” - The Color of the button graphic for the POS
“
Report category”
 – Reporting categories are groups used for reports. These need to be created prior to the item being created and cannot be done from the POS. Go to 
Backoffice
 > 
Menu
 > 
Report
 
Categories
 
“
Auto Select Status
” – If BO > Settings > POS > Table Service > Advanced Table Statuses is enabled then you can have the status change automatically when the item is rang through the till. The status will change every time an item with this setting enabled is rang through
“
Font size
” - size of the text on the button
“
Text position”
 - location of the text on the button
“
Timeset”
 – Timesets are objects that represent groups of time. They are created from 
Backoffice
 > 
Menu
 > 
Timesets
Once created they can be applied to multiple areas of the system. 
When applied to a “
Menu Item
” it will only available during the times defined in the “
Timeset
”
Item Price 
-
 
Default selling price of the item
Taxcode
 
1-3
 - From the drop-down list the user can select from any tax codes which have been set
Printer 1-3
 - From the drop-down list the user can select a printer for the item to print to
Print to closest bar. The closest bar can be set from Table Section
KDS
 
1
 - From the drop-down list the user can select a kitchen display screen to user for the item
KDS
 
2
 - From the drop-down list the user can select a kitchen display screen to user for the item
Barcode
 - The barcode number for retail items
Sales Reference 
- Item reference is used when there are multiple buttons for the same item. 
It allows the user to put the same exact item in multiple locations. You could for example have bottled water, or Fries in every category. When you run your sales report, each menu item will report to the item selected in the sales reference.
“
Order Method Availability
” – if the method is ticked the item will display and be available to be sold when using that order method
Special Item Types
Appetizer
 – When this is checked and the item is sold the server will be presented with two options – appetizer or entrée. The item will then show under either 
Appetizer
 or "
Entrée
" on the order ticket. All other items rang through after this point will print under entrée unless they are also marked appetizer at which point you will be asked the same question
Drink
 – Used in conjunction with 
settings
 > 
POS
 > 
Table
 
Service
 > 
Drinks
 
Per
 
Guest
. This will prompt when number of drinks is not equal to the same number of guests
Don’t allow Modifiers
 – Will not allow modifiers to be used with this Menu Item
Doesn’t Print
 – Zero priced items will not print on the receipt
Open Item 
-
 
When sold with this option enabled you will be presented with the following screen 
You will need to fill out a name for the item and a price as a minimum. This allows you to sell an open item. It is common to have one reporting to drink and one reporting to food for any items which need to be sold but are not on the menu. 
Speed Mods 
- Displays all modifiers on the screen.
For more information on Speed Mods, visit the following link 
Speed Mods
Gift Card
 – If ticked then the button will sell a gift card and not an item
Discountable
- Determines if a discount is allowed to be applied to an item
Hidden
 – Removes the button from the Pos. it will show as a blank square.
Open Option 
-
 
Will present you with a screen that will allow you to sell a modifier (option) that you set up on the fly. This is the same as pressing Order Functions > Custom Modifier
Item Image
 – If an image is added it will show here. You can 
Delete
 or 
Add
 an image from this location. If an image is used then the “
Item
 
Name
” will 
not
 be visible
Request Quantity 
- is a scalable item. You select a unit of measure from the list and when you sell the item you will be asked for the total weight
Item Has Sub-Items
 – When selected it turns the menu item into another category that can store up to 
5 pages
 of additional items.
Item Is A Special 
– A way to sell items like modifiers.
For more information on Item Specials, visit the following link 
Item Is A Special
Print Label
 - Is used to be able to print to a label printer
Auto Select Status 
- 
These are the colors of the tables on the table Diagram
For more information on Auto Select Status, visit the following link  
Auto Select Status
Course / Label 
- Sets the course or label for this item by changing the color indicator in the “Current Ticket” box
For more information on Coursing, visit the following link 
Course label
Price Levels 
Counter
Counter Multiplier 
– The number you enter here is the number of that will be removed from the counter when the item is sold.
Inventory Item
 – When selected you will be asked for details to Crete an Inventory Product. This will create a Menu Item and an Inventory Item/Product but will not link one to the other. See Inventory Documentation for more information
Editing Menu Items
Along the bottom you have 6 large orange buttons. These allow you to modify the Menu Items 
Move Item
Select “
Move Item
”. When selected (highlighted black), the system will stay in the “
Move Item
” mode until you de-select it.
Select a button you wish to move
Now select an empty location (grey) or an existing button for the buttons to switch positions
Merge Buttons
Allows you to increase the size of a button
Select “
Merge Buttons
”. When selected (highlighted black), the system will stay in the mode “Merge Buttons” until you de-select it.
Select a button you wish to enlarge
Now select a grey button, the sale button will now stretch to the button you selected
Reset Size
Sets the size of a Menu Item back to 1 square
Select “
Reset Size
” When selected (highlighted blue), the system will stay in the mode “
Reset Size
” until you de-select it.
Select any Menu Item that is larger than 1 square
The menu item will now be set to occupy the space of 1 square
Alphabetize
Places all the buttons currently on the screen in alphabetical order. There is no undo so be sure you want to do this when confirming the change   
Select the category you wish to alphabetize
Select 
Alphabetize
Agree to the warning
The Menu Items will now be in alphabetical order
Stand Alone Modifiers
Stand Alone Modifiers are Modifiers appear on the same screen as menu items. They allow you to modify the menu item after it has been rung though.
For more information, visit this article 
Stand Alone Modifiers
Copy Items
Allows you to duplicate the selected item
Select an existing menu item
Select an empty location for the new menu item
You will be asked if you wish to add a sales reference. This is asking if the item you are creating is the same as the item you just copied. It allows the user to put the same exact item in multiple locations. You could for example have bottled water, or Fries in every category. When you run your sales report, each menu item will report to the item selected in the sales reference.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Item Is A Special

Item Is A Special
 is an option that allows you to sell items like modifiers. You make groups of items and when you sell the special you get to choose from the list of items just like you do with modifiers. The difference being that they will report to items not modifiers and you can charge a different price for them. Allowing you to have say burger and a drink for 5.00 and being able to dictate how much money gets allocated to each item.
To Enable 
Item Is A Special
, go to 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
management
 > 
Menu Items
 
(Create / Edit) 
> 
Select a Menu Item
Checkmark 
Item Is A special
 underneath the Alternate Name
.
Once 
Item Is A Special 
is selected, you'll need to create a group.
Select "
Add Group
"
Enter a name for the group (This is displayed on the POS)
Enter the number of items to be selected from that group
Choose an item from the list
Select a price you wish to sell this item at
Repeat Steps 1-5 until you have all of the groups you need.
When you sell the items they will be sold for the price defined here. So you could sell a sandwich a drink and some chips for 5.00 and define how much from each group will go the revenue for the category it belongs to
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Auto Select Status

These are part of the “
Advanced Statuses
” They are off by default and need to be turned on in the 
Back Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Pos
 > 
Advanced Table 
Statuses. These are the colors of the tables on the table Diagram. By default, advanced statuses are disabled and a table can be one of three colors.
Green
: Open Table
Yellow
: A table that you opened
Gray
: A table that was opened by someone else
If you enable 
Advanced Table Statuses
 you can define your own statuses with their own colors. You can also have a message printed to a printer of your choice when the status changes. 
Auto Select Status
 allows you to automatically change the status of a table when the item is rang thought. 
Be aware that you can only go forward in statuses. See the 
Advanced Table Status
 article for more information. 
To Enable 
Auto Select Status
, go to 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
management
 > 
Menu Items
 
(Create / Edit) 
> 
Select a Menu Item
Select the "
Auto Select Statu
s" drop down.
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Course / Label

Coursing
 is when you tell the kitchen that the customer is going to eat a certain dish at a certain time. 
“
Course / Label
” – Sets the course or label for this item by changing the color indicator in the “Current Ticket” box. It is also possible to prefix the item description.
If you look at this example the Ribeye does not have a course attached whereas the Filet Mignon does.  It also affects printing. The items will be grouped under the course. 
Enabling Coursing
To enable coursing you need to follow these steps:
1) Go to the 
Back Office
 > 
Setting
s > 
Coursing
2) If no courses are listed, click on "
Add New"
3) Enter a name for the course.
4) Enter an abbreviation. This will appear before the item in the "
Current Ticket
" box. There's a maximum of 4 letters. 
Abbreviations are optional.
5) Enter a color. This will show in the "
Current Ticket
" box
If you use chrome you will be able to pick from a color list. If you use any other browser you may have to enter in the number code
6) You can change the sort order if needed. A lower numbered course will appear first in the list of courses to assign.
Repeat until you have enter all your courses.
Assigning Courses To Items
There are 2 ways to assign courses to items.
The first is to do it so it happens automatically. You do this through “
Menu
 
Management
”
Open 
Menu Management
 on the POS (
Control Panel
 > 
Menu Management
)
Open 
Menu item (Create / Edit)
Choose an Item to Edit
Choose a course from the dropdown box
Save the item.
This way has the advantage that as soon as you ring though the item it is automatically sorted on the kitchen ticket and displayed as a course. The disadvantage is that you have to set it up on every item prior to selling it.
The second way to can assign a course to an item is after you have rang it through.
This is also the way that you change the course. Say if someone wants an appetizer as an entrée this is what you would do
Ring through some items on the front end
Note that there are no colors or abbreviations on the "
Current Ticket
" box
Click on one of the items and you will see some extra buttons. You can select one or more than one item at a time
Click on 
Select Course/Label
Choose a 
Course/Label
 from the list that will appear
Click on the next item and choose its course
Repeat this until all the courses have been selected
Note how the prefix and the colors have now been assigned to the items
Select 
Finish & Close 
once done.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Editing Modifier Text

1.
 
Login
2.
 Select 
Functions
 from the top right corner
3. 
Select 
Menu
 
Management
 from the 
Functions
 Menu.
4.
 Select 
Modifier Mods
To change the text that appears for the Set modifiers 
OR 
change the abbreviation appearing on the ticket printout: Select the field you want ot change. Enter the new text. 
When finished, select Save
 
Please reference this guide for any updates or changes: 
https://tinyurl.com/ocmanualp
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Modifier Mods Shortcuts

Overview
Modifier mods can now be made to have other functions.
They can act as a quantity modifier for Item Selection
Meaning you could have a quantity modifier of 2 then to ring up 2 Cokes you would press 2 then press coke. 
They can act as a shortcut to most other button functions
You can take a button that is hidden in a menu option such as Custom Item and have it be on screen at all times
We have also expanded the number of buttons you can have as modifier mods. You can have multiple screens so you can keep your modifiers and add extra pages with quantities or shortcuts.
The Setup
Go to 
Back
 
Office
 >  
Menu
 > 
Modifier
 
Mods
There are 2 new sections
This is where you can decide what you want the button to do and how you want it to look
Function Type 
–
 
Quantity Modifier or Shortcut. 
Function
 – Choose from either a list of quantities  a list of existing button functions
Abbreviation
 – This is what will be shown on the button
Page
 – Which page of modifier mods it will appear on
Color
 – The button color
Page Sort Order
 – Choose what order you want the buttons to appear in. The buttons will be sorted from lowest to highest
Function
 
Type
 – States if the button is a quantity modifier or a shortcut button
Functions
 – States what the button does or what the quantity is 
Abbreviation
 – What the button will be called (Can be edited)
Page
 – Which page the button will be displayed on (Can be edited)
Color
 – The button color (Can be edited)
Page
 
Sort
 
Order
 – What order the button will be appear in (Can be edited)
How to use the Modifier Mods Shortcuts
In our examples we have 2 buttons set up. One is a quantity modifier of 2. One is a shortcut to a custom Item
I have put them both on page 2 and changed the sort order. If there is any kind of conflict then the buttons with the issue will be highlighted in red.
Go to the order screen
As we have a second page a button to take you through the pages will have been created which looks like this 
Click on that button to show the shortcut buttons
Press “2” followed by a menu Item
The menu item will appear with the quantity of 2
Click on Cus
The custom item sales box will appear
Changes or suggestions can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercountermms
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Stand Alone Modifiers

Stand Alone Modifiers
 are 
Modifiers
 appear on the same screen as menu items. They allow you to modify the menu item after it has been rung though.
To add 
Stand Alone Modifiers
, go to 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
management
 > 
Menu Items (Create / Edit)
Select the 
Category
 you're trying to add 
Stand Alone Modifiers
 to and click "
Create Stand Alone Modifier
"
After selecting "
Create Stand Alone Modifier
" select an empty menu space.
You can choose an empty menu space by clicking one of the gray squares
“
Modifier
 
Name
” - Name of the modifier. This will appear on the button itself and print on both the customer receipt and the order printers.
“
Modifier Price
” - Default selling price for the modifier
“
Modifier Mods
” – These are the settings for the modifier mods, which are the buttons that always show at the bottom of the order screen.
The tick boxes set if you are allowed to use that modifier mod and the box next to it is where you would enter the price. Please see the “Modifier Mods” article for more information of how they work. 
“Multiples”
 - How many times the modifier can be chosen. The user can select up to 10. As the button is presses a number will appear on it to keep count
“
Request
 
Quantity
” - Ignores any multiples that have been selected. Opens a keypad for the server to enter the quantity for the modifier
“
Print Priority
” - The order the modifiers will print in. The lowest numbered modifier will print first
“
Button Color
” - The Color of the button graphic for the POS
“Printer 1”
 - printer location for the modifier
“Printer 2”
 - printer location for the modifier
“Printer 3”
 - printer location for the modifier
“
Tax Code
” – The tax code you want to use for this modifier 
“
PLU
” – A unique number you can enter to represent this modifier
“Modifier Image”
 - An image for the modifier. If used this will overwrite the modifier name
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Adding Modifier Sets To Items

Once you have created a set of modifiers it can be attached to one or more “
Menu
 
Item
”. 
To attach a 
Modifier Set
, go to 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
management
 > 
Add A Modifier Set To A Menu Item
Choose a menu item from the list. 
Check mark the 
Modifier Sets
 you want attached to the item. 
You can sort the list by categories by selecting the "
All Groups
" dropdown
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Speed Mods

Speed Mods
 displays all modifiers on one screen side by side.
To Enable 
Speed Mods
, go to 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
management
 > 
Menu Items
 
(Create / Edit) 
> 
Select a Menu Item
Checkmark 
Speed Mods
 on the right side in 
Special Item Types
.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Loyalty -VIP Customer Reward Program

Overview
Loyalty is a reward program for VIP customers. You can either assign points per $ spent or by orders placed, allowing you to reward spending or visits
Customers are assigned VIP cards which you swipe before making a sale. This accrues points which qualify them for promotions. These promotions could for example be a free cup of coffee or 50% off their purchase. 
VIP Point System Setup
⦁
 
Go to 
Back Office
 > 
Menu
 > 
Promotions
 > 
VIP point system Setup
⦁
 
Click on  
This is where you set what type of point system you want to run.
 Give the point system a name 
⦁
 
Choose the amount of points they will receive (Has to be a whole number. Decimals not allowed)
⦁
 
Choose if they accrue those points for orders placed or Amount Spent. If Amount Spent is chosen you can use a decimal. For example you could set it so the customer would get 1 point per 0.5 dollars spent, or 1.5 dollars spent. Amount spent also means per transaction, So if you have 1 point per $ and you spend $1.50 on 2 separate occasions the points earned will be 2 not 3
⦁
 
Press “Save”
You can have more than one scheme running at the same time. So a customer could earn points for each order and for amount spent on that order
VIP Reward
Rewards are promotions. They are what you will be allowed to give to the customer depending on how many points they have or had previously.
⦁
 
Go to 
Back Office > Menu > Promotions >  
⦁
 
Add in the details of the reward
Coupon Name
 – This is a Friendly Description shown here only
Coupon Description 
–  Will show as the name of the button on the front end
Coupon Code (For Online Use) 
– This can be used for a discount when ordering online
Max Value
 – The maximum amount of money that can be discounted off the bill. For example, if you set this to 10 and had the discount be 50%. The most it would remove off the bill is $10. If you leave this blank then it does not apply
Can be used with other specials?
 – Whether or not this promotion can be used with other promotions
Requires manager override
 – Will the use of this promotion require a manager approval or not
Start Date 
– The date the Promotion will work from
End Date 
– The last date you will be allowed to apply this promotion. If you tick Does not expire then the promotion will work forever
 
Condition that must be met
Here is where you enter the amount of points needed to qualify for a reward.
You can either assign a promotion based on the points currently available or the total of all the points they have ever received. This is so you can reward loyalty over a longer period of time. 
For example, you could give a free coffee for every 20 points earned. Each time that reward is used the amount of available points will be reduced by 20, but the historical points will remain. You could have another reward that says once you get to 1000 points you get 15% off every coffee.
Keep in mind that legacy or historical points do not get reduced. If a customer needs 1000 points to get that 15% off then once they get to 1000 points they will always be eligible for that reward. 
 
This is the section where we set the actual reward itself. The customer can either receive 
 % discount off the whole bill
An amount of money removed from the bill
1 checked item for a definable percentage off
All checked items for a definable percentage off (They will only be able to get 1 of each selected item)
On the last 2 you can choose the menu items that the promotion is allowed to apply to. Allowing you to give away just a coffee but not a tea if you wanted
If you click on the blue link you will be able to choose 1 or more items
⦁
 
Click “
Submit
”
 
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterloyalty
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Understanding Price Levels

Overview
Price levels allow you to set up to 10 different prices for a Menu Item that you can use to be the price of that item from various parts of the system. For example, you can create a happy hour promotion that charges a particular price level from 7-8PM every day. Or you can discount a menu item to change it to a particular price level
Price levels can also be used when you have multiple sites. You can set the store to charge a specific price level for each of its items
When creating an item the price level will default to -1any promotions using price level of -1 will be ignored
Setting up from the Back Office
Price levels are set up in the Menu Item
Go to the 
Back Office
 > 
Menu
 > 
Menu Items
Choose a 
Menu Item
Under 
Price Levels
 you will see 10 price level entry boxes.  Change these to the amount you desire 
Save Item
Setting up from the Front End
Log onto the till
Go to 
Control Panel 
>
 Menu Management 
>
 Menu Items
Select a 
Menu Item
Under 
Price Levels
 you will see 10 price level entry boxes.  Change these to the amount you desire 
Press Save
Auto Price / Auto Fill Price
If you press this button from the front end or the back office it will automatically fill out the price levels for you based on the options set in the back office. 
Go to 
Back
 
Office
  > 
Menu
 > 
Price
 
Levels
Here you can change several things.
Price
 
Level
 
Name
 – What you want the price level to be called. This will change the name as it is displayed in the 2 pictures above
Pre
 
Text
 – The name of the abbreviation
Auto
 
Price
 – The amount that will be added to the items base price for that price level
Pricing
 
Type
 – Either percentage or a monetary amount
Make a selection for the auto price. If the price of the item is 1.50 and you have the auto price for price level 1 set to 1.00 and the pricing type set to “Total Adjustment” then when you press “Auto Fill Prices” it will set price level 1 for the item to be 2.50. That is the original price of 1.50 + the Auto Price setting of 1.00
If the pricing type is set to percentage then it would set price level 1 of the item to be 1% higher than the price of the item
Save the item
Go back to the Item Edit page and press the button to auto update the price levels.
Multi Item Edit
The above instructions will work fine when you want to edit 1 Menu Item at a time, but what if you want to update more than 1 Item?
That’s where multi Item Edit comes in
On the 
Back
 
Office
 go to 
Menu
 > 
Multi
 
Item
 
Edit 
and look for Price Level Adjustment
Use the options on the left to make a selection of Menu Items you wish to update
Choose a price level from the list
Enter an amount
 
Choose 
Value
 or 
Percentage
 
Click on 
Update
Changes or suggestions can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterpl
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Overview of Promotions

Promotions
 allow you to either automatically or manually apply a discount. either to the whole bill or to particular items.
Promotions
 can be configured in the 
Back Office
 under the 
Menu 
tab.
Types Of Promotions
Standard Promotions
 (Also known as "
Promotion
") – This is a promotion that you apply 
manually
 to a transaction and is intended as a standard marketing promotion, such as Buy one get one free,  spend $30 and get a free drink or 20% off your Bill
Examples of a standard 
Promotion:
Employee Discount
Military Discount
Buy One Get One Free
Price Level Promotion 
– Creates a promotion that will change the price of an item during a 
specific time frame
. 
Examples of a Price Level Promotion:
Happy Hour
VIP Reward
 – creates a promotion for use with our VIP /loyalty program. Customers accrue points and those points qualify them for VIP rewards
Auto Promotion
 – This type of promotion is applied automatically as the items are rang though the till.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Creating A Price Level Promotion

Price Level Promotions
 apply automatically whenever a 
certain time threshold is reached
. The price of the items adjusts during that time. 
Example
: Happy hour would be a Price Level promotion since it adjusts the prices of items during a certain time of the day.
Note
: You'll need to have price levels setup. If you need information on setting up price levels, visit this articles: 
Setting Up Price Levels
Promotions
 can be configured in the 
Back Office
 under the 
Menu 
tab.
Select "
Price Level Promo
" from the drop down and then click on "
Build Promotion
" to create a new promotion.
On the following screen, you'll be given the Promotion's options.
Promotion Name
 – This will show on screen when selecting the promotion to be used
Promotion Description
 – This will show below the name when choosing the promotion
Price Level
– This will be the Price Level used when the promotion applies
Discount Uses Loyalty
 – If set to yes then the discount will be applied using loyalty
Loyalty Cost
 - How much of loyalty points will be used
Start Date
 – The date the promotion will start
End Date 
– The date the promotion will end. The promotion will be available till the end of this day
Does Not Expire
 – If this box is ticked then the start and end date are ignored and the promotion will not expire
Order Methods: 
Specify which order types that will have the price level promotion applied.
Limit Terminals
 - Specify which terminals will have the price level promotion applied.
Items Included
Checkmark all items that will be adjusted during the price level promotion period.
Example
: If you're setting up happy hour, you'd select all drinks.
Once you have the promotion configured, click "
Submit
" at the bottom to save it.
 
This promotion will be applied automatically and will be visible whenever you add items to the order during the promotion period. 
The Item will show with the Price Level Abbreviation next to it
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Creating A Promotion

Promotions
 allow you to manually apply a discount. either to the whole bill or to particular items.
 
Promotions
 can be configured in the 
Back Office
 under the 
Menu
 tab.
 
Click on "
Build Promotion
" to create a new promotion.
On the following screen, you'll be given the Promotion's options.
 
Promotion Name
 – This will show on screen when selecting the promotion to be used
Promotion Description
 – This will show below the name when choosing the promotion
Promotion Code (Online Ordering)
 – This is the code that would be entered to enable the offer to be used online
Promotion Category
 – Choose from a list of categories that you can manually add from the promotions screen
Max Value
 – This is the maximum value the promotion can give as a discount.
For example if you set the promotions to give 20% off and the bill came to $100 then that will give a $20 discount. However, if  you set the max value to $10 then then applying this promotion will only take $10 off the bill.
Leave blank to say there is no max value
Can Be Used With Other Specials
 – If set to no then this promotion will not apply if there is already a promotion added to the check.
Requires Manager Override
 – If set to yes then an override prompt will appear when the promotion is applied. The privilege “Override Coupons”
Can Be Used Multiple Times
 – Determines if you can use the promotion once or more than once
Discount Is Taxable
 – If set to yes then the tax will be calculated using the pre discount amount.
Discount Uses Loyalty 
– If set to yes then the discount will be applied using loyalty
Loyalty Cost 
- How much of loyalty points will be used
 
 
Start Date 
– The date the promotion will start
End Date
 – The date the promotion will end. The promotion will be available till the end of this day
Does Not Expire 
– If this box is ticked then the start and end date are ignored and the promotion will not expire
Day Start And End Times
 –This allows you to set the promotions availability for each day of the week.
 
Condition That Must Be Met
This is where you set what has to happen for the promotion to be available.
 
Enter the amount that the customer must spend to earn reward:
This is a $ amount that the customer must spend to earn the reward.
Example:
 If you had a promotion for a free drink with every $50 spent then you would set this to 50
If you want the promotion to be available all the time then set this to 0 (zero)
Customer must buy x of the checked items to earn reward:
Here you can check 1 or more items. The customer must buy a certain quantity of items in order to earn the reward.
Example:
 You could have a buy a drink get any other drink free. If that was the case then you tick all of the drinks in the offer
Customer must buy all of the checked items to earn reward
This is similar to above but requires you to buy all of the items checked to qualify
Customer must buy all of the checked items to earn reward:
Here you can check 1 or more items. The customer buys all of the checked items to earn the reward.
Example:
 If a customer buys a burger, fry, and a drink, you could have a reward set up to discount it for 15%.
 
Reward That Will Be Given
This is the reward given when the condition is met
 
Customer will get x percentage discount
 – The amount entered here will be the percentage of discount applied to the whole check
Server will be prompted for a percentage amount when used
 – Whenever a promotion is used, a pop up box will ask for the percentage amount that should be applied as a discount for the whole check
Customer will get $ discount
 – This will remove the dollar amount defined here from the check
Server will be prompted for a dollar amount when used
 – Whenever a promotion is used, a pop up box will ask for the amount of money that should be removed from the check
Customer will get 1 of the checked items at % off
 – This will give a definable percentage discount off one of the checked items in the list
Customer will get all of the checked items at % off
 – This will give the defined percentage off all of the checked items in the list
 
Once you have the promotion configured, click "
Submit
" at the bottom to save it.
The promotion will be accessible using the "
Add Promotion
" button in 
Order Functions
 
 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Bump Bar Setup

Once you have the bump bar plugged in, use the link below to download the program used to program the keys.
https://drive.google.com/file/d/16Mfr_GU_rr2jLc4Jbrb3n6OjHSd92aCK/view?usp=sharing
First thing you do is go to Configurations at the top and hit "
Read from KB
"
Make sure the right keyboard model is selected
This will automatically map the pre-defined keyboard macros to the buttons.
If you wish to edit these key binds, click on one of the K0# slots and replace the Key Content. After doing that, go back to configuration and select "
Write into KB
"
After assigning these key binds, open the KDS and navigate to 
Advanced 
> 
Station Options
 > 
Additional KDS Bump Bar Keys
Assign the keys to the KDS buttons from the bump bar
. 
Example, if K01 is assigned to "B" on the keyboard, select "B" in the Bump (B) dropdown.
After assigning the keys, restart the KDS for these changes to take effect.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Setting Up the Kitchen Display System (KDS)

Setting Up Your Kitchen Display System (KDS)
  
KDS setup may seem daunting, but with these clear steps and visuals, you'll be up and running in no time. Let’s get started!
Step-by-Step Instructions
  
1. Opening the KDS Application
  
Navigate to the 
OCPOS
 folder.
Open 
KDS.exe
.
2. License Code
  
If prompted, enter your license code to set up the database connection.
3. Configuration
  
Click on the 
Configure
 button located at the top right of the screen.
Switch between 
Basic
 and 
Advanced
 tabs to access various settings.
4. Advanced Configuration
  
Click the 
Advanced
 tab.
Select 
Diagnostics
.
enter your server computer name or ip and the database name.
Example: 
Sever: PIZZAZIA-SVR\OCSERVER
Database: ocpos_pizzazia
5. Adding a Station
  
Switch back to the 
Basic
 tab.
Select 
Stations
 from the left menu.
Click 
Add
 to include a new station. The system will name it "
New Statio
n" by default.
Select the new station and click 
Edit
 to modify its settings.
6. Configuring Station Views
  
Select 
Station Views
 from the left menu.
Choose a view from the list and click 
Edit
.
Under 
Allowed
, select the view you want to associate with the new station.
Customizing Your KDS
  
1. Color Palettes
  
Navigate to 
Color Palettes
 under the 
Configure
 menu.
Customize the following colors to match your preferences:
Header
Item
Modifier
Footer
Border
2. Ticket Views
  
Go to 
Ticket Views
.
Customize font sizes and colors for each section of the ticket to ensure clarity.
Conclusion
  
And there you go! With these detailed instructions and visuals, you should have a fully functional KDS configured just the way you need. Happy cooking!
 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Adding Fingerprints

1.
 
Login
2.
 Select 
Functions
 from the top right corner
3.
 
Select 
Add Fingerprint
 from the 
Functions
 Menu.
4.
 
Select an Employee
 to add 
Fingerprints
 to. 
Select 
Continue
.
5.
 
Select 
Add New Print.
 
You can also edit employee information at this point.
6. 
Scan Employee Fingerprints. 
4 samples are required.
 
When finished editing, select 
Done.
Changes to this document can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterfp
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Void Transaction

Void Transaction
1.
 
Login
2.
 Select 
Functions
 from the top right corner
3. 
Select 
View Transactions
 from the 
Functions
 Menu.
3. 
Select
 Transaction
 from list and select 
View Transaction.
4. 
 Select 
Void Transaction
Select Yes on the next screen
Enter 
Reason
 and select 
Submit Reason
​
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercountervot
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Viewing Transactions

This report can be accessed from the 
Control Panel
. It will show all transactions that have been put through any terminal since the last End of Day was performed. 
You can see transactions prior to the last End of Day by using the 
Search Transaction
s button
The employee permission to view this report is called “
View Transactions
”
The amounts shown here are the actual amounts taken so will include tax if any has been applied
Status
 – Currently this can be either Account which means it has been paid using an account. Completed means it has been paid for with one of the usual payment methods. Voided means that the payment has been voided from the control panel and the sale has been canceled
Order ID
 – The Order ID is what is sent to the kitchen to link the printouts together. It also lilnks the invoices. If you split the order into 2 tickets then the invoice number will be different for each ticket but the order number will be the same you can see that they were part of the same order
Ticket
 - The ticket number paid on the order.
Invoice ID
 – The ID attached to the invoice. Each ticket is a different invoice so if you split the ticket into 2 tickets the order number will be the same but the invoice number will be different
Terminal 
– The terminal that settled the transaction
Method
 – The order method used
Customer 
– Customer name if available
Cashier
 – Name of the Cashier that settled the transaction
Date and Time
 – Date and time the transaction was settled
Total 
– How much the transaction was settled for
Searching for Transactions
In 
View Transactions 
Click 
Search Transactions 
and you will see the following screen.
You can use the various search criteria here to narrow the search for a specific transaction.
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Reprint Receipt

1.
 
Login
2.
 Select 
Functions
 from the top right corner
3. 
Select 
View Transactions
 from the 
Functions
 Menu.
3. 
Select
 Transaction
 from list and select 
View Transaction.
4. 
 Select 
Reprint Receipts
A receipt should be printed to the configured printer
Please reference this guide for any updates or changes: 
https://tinyurl.com/ocmanualp
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Issue Refund

You can issue a refund using the "
Issue Refund
" function in the control panel.
Note: You may be required to enter a manager override password.
On the Issue Refund screen, you'll see the following options
Type
: Payment method of the transaction being refunded. 
Cash, Credit, Check, and Gift Card are the options.
Tax Rate 1(2,3)
: Tax rate for the refund
Reason
: The reason for the reason.
Amount
: This is where you enter the amount of the refund. 
Issue Refund
: This will process the refund
Close
: This will return you to the control panel.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Credit Trans (Add Tips)

You can add tips using the 
"
Credit Trans (Add Tips
)"
 function in the control panel.
Once you're on the tips screen, you can add a tip to a transaction by selecting the transaction and clicking the "
Add Tip
" button.
Enter Tip Amount
Select 
Submit
 to add the tip
If you enter the wrong amount, you can select the transaction again to enter the correct amount.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Open Till

Open Till
1.
 
Login
2.
 Select 
Functions
 from the top right corner
3. 
Select 
Tills and Cashouts
 from the 
Functions
 Menu.
4. 
Select
 Open Till
 (
Till #2 Only Available with Dual Till
)
5. 
Select 
Till Amount
 and Verify 
Starting Funds
.
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterotill
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Open Cash Drawer (No Sale)

Overview
"
No Sale
" is a function that allows you to open the Cash Drawer without having to do a transaction. It can be found in the 
Control Panel
1.
 
Login
2.
 Select 
Functions
 from the top right corner
3. 
Select 
No Sale
 from the 
Functions
 Menu.
This will open your 
Cash Drawer.
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterfns
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Add/Remove Cashier On Till

1.
 
Login
2.
 Select 
Functions
 from the top right corner
3. 
Select 
Tills and Cashouts
 from the 
Functions
 Menu.
4. 
Select
 Add 
or 
Remove Cashier
If Removing a cashier, Select the Cashier from the list and select 
Remove Cashier
5.
 Select and 
Add User
*Users logged in are already added*
Please reference this guide for any updates or changes: 
https://tinyurl.com/ocmanualp
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Pay In & Pay Out

Pay In/Pay Out Creates a transaction to add/remove funds on a Till/Bank assigned to a User logged in.
1
.
 
Login
2.
 
Select 
Functions
 from the top right corn
er
3. 
Select 
Pay In & Pay Out
 from the 
Functions
 Menu.
4. 
Select Pay In Or Pay Out
 
5. 
Enter 
Amount
 and 
Reason
 
When done select 
Submit
 
6. Confirm information is correct
When done select 
Submit
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterpipo
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Front End Reports

Overview
Front end reports means report From the till
Reports
Functions > Reports
Today's Report? Need Api
Today’s Sales –
 Total sales made today (not Inc Tax)
Last Year’s Sales – 
The sales on this day last year
Difference from Last Year – 
The difference between last years sales and this years sales () around the figure means down from last year
Percentage – 
Difference from last year expressed as a percentage
Comps – 
The number of comps and the sum of all comps applied
Voids – 
The number of Voids and the sum of all Voids applied
Discounts – 
The number of Voids and the sum of all Voids applied
Number On Clock – 
The number of people who are clocked in
Employees On Clock – 
A list of all employees who are clocked in with the Job Title they are clocked in with
Hourly Sales – 
Any hours that have sales will be listed here with the number of sales and the total amount for the hour (Not inc Tax)
Quick Report
Functions > Quick Report
Quick report has the same information as the End of Day report. However, it can be printed before the tills and banks are closed so it is a very comprehensive report
See End of Day Report
Print Till Report
Functions > Tills and Cashouts > Print Till Report
This report is exactly the same as the report that prints when you close the Till but is the 
***Unofficial Copy***
Please See Till Report
Cashier Report
Functions > Tills and Cashouts > Cashier Report
Allows you to choose a cashier to run a Till report on. The information is exactly the same as the Closed till report but will run before closing the till and can be filtered to only show sales from particular employees. Also the ***Unofficial Copy***
See closed Till Report
Print Bank Report 
Functions > Tills and Cashouts > Print Bank Report
This report is the same as the report that prints when you close the bank which is called the Server Bank Report but it is the ***Unofficial Copy*** and can be printed before the bank is closed
See Server Bank Report
Server Bank Report
This report prints when you close the Bank. If you do not close the bank then the report will print when performing an End of Day. It is for an individual’s Bank. The server name will print on the top of the report
Transaction Totals
Any payment method that was used will show under this section with the totals taken using next to each payment type. For example
Cash Transactions
 – Sum of all transactions made to cash
Credit Transactions
 – Sum of all transactions made to Credit
Total Transactions 
– Sum of all transactions
Tip & Gratuity Totals
Any Tips or gratuity will be listed here split into how they were paid. For example 
Cash Tips 
– Sum of all Tips paid to Cash
Credit Gratuity
  - Sum of all gratuity paid to Credit
Total Tips
 – Sum of all Tips and Gratuity
Expected Totals
This section contains the expected totals for any payment method used whilst the Bank was open. For example
Expected Cash
 – Cash Transactions + Cash and Credit Tips – Total Tips (any tips are expected to be taken by the server in cash so are removed from the Expected Cash)
Expected Credit
 – Credit Transactions + any Credit Tips or Gratuity
Expected Total
 – The sum of all of the expected totals
Employee Stats
Discounts
 – Any Discounts applied by the employee
Comps
 – Any Comps applied by the employee
Pre Send Removals
 – Sum of any pre submit removals
Post Send Removals
 – Sum of any post send removals
Guests
 – The number of guests. There are settings to determine how guests are defined in back Office  >  Settings > POS > Guest Count Settings
Average Check
 – The total sales (Not Inc Tax) divided by the number of Checks/ Tickets
Category Sales
Will list all report categories with the sum of all sales for that category (Not Inc Tax)
Cash Totals
Expected Cash
 – The expected Cash inc Starting amount
Starting Funds
 – Back Office > Settings > Tills > Personal bank Settings there is a setting called Starting amount. If you turn this on then when you open a bank you will be asked to enter a starting amount. This amount will show in this field
Cash Deposit
 – Cash Expected Less the starting funds
Fee Groups
 - 
Total Cash Due – Total cash due from the employee’s personal bank
Till Report
Prints when you close the Till. If you do not close the till then it will print when performing an End Of Day
Starting Amount
 – The amount entered when opening the Till
Transaction Total 
– A list of all payment types will show here with the amount (Inc Tax) that was settled to that payment type. For example
Cash Transactions 
– The sum of all cash transactions
Credit Transactions
 – The sum of all Credit Transactions
Total Transactions
 – The sum of all transactions for all payment types
 
Tip and Gratuity Totals- Tips and gratuity will be listed here by Payment Type and be added together  ?? Tips appear to open their own bank even with banks turned off and they want to do deposit cash for the amount of the tip??
Total Tips
 – The sum of all Tips and Gratuity
Expected Totals
- The different payment types will be listed here. For example
Expected Cash
 – Cash Transactions minus Total Tips + Starting Amount – pay outs + pay ins
Expected Credit 
– Credit Transactions + Credit tips or gratuity
Expected Total 
– The sum of all the expected totals
Other Payments
Custom Payment Types will be listed here along with the amount paid to credit and gratuity (Inc Tax)
Employee Stats
Pay Ins
 – Sum of all Pay Ins
Pay Outs
 – Sum of all Pay Outs
Guests
 – There are settings that determine what constitutes a guest. Back Office > Settings > Pos > Guest Count Settings
On Account 
– The sum of all transactions settled to account
Discounts
 – Any Discounts added
Comps
 – Any Comps added
Pre Send Removals
 – The sum of all pre send removals
Post Send Removals
 – The sum of all post send removals
Average Check 
– Net sales divided by the number of Checks 
Category Sales
Any category that contains an Item that was sold will be listed here with the sum of all Items sold by category. (Not Inc Tax)
Employee Sale
List of all employees with their sales (Inc Tax)
Tax Code Sales
List of tax codes with sales and tax collected against each. For example
Default Taxrate Sales: $8.97
Default Tax Collected $0.60
Till/Bank Closeouts
Till/Bank Cash Total – ?? don’t know how to get this to populate. Tried declaring the bank before closing??
Cash Totals
Cash Expected
 – Cash Transactions minus Total Tips + Starting Amount
-Starting Funds
 – The amount you declared when opening the bank
+Till/Bank Closeout Cash
Cash Deposit
 – Cash Expected minus Starting Funds + Till/Bank Closeout Cash
Register Totals
Cash Deposit Total 
 = Cash Deposit from above
Pay Outs 
– The sum of all Paid Outs
Discounts 
– The sum of all discounts applied
Non Cash Deposit Total
 – The sum of all payment totals apart from cash and account
On Account
 – Any transactions settled to an account
Grand Total 
– Cash Deposit Total + Paid Outs +Discounts + Non Cash Deposit Total + On Account
 
Sales Totals
 – Sum of all sold items (Not Inc Tax)
+ Tax Collected
 – The sum of all tax collected
-Discounts 
– The sum of all discounts applied
+ Tip Discount
 - ?????
-On Account
 – Any Sales settled to account
+Pay Ins 
– The sum of all Pay Ins declared
-Pay Outs
 – The sum of all Pay Outs declared
+ Starting Cash 
– The amount used to open the till
Expected Total 
– The total expected based on the calculations from the sales total. Sales total + Tax Collected -Discounts + Tip Discount – On Account + Pay Ins – Pa Outs + Starting Cash
End Of Day Report
This report runs when you process an end of day. It is a comprehensive report of the day’s activities. There are other reports that are printed at the same time as the end of day report. These can be turned on or off in the settings. They will be listed separately
Gross Sales
 – Sum of all sales before discounts / comps and tax not including event deposits
Refunds
 – Any refunds issued
Discounts/Promos
– Any Discounts or promotions issued
Comps 
– Any Comps that were issued
Pay Ins 
– The sum of all pay Ins
Pay Outs 
– The sum of all Paid Outs
Fees Collected 
– 
On Account
 – Total of all transactions settled to account (inc Tax)
Adjusted Gross
 – Gross Sales -Refunds -Discounts -Comps +Pay Ins – Pay Outs – On account transactions and tips
Tax Collected
 – The sum of tax collected for all payment methods
Giftcards Sold 
– The amount is the sum of the value of all sold Gift Cards
On Account
 – Total of all transactions settled to account (inc Tax)
Pay Ins 
– The sum of all pay Ins
Pay Outs
 – The sum of all pay Outs
Net Sales
 – Uses Adjusted gross, removes tax and gift cards the adds back in the paid in/paid out  and on account transactions
Deposit Summary
Cash Trans 
– Total amount of cash sales (Inc Tax)
Cash Gratuity 
– Total amount of gratuity paid in cash 
Tips Collected 
– The total of any tips paid. Tips made to other payment methods will be taken out of cash to pay the server so will be a negative figure here. 
Pay Ins 
 – Sum of all Pay Ins using the pay in function
Pay Outs
 – Sum of all Pay Outs using the pay out function
Fees Collected
 – ????
Cash Gratuity
 – ??
Cash Refunds
 – Refunds made to cash
Cash Event Deposits
 – Deposits taken against events paid for in cash
Cash Deposit Expected
 – How much the system calculates you should have in cash to deposit in the safe. Cash Gratuity will be removed from this figure as it assumes you will have paid it to the server???
Credit Trans
 – Total amount of sales paid using credit (Inc Tax)
Online Credit trans 
– Transactions paid for through the mobile order site
Credit Tips 
– Tips paid using credit
Credit Refunds
 – Refunds made to Credit
Credit Event Deposits
 – Deposits taken against events paid for with Credit
Credit Deposit Expected
  = Credit Trans + Online Credit Trans + Credit Tips – Credit Refunds + Credit Event Deposits
Check Trans 
– Total amount of sales paid for using Checks (Inc Tax)
Check Tips 
– Tips paid using Checks
Check Refunds 
– Refunds made to Check
Check Event Deposits
 – Deposits taken against events paid for with a Check
Check Deposits Expected
 = Check Trans + Check Tips –Check Refunds + Check Event Deposits
Gift Card Trans
 - Total amount of sales paid for using Gift Cards (Inc Tax) 
Gift Card Tips
 - Tips paid using Gift Cards
Gift Card Refunds 
– Refund made to Gift Cards
Gift Card Event Deposits
 – Deposits taken against events paid for using Gift Cards
Gift Card Deposits Expected 
= Gift Card Trans +  Gift Card Tips -Gift Card Refunds + Gift Card Event Deposits
Other Payment Trans 
– Total sales paid for using custom payment methods (Inc Tax)
Other Tips
Other Payment Event Deposits 
– Deposits taken against events paid for using one of the custom payment methods
Other Payment Expected
 = Other Payment Trans + Other Payment Tips + Other Payment Deposits
Expected Deposits
 –
Event Deposits 
– Any money taken as a deposit against an event
Adj Gross
 – Expected Deposits -Event Deposits
Discounts 
– Any Discounts that have been applied in the form of promotions
Comps 
– The sum of all comps that have been appliled
Pay Ins
 – The sum of all Pay Ins
Pay Outs
 – The sum of all Pay Outs
On Account 
– All payments made using Account as a payment method
Fees Collected
Gross Sales 
– Adj Gross + Discounts + Comps -Pay Ins + Pay Outs + On Account + Fees Collected
Expected Deposit Total 
– The sum of all expected deposits
Deposit Adjustment
 – any varience from the till declaration
Actual Deposit Total 
– Expected Deposit Total + or – Deposit Adjustment
Accounts Invoiced-
 The sum of anything paid with account as the payment type
Giftcards Sold
 – All giftcards sold
Giftcards Redeemed 
– Anything that was paid with giftcard as the payment type
Voided Transactions 
– All transactions that were voided (Cancelled sales)
Refunds
 – The sum of all refunds
Table Orders 
– The sum of all orders made with this order method (Inc Tax)
Bar Orders 
– The sum of all orders made with this order method (Inc Tax)
Retail
 – The sum of all orders made with this order method (Inc Tax)
Takeout 
– The sum of all orders made with this order method (Inc Tax)
Delivery 
– The sum of all orders made with this order method (Inc Tax)
For Here
 – The sum of all orders made with this order method (Inc Tax)
To Go 
– The sum of all orders made with this order method (Inc Tax)
Drive Thru
 – The sum of all orders made with this order method (Inc Tax)
Account Payments
 – The sum of all orders made with this order method (Inc Tax)
Deposits
 – The sum of all orders made with this order method (Inc Tax)
Guests
 – There are settings that affect this figure. Back Office > Settings > Pos > Guest Count Settings
Transactions 
– The number of tickets. If you split an order into 2 tickets then both of the tickets will count towards this number
Payments 
– The Number of payments made 
Average Net Trans
 – Net sales divided by Number of tickets
Average Net Payment Trans
 – Net Sales divided by number of payments
Pre Submit Removals
 – Sum of pre submit removals
Post Submit Removals
 – Sum of Post submit removals
Other Payment Methods
Custom Payment Types will be listed here along with the gratuity. For example
Uber Eats
Uber Eats Gratuity
End Of Day Report
Shows all hours that had sales with the number of sales and the amount taken (Inc Tax)
End Of Day Category Trends
Shows all report categories that have sales with the sum of the sales for each category This will be the sale price of the items (likely not inc Tax)
Job Category Labor Report
The job categories will be listed here with the hours worked, labor cost and category percentage.
On Account Report
This report will list each invoice that was paid to account and any payments paid off the balance of an account
Employee Detail Comp Report
A list of all comps, who comped the item, how much the comp was for and the reason chosen when comping the item
If an override is required then the person mentioned here will be the person who authorized the override 
Pay In/Out Detail Report
Lists all pay in and pay outs with the name of the person who performed the pay out, The date and time it happened, the amount it was for and any notes if they were entered
If an override is required then the person mentioned here will be the person who authorized the override 
Manager Post Submit Removal Report
If an override is required then the person doing the override is considered a manager. These managers will be listed with the amount of removals and the total sale price for those items
Employee Post Submit Removal Report
This will list all of the employees that requested the post submit removal along with the amount of removals and the total sale price for those items
Pre Submit Removal Report
Each Employee will be listed here along with the amount of removals and the total sale price for those items
Coupon/Discount Report
A list of all Employees that have performed discounts will be shown with the amount of times a discount was applied and the sum of how much those discounts were worth
Pay In/Out Detail Report
A list of all comps, who comped the item, how much the comp was for and the reason chosen when comping the item
If an override is required then the person mentioned here will be the person who authorized the override 
Pay In/Out Detail Report
Lists the following for all pay in or pay out events
Date and time
The employee that initiated the pay in or pay out
The amount Pay out will be in parenthesis (14.50) where as paid in will not 14.50
The reason given
This is the last of the End of Day Reports
View Transactions
This report can be accessed from the control panel. It will show all transactions that have been put through any terminal since the last End of Day was performed. You can see transactions prior to the last 
The employee permission to view this report is called “
View Transactions
”
End of Day by using the 
Search Transaction
s button
The amounts shown here are the actual amounts taken so will include tax if any has been applied
Status
 – Currently this can be either Account which means it has been paid using an account. Completed means it has been paid for with one of the usual payment methods. Voided means that the payment has been voided from the control panel and the sale has been canceled
Order ID
 – The Order ID is what is sent to the kitchen to link the printouts together. It also lilnks the invoices. If you split the order into 2 tickets then the invoice number will be different for each ticket but the order number will be the same you can see that they were part of the same order
Ticket
 - 
Invoice ID
 – The ID attached to the invoice. Each ticket is a different invoice so if you split the ticket into 2 tickets the order number will be the same but the invoice number will be different
Terminal 
– The terminal that settled the transaction
Method
 – The order method used
Customer 
– Customer name if available
Cashier
 – Name of the Cashier that settled the transaction
Date and Time
 – Date and time the transaction was settled
Total 
– How much the transaction was settled for
Searching for Transactions
In 
View Transactions 
Click 
Search Transactions 
and you will see the following screen
You can use the various search criteria here to narrow the search for a specific transaction
Transaction Details
You get to this from 
Functions
 > 
View Transactions 
> Highlight the transaction and click on 
View Transactions
 This report shows all off the details from the transaction report and adds a list of the items that were ordered and how exactly the transaction was paid.
From here you can void the transaction or reprint a receipt if the customer lost theirs
Receipts/Tickets
This is a great report. It shows every ticket that has been sent to an order printer and allows you to reprint it
The employee privilege for this is called Kitchen Tickets
Time
 – When the ticket was printed
Printer
 – The name of the printer the ticket was sent to. This is the printers friendly name. The name that is used when setting up the printer in the print server. (little blue icon in the system tray) It is a good idea to call it something that easily identifies it. In this case it is called REC01 as it is the receipt printer for Till 1 but if that is also the coffee dispense you may want to call it coffee instead
Status
 – Tells you if the print was successful or not
Terminal
 – Which terminal sent the order
Ticket #
 - This is refered to on the actual ticket stub as REF#
Seq #
 - This number prints out on every ticket in the kitchen. It increases by one every time  ticket is printed. The idea is that if you get a ticket printer with Seq#4 then the next one is 6 you know you are missing number 5. In which case you go to this report. Find the printer in question (you can filter by printer on the drop down menu) find Seq#5 and reprint it.
You may also want to reprint the ticket if it is lost or damaged
Items on Receipt
 –A list of all items on the ticket with quantities and Prices 
Reprint Selected
 – Will reprint the selected ticket
Manage Stations 
–  Will present you with a list of the 10 printer stations. You can enable or disable each station from this location. This will stop any orders being printed to that station from any till.
Employee Control Panel
This report will show you open and closed orders by employee since the last End of Day
The employee privilege for this override is called Employee Control Panel
Drop down menu1
 – Allows you to filter the results by Job Titles
Drop Down Menu2
 – Allows you to filter the results by either Clocked In, Clocked out or All
Clock 
– Red or Green. Red is Not clocked it Green is clocked in
Name
 – Employee Name
Open Orders 
Time
 – Time the order was opened
Type
 – The Order Type. Table, For Here etc
#
 - Table number or Order ID
Section
 – Which Section the table is in
Name
 – The name of the customer for takeout and delivery orders
Closed Order
s
Time
 – Time the order was closed
Type 
– The Order Type. Table, For Here etc
# 
- Table Number or Order ID
Section
 – Which section the table is in
Name
 – The name of the customer for takeout and delivery orders
Invoice ID 
– Now the order has been paid it is assigned an invoice ID
If you click on one of the orders another windows will open with the order information
QTY
 – How many of that item there are
Name
 – The name of the Menu Item
Price 
–  This is the sale price
Employee
 – Employee Name
Time Added
 – The Time the Item was added to the order
Comps
Employee
 – The name of the employee who initiated the comp
Manager 
– The name of the employee who authorized the override
Item Name 
-Menu Item Name 
Amount
 – The amount that was comped
Time 
– Time the comp happened
Reason
 – Reason chosen by the employee
Removed Items
Removed items include both pre and post submit removals
Item_id 
– This related to the Item_id in the menu_items table in the OrderCounter database
Employee 
– Name of the employee who removed the item
Manager
 – Name of the employee who authorized the override
Amount
 – The sale price of the item that was removed
Time
 – Time the item was removed
Reason
 – Reason chosen when removing the item. 
Receipts / Tickets 
Gift Cards
Gift cards allows you to see 2 reports
Balance Inquiry will show you the current balance
History Inquiry Shows you the cards spending history and allows you to print that history
Please reference this guide for any updates or changes: 
https://tinyurl.com/ocmanualp
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Deposits

Overview
Deposits are sums of money that are taken against an event to be redeemed as a part payment at a later date.
 
Taking A Deposit
The deposit is taken from the Till.
1) 
Go to 
 > 
2)
 Press
 
3)
 Events are stored against customers. You either have to search for an existing customer using the search box, or type in details into the fields below it to create a new customer.
      Press "
Continue
" when done
      This takes you to the "
Event Information"
 screen.
 4)
 Fill in the details of the event the deposit is for. Add the Date of the booking, the time the booking is set for and when it is due to end. Add the number of guests and any notes you want to enter.
6)
 Press "
Save
" when done
The next stage is to add the deposit
After pressing save you will get the following screen
This is where you see a list of deposits or add a new deposit
7)
 Press "Add Deposit", then type in the amount that is being paid.
8)
 Press Done and this will take you to the screen where you settle the check. Settle the check as normal.
     
9)
 Press "
Done
"
Checking The Deposit Details
You are able to check on a deposit at any time.
      
1)
 From the till, Go 
 > 
            This is a list of every event you have
      
2)
 From the list of Events select 
The Event
 you want to view > 
      
3)
 You can then view or edit the details
            You are able to check on a deposit at any time. You can have more than 1 deposit against an event. To see a list of the deposits, click on "
Deposits
"
            Notice the 
status
                  Pending
                  Completed
                  Cancelled 
      These are set manually. After the deposit is redeemed it is a good idea to mark the event as completed.
      You can also add another deposit in the same way as before. You may want to do this if you have a deposit per person like you would with a Christmas Dinner.
      You are able to check on a deposit at any time.
Redeeming The Deposit
When the event is complete you will need to settle the check and redeem the deposit. 
      
1)
 On the pay screen go to 
 > 
      
2)
 You will be presented with a list of all deposits
      
      
3)
 Choose a deposit and select 
            The amount will now be deducted from the amount due.
      
4)
 Edit the event and change the status to "
Complete
"
Reports
Go to 
Back Office
 > 
Data Mining
 > 
Sales Reports 
> 
Redeemed Deposit Report
The report shows you the details of the deposits taken. If you click on the Invoice ID of any deposit, the full details of the check that the deposit was used for is displayed as it opens the Transaction Detail Report.
Operations report
The Deposits show under a few different sections of the Operations Report
For these examples I have $50 of Event deposits taken.
The deposit summary is all about how much money you should have to deposit into the bank. However, there is also a section for event deposits under each payment type
Cash Event Deposits
Credit Event Deposits
Check Event Deposits
Gift Card Event Deposits
Other Payment Event Deposits
Figures shown against these fields represent the money taken for a deposit. They will not show against sales yet as nothing has been sold. 
The expected deposit will also show the Event deposit amount as if you have taken $50 for an event, you need to be aware that it should be there and should be banked.
Once the deposit is redeemed it will show in the “
Redeemed
 
Event
 
Deposit
” field. 
You can also see the Event Deposits against the 
Expected
 and 
Actual
 Deposit totals
Lastly the “Tills And Banks” section will also show the Event deposits. This is because we physically took money, so that money is in the till, so it is in the till and bank report
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterd
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Adding Employee Cards

Overview
You are able to configure sign in cards to make logging in a little bit faster. Below is a guide for setting it up
Front End Setup
Navigate to 
Control Panel 
> 
Fingerprints
Select the employee you wish to add the card to and click "
Continue
"
Click "
Add Card
"
*Swipe the card when prompted*
Click "
Finish
" when done
Back End Setup
Alternatively, you can add the card via the Back Office.
Navigate to 
Employee
 > 
Employee Manager
 >
 Select Employee
 > 
Passwords
Click in the "
Password/Card Number
" text box
Swipe the card
 
When you swipe the card, the card number will appear in the text box
Click "
Add Password/Card
" when done
Click "
Save"
 when you're finished.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Batch / Settle

You can manually run your batch using the 
"Batch / Settle"
 function in the control panel.
Credit Card Batching 
is the process of submitting a group of credit card transactions for settlement, typically at the end of a business day.
The Batch/Settle but won't show unless the "
Allow Batch
" setting is enabled in the 
Terminal Settings
.
Once you click the 
Batch / Settle 
function, It'll  begin running the batch. At the end, you'll receive a batch report.
You may be prompted to enter in a manager override
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Transfer Table

Transferring the table is the process of moving an order from one table to another. The 
Transfer Table
 function in the 
Control Panel
 allows you to transfer all of the order items, modifiers, and promotions to a new table.
Manage Sections
Manage Sections is where you can see the Name, Number of tables, and Current Assigned Employee to that table. You can also add an employee to a table.
Transfer Selected Tables
Let's you choose an employee to transfer or assign the table to
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Today's Report

Today's report
 shows a detailed summary report of today's sales. You can access today's report from the 
Control Panel
.
Today’s Sales
 –
 Total sales made today.
Does not include tax
Last Year’s Sales
 – 
The sales on this day last year.
Difference from Last Year
 – 
The difference between last years sales and this years sales () around the figure means down from last year.
Percentage
 – 
Difference from last year expressed as a percentage.
Comps
 – 
The number of comps and the sum of all comps applied.
Voids
 – 
The number of Voids and the sum of all Voids applied.
Discounts
 – 
The number of Voids and the sum of all Voids applied.
Number On Clock
 – 
The number of people who are clocked in.
Employees On Clock
 – 
A list of all employees who are clocked in with the Job Title they are clocked in with.
Hourly Sales 
– 
Any hours that have sales will be listed here with the number of sales and the total amount for the hour.
Does not include tax
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Quick Report

Quick Report
 has the same information as the End of Day report. However, it can be printed before the tills and banks are closed so it is a very comprehensive report
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Terminal Settings

“
Terminal Settings”
 Are where settings specific to this terminal are located. Anything you change here will only affect the terminal you change it on.
Accessing “
Terminal Settings
” 
Open the 
Front End
Click on “
Terminal Settings
”
Enter a passcode with the correct access. 
You can allow an employee access to this area from 
Back Office
 > 
Employees
 > 
Privileges
 > Settings.
“
Retail
” - Determines if Retail orders can be processed at this terminal
“
Takeout
” - Determines if Takeout orders can be processed at this terminal
“
Delivery
” - Determines if Delivery orders can be processed at this terminal
“
Bar
 
Tab
” - Determines if Bar Tab orders can be processed at this terminal
“
Table
 
Service
” - Determines if Table orders can be processed at this terminal
“
For
 
Here
” - Determines if For Here orders can be processed at this terminal
“
To
 
Go
” - Determines if To Go orders can be processed at this terminal
“
Drive
 
Thru
” - Determines if Drive Thru orders can be processed at this terminal
“
Dual Drive Thru
”
If this is enabled then when you log in you will see 2 screens. This is so you can take and order and close an order at the same time.
“
Multi
 
Screen
” – This must be used in conjunction with Dual Drive Through and will show on 2 physical screens instead of 2 instances of the software showing on 1 screen
“
Till
” - If set to on then you will be required to have a cash draw for that till and open close the till at the beginning and end of your shift. If set to no then you will not be able to open the till and transactions processed using this till will not go to a cash draw. You can still use personal banks with till set to off
“
Tip Line
” - Removes the tip line from credit card receipts
“
Terminal Timeout
” - How long in mins before the user is automatically logged off
“
Card Login
” - This is an obsolete setting and will be removed shortly
“
First Category
” - Sets the category which will be visible when you first sign on
“
Table Section
” - Sets which table section will be selected when creating a new table order. Sections are added from c:\ocpos\ OCPOS - Table Service Admin.exe
“
Order
 
Start
” - Determines which type of order will be selected when logging in. For Here to Go etc. If you choose “None” it will go to the table screen. if you choose quick service it will need you to select if it is for here or to go.
“
Order
 
Style
” Used to switch between seat lead orders or ticket lead orders. If you select Seats then the numbers above the current ticket screen will represent seats. Each time you select a seat it will act like a filter, only showing you items on that seat. Any items you ring through after selecting the seat will be assigned to that seat. 
If you choose Tickets then it will show 2 buttons that you can use to increment the tickets and seat. There is no filter but anything you add will be added to the ticket or the seat currently shown on those buttons. 
 
“
Show
 
Tabs
” - Shows all bar tabs on the terminal. Large sites with multiple bars may not want to show tabs from every bar. Turning this off will only show bar tabs created at this terminal.
“
Stay on category
” - This will make the modifiers screen show up only if the modifiers are required. If they are not required it will stay in the category it started in.
“
Terminal Number
” - Sets what number this terminal is
“
Kitchen Selection
” – Sets how items get sent to the kitchen
On
 Will ask you what items you want to send when you press send order
OFF
 Will send all items, but only if you press the “
Send Order
” button
Auto 
if you leave the screen for any reason then all items on an order will be sent automatically
“
Pend Completed Orders
” - If this setting is on, drive thru orders that are closed out stay on the pending drive thru screen. This is useful for line busting drive thru with a tablet.
“
Time Clock Only
” - If turned on then the till turns into a Schedule Gofer time clock. You will no longer be able to use the till to ring in orders
“
Allow Checkout
” - This setting affects drive thru and determines whether orders can be paid at this terminal. Also added for tablets and line busting.
“
On Screen Keyboard
” - Enables or disables the on screen keyboard when you touch an area that requires text input
“
Post Send After Submit
” - If this is Yes, then this terminal will use “Item Submitted” setting on Item Removal Overrides, regardless of which setting Item Removal Overrides is set to.
“
Always Till
” - If Yes, tips will be assigned to the till (instead of personal banks) when using group till.
“
Dual Till
” - This is used when you have 2 cash draws assigned to the same till. Do not use this unless it is with an Epson printer.
“
Sign Off After Order
” - This is an override. If enabled then all orders will sign off when complete. If set to no then the employee privileges determine the behavior.
“
Show Totals
” - If set to Off then a show totals button will display instead of the running total for the check. The reason is that on lower spec machine this setting helps them run more quickly
“
Quick Sign In
” - Lets you choose from a list of people that are already signed in. You need to set “Quick Sign In” under Back Office > Employees > Job Manager to enable this 
“
Fast Cash / Credit
” - This puts the fast cash and fast credit buttons at the bottom of the screen when using the “
Bar
” 
Order
 
Method
“
KDS
” - If set to no then no items sent from this terminal will ever go to KDS, even if the items themselves are set to print to KDS.
“
KDS Guests
” Is whether the terminal prompts for number of guests in line after each order
“
7 Rooms Int
” – Used for integrating with 7 rooms
“
Allow EOD
” - If set to Off will remove the EOD button from the control Panel
“
Allow
 
Batch
” – Enables or disables the 
Control
 
Panel
 > “
Batch / Settle
” button
“
Receipt
 
Header
” - What is entered into this box will print on any receipt printed from this terminal
“
Stay on Sub Items
” – If set to off then when you are in a sub item menu and select a sub item, you will be returned to the item level above it. If set to on then after selecting a sub item you will stay within that sub item screen. 
“
Check for PCCharge
” - Checks to make sure PCCharge software is running in the background. PCCharge is no longer used as Verifone has stopped supporting it.
“
Check for OCPP
” - Checks for the OrderCounter Payment Server software is running in the background. If not, starts the OrderCounter Payment Server software. This software is used for non-EMV credit card processing.
“
Login Screen Logo
” - This is how you get the logo to show on the terminal login screen
“
Terminal Theme
” - You can choose from different themes which change the colors of the buttons
“
Enable Consolidation
” – Enabled the consolidation button. When pressed, Instead of showing 
1 x Bud
1 x Carling
1 x Bud
It would show
2 x Bud
1 x Carling
“
Consolidate on Print
” Determines if consolidation impacts printing. If enabled then when the items are sent, they will be consolidated on screen and on the printed kitchen ticket. 
Bar Close After Save Send
 – Determines if the user will be logged off after pressing “Save and Send” on a Bar order. This will override any other settings
“
Modifier Colors
” – If turned on then Modifier colors will be what you set them to. If turned off then all Modifiers will be the same color. The is a performance enhancing setting. 
Tablet Settings
These settings are intended for user with a tablet. They will make a screen appear when paying using credit.
Orientation
 – Decides if the screen shows in landscape or portrait
Show
 
Signature
 – Will show a signature screen to capture the customers signature
Show
 
Receipt
 
options
 – Will show options for email receipt, printed receipt or no receipt.  
Show
 T
ips
 – Enables the customer to enter a tip. Tip amount can be shown as a percentage or as a cash figure. 
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
tinyurl.com/ordercounterts
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Enable Quick Sign On

Overview
Quick Sign in is a way to sign in to the till by selecting from a list of already clocked in employees.
It is not secure but it is fast
The Set Up
To set this up you need to do the following
      
1)
 Go to 
Front End 
> 
Terminal Settings
 > Enter the passcode of an employee with the “Settings” privilege Set “
Quick Sign In
” to “
On”
      
2)
 Save
      
3)
 Restart the front end
      
4) 
Go to 
Back Office
 > 
Employees
 > 
Job Manager
      
5)
 Edit a job by clicking on the pencil icon
      
6)
 Make sure "
Quick Sign In
" is set to "
Yes
"
Using Quick Sign On
      
1)
 Clock in with a Job code that has Quick Sign In enabled
      
2)
 Sign in with your passcode
      
3)
 Log Off
      
4) 
You will now see a list with the employees name. Each employee that signs in will be added to the list (provided that they are clocked in with a job code that has quick sign in enabled)
Once the employee shows in the list you can simply click on the employee name to clock in as them
changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterqso
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Follow Me

Overview
This feature is intended for use on a busy bar and will allow you to log onto a till and automatically open the last tab you were editing. This way multiple people can use the till at the same time and you won't have to look for the bar tab.
The Set Up
Terminal Settings
 > 
Order start
 > Set this to “
Bar
”
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
POS
 > 
Reopen
 
Unsaved
 
Tabs
> Set this to “
Yes
”
Using The Feature
Now all you have to do is log on and start ringing through items. You can log off and when you log on again you will be asked if you would like to continue with the previous tab. Yes will open the tab you were using last. No will open a new tab. 
It says previously unsaved tab. But in reality it just means the last tab you were working on
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterfm
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Terminal Settings

“
Terminal Settings
” Are where settings specific to this terminal are located. Anything you change here will only affect the terminal you change it on.
Terminal settings can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Enable Retail Orders

To enable 
Retail Orders
, change the setting for 
Retail
 to "
ON
" in The Terminal Settings.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
The Retail Order Type will now be available.
For more information on 
Retail Orders
, visit this article 
Retail
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Enable Takeout Orders

To enable 
Takeout Orders
, change the setting for 
Takeout 
to "
ON
" in The Terminal Settings.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
The Takeout Order Type will now be available.
For more information on 
Takeout Orders
, visit this article 
Takeout
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Enable Delivery Orders

To enable 
Delivery Orders
, change the setting for 
Delivery 
to "
ON
" in The Terminal Settings.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
The Delivery Order Type will now be available.
For more information on 
Delivery Orders
, visit this article 
Delivery
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Enable Delivery Orders

To enable 
Delivery 
Orders
, change the setting for 
Delivery 
to "
ON
" in The Terminal Settings.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
The Delivery Order Type will now be available.
For more information on 
Delivery Orders
, visit this article 
Delivery
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Enable Bar Tabs

To enable 
Bar Tabs
, change the setting for 
Bar Tabs 
to "
ON
" in The Terminal Settings.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
Bar Tabs will now be available.
For more information on 
Bar Tabs
, visit this article 
Bar Tabs
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Enable Table Service

To enable 
Table Service
, change the setting for 
Table Service
 
to "
ON
" in The Terminal Settings.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
Table Service will now be available.
For more information on 
Table Service
, visit this article 
Table Service
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Enable For Here Orders

To enable 
Enable For Here Orders
, change the setting for 
For Here 
to "
ON
" in The Terminal Settings.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login scree
n.
For Here orders will now be available.
For more information on 
For Here
 visit this article 
For Here
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Enable To Go Orders

To enable
 To Go Orders
, change the setting for 
To Go
 
to "
ON
" in The Terminal Settings.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login scree
n.
To Go orders will now be available.
For more information on 
To Go
 visit this article 
To Go
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Enable Driv Thru Orders

To enable
 
Driv Thru Orders
, change the setting for 
Driv Thru 
to "
ON
" in The Terminal Settings.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
Driv Thru orders will now be available.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Dual Driv Thru

With 
Dual Driv Thru 
enabled, you'll see 2 screen when you login in. This is so you can take an order and close an order at the same time.
Dual Driv Thru 
can be 
enabled 
or 
disabled 
in the 
Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Multi Screen

This setting works with the 
Dual Driv Thru 
setting. This will show on 2 physicals screens instead of the software showing on one screen. 
Multi Screen 
can be 
enabled 
or 
disabled 
in the 
Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Enabling Tills

If the 
Till 
setting is set to "
ON
" then you will be required to have a cash draw for that till and open close the till at the beginning and end of your shift. If set to "
OFF
" then you will not be able to open the till and transactions processed using this till will not go to a cash draw.
 
You can still use personal banks with till set to off
Tills 
can be 
enabled 
or 
disabled 
in the 
Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Tip Line

The "
Tip Line
" setting adds or removes the tip line from 
credit card receipts.
Tip Line 
can be 
enabled 
or 
disabled 
in the 
Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Terminal Timeout

This setting is in control of how long the user is signed in without any activity on the terminal. The user will automatically be signed out.
This time is measured in minutes.
Terminal Timeout
 can be configured in the
 Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Card Login

The "
Card Login
" setting allows for the user of card logins. 
Card Login 
can be 
enabled 
or 
disabled 
in the
 Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: First Category

The 
First Category 
settings determines which menu category will be visible when you first sign on and take an order.
First Category
 
can be configured in the
 Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Table Section

Determine which table section will be selected when creating a new table order.
Selections are added from the Table Service Admin
Table Sections 
can be configured in the
 Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Changing the default Order Type on startup

Determine which type of order will be selected when logging in. For Here to Go etc.
If you choose “None” it will go to the table screen. if you choose quick service it will need you to select if it is for here or to go.
Table Sections 
can be configured in the
 Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: How to change Order Styles

Used to switch between seat lead orders or ticket lead orders. 
If you select Seats then the numbers above the current ticket screen will represent seats.
Each time you select a seat it will act like a filter, only showing you items on that seat.
Any items you ring through after selecting the seat will be assigned to that seat.
           
If you choose Tickets then it will show 2 buttons that you can use to increment the tickets and seat. 
There is no filter but anything you add will be added to the ticket or the seat currently shown on those buttons.
Order Style 
can be configured in the
 Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Show Bar Tabs on all terminals

Shows all bar tabs on the terminal.
Large sites with multiple bars may not want to show tabs from every bar.
Turning this off will only show bar tabs created at this terminal.
Show Tabs
 can be configured in the 
Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Stay On Category

This will make the modifiers screen show up only if the modifiers are required. If they are not required it will stay in the category it started in.
 
Stay On Category
 can be 
enabled
 or 
disabled
 in the 
Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Kitchen Selection

Sets how items get sent to the kitchen.
On
 - Will ask you what items you want to send when you press send order
Off
 - Will send all items, but only if you press the “
Send Order
” button
Auto - 
 Leaving the screen for any reason then all items on an order will be sent automatically
Kitchen Selection 
can be configured in the 
Terminal Settings
.
​
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Pend Completed Orders

If this setting is on, drive thru orders that are closed out stay on the pending drive thru screen.
This is useful for line busting drive thru with a tablet.
Pend Completed Orders
 
can be 
enabled 
or
 disabled 
in the 
Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: How to enable Schedule Gofer (Time Clock)

If turned on then the till turns into a Schedule Gofer time clock. You will no longer be able to use the till to ring in orders.
You will no longer be able to use the till to ring in orders
Time Clock Only 
can be 
enabled 
or
 disabled 
in the 
Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: How to Allow Checkout for Drive Thru Terminals & Tablets

This setting affects drive thru and determines whether orders can be paid at this terminal.
Also added for tablets and line busting.
Allow Checkout 
can be 
enabled 
or
 disabled 
in the 
Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Enabling the On Screen Keyboard

Enables or disables the on screen keyboard when you touch an area that requires text input.
​
On Screen Keyboard 
can be 
enabled 
or
 disabled 
in the 
Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Post Send After Submit

If this is Yes, then this terminal will use “
Item Submitted
” setting on 
Item Removal Overrides
, regardless of which setting 
Item Removal Overrides
 is set to.
​
​
On Screen Keyboard 
can be 
enabled 
or
 disabled 
in the 
Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Always Till

 If On, tips will be assigned to the till when using group till.
On Screen Keyboard 
can be 
enabled 
or
 disabled 
in the 
Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Setting up Dual Tills

This is used when you have 2 cash draws assigned to the same till. 
Do not use this unless it is with an Epson printer.
On Screen Keyboard 
can be 
enabled 
or
 disabled 
in the 
Terminal Settings
.
Terminal settings
 can be accessed using the "
Terminal Settings
" button on the login screen.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Inventory Batching

Overview
Batching is a way to take some Products and use them to create something new that you sell. For instance, a cake. You would take your inventory products of flour eggs sugar and butter to form a batch called cake which you would sell. Each time you create a batch it takes the relevant amount of products from inventory and adds an inventory amount to the product called cake. 
When you sell the cake then it will also be removed from inventory. 
Batch Inventory
For the setup example we will use spicy mayo.
Go into the 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Inventory
 > and create 2 new products called “
Mayo
” and “
Sriracha
”
To keep thigs simple, have all the product units as Fluid Ounce
Now create a third product called “
Spicy Mayo Batch
”. 
This is the product that will be created when you mix the Mayo and Siracha together. The ingredients are costed at $1 per Fl oz so the batch will also cost $1 per Fl oz. you will have to calculate the proper cost of the batch depending on the batch recipe and item cost 
 
It is a good idea to create a supplier called “
Internal batch
” for this product
Next, we need to create a batch item. This is a special item type that you will sell to tell the system that you have made a batch.
Go to the Front End
 > 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Menu
 
Items
 > 
Click on the category where you want the batch item 
>
 Click on an empty space
It is good practice to create a new category for the batching on one of the screens you do not normally use. You can then keep all of the batch items in one place and not sell them accidently. 
Tick the box
 labeled 
Batch Inventory
This will remove lots of the options from the item 
Enter “
Spicy Mayo Batch
” for the name
Choose an inventory Item
. This is the inventory product that will have a positive inventory adjustment when this batch item is sold.  In our case “
Spicy Mayo Batch
”
Choose a 
Unit
 and an 
Amount
. This is how much will be added to the Inventory Item/Product each time a batch is made. I have chosen 10 Fluid Ounces. 
Save
Next we need to create a recipe for the Batch so the system knows how much of what product to remove from inventory when the batch is made.
Go to 
Inventory
  > 
Setup
 > 
Item
 
Recipes > 
Find
 Spicy Mayo Batch 
> Click on the 
Pencil
 
Icon
 to edit >
Enter the amount that will be removed from Inventory when a batch is created. I have chosen 8oz of mayo and 2oz siracha
Create a Menu Item
 for the finished product. 
Not
 the spicy mayo batch, just “
Spicy Mayo
”. Then add the inventory product of “Spicy Mayo Batch” in the recipe for “Spicy Mayo)
When you make a batch of spicy mayo you need to put that batch through the till to make the proper adjustments to the inventory. 
Create an order
 > 
Add Spicy Mayo Batch
 to the order > 
check out
 as normal
If you run a calculate on hand you will now see the spicy mayo batch has been increased whilst the mayo and Sriracha have decreased
When you sell a batch and run “Calculate on Hand” the system will create a purchase order for the batch
You can see this purchase order in 
Data
 
Mining
 >  
Inventory
 
Reports
 > 
Purchase
 
Order
 
Report
Finally when you sell the Spicy Mayo product it will decrease the Spicy Mayo Batch. 
When you create the batch it takes all of the items needed to make that batch out of inventory. If you do not manage to sell the product created from the batch before it goes out of date then you will have to waste it as you would normally
Quick Reference Instructions
The 
Menu Item
 which is sold to create a Batch is called “
Spicy mayo Batch
”
The 
Sale Item
 to sell the product created once the batch is made is called “
Spicy Mayo
”
The 
Inventory Product
 which represents the Batch is called “
Spicy Mayo Batch
”
The 
Inventory Products
 which go in to making the batch are called “
Mayo
” and “
sriracha
”
Create a supplier
 called “
Internal Batch
”
Create a category
 called “
Batching
” on an unused category screen
Create Inventory Products
 for the ingredients within the batch (Mayo and sriracha)
Create an Inventory Product 
for the actual Batch (Spicy Mayo Batch)
Create a Menu Item for the batch itself
 in the Batching category. (This is what will be sold so create the batch) Special Item type of Batch Inventory) Link this to the Batching Product of Spicy Mayo Batch. Set the amount that will be added to the batching product when the batch is made
Create a Menu Item to sell the product created when the batch is made
 “Spicy Mayo” Use the “Internal Batch”
Create a recipe
 
for the batch itself
. Create the recipe on the Menu Item of “Spicy Mayo Batch” the recipe products will be Mayo and Sriracha
Create a recipe for the Item that sells the product you create when you make the batch
. Create the recipe on the Menu Item of “Spicy Mayo”, the Inventory Products in the recipe will be “Spicy Mayo Batch”
Selling Spicy Mayo Batch will remove inventory from “Mayo” and “Sriracha” whilst adding inventory to the “Spicy Mayo Batch” product
Selling Spicy Mayo will remove inventory from “Spicy Mayo Batch”
When you create the batch it takes all of the items needed to make that batch out of inventory. If you do not manage to sell the product created from the batch before it goes out of date then you will have to waste it as you would normally
you would normally
Changes or suggestions can be made here:
 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterib
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Barcode Overrides

In this example, the concept of inventory management is illustrated using bottles of beer as inventory items. The scenario involves two types of products: individual bottles of beer and 6-packs of beer. Each product has a unique barcode to identify it.
To efficiently manage these items, the inventory system allows for a clever setup: Instead of treating the 6-pack as a separate item, it is linked to the individual bottles by setting its quantity as 6 of the same item. However, the 6-pack is assigned a different price from the individual bottle.
This setup benefits businesses that both sell 6-packs of beer and also break them down to sell individual bottles. By using this approach, they can keep a single inventory item for beer and adjust its quantity and price accordingly. This simplifies the inventory tracking process and ensures accurate stock management, making it easier for the business to handle both types of sales efficiently.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Setting Up Units In Inventory

"
Setup Units
" is where the units of measure are set. For example, units of measure would be militias, gallons, ounces, etc. Most units will be in here already but if you need to you can setup additional units of measure.
Setup Units
 can be found in the
 Inventory 
tab. 
Inventory
 can be accessed in the 
Back Office
 under the "
Inventory
" tab.
There are 3 sections. 
Liquid Volume
, 
Dry Volume 
and 
Quantity
Liquid Volume
Dry Volume
 
Quantity 
 
 
Unit Name
 - Name of the measurement unit.
Abbreviation
 - Abbreviation of the unit.
Amount (Fluid Ounces)
 - This number represents how many times 1 fluid ounce fits into the unit
. 
This is very important
​
The system will allow you to purchase in one measurement and sell in another, as long as the measurements are in the same group. 
This means that the system needs to know how to convert one measurement into another. It does this by using the Amount (Fluid Ounces) number.
Fluid ounces is the default unit. There is one fluid ounce in a fluid ounce. Where as there are 16 fluid ounces in in a pint. 
Creating a Custom Unit
Choose either 
Liquid
, 
Dry
, or 
Quantity
. 
Enter a Unit Name and an abbreviation into the relevant boxes.
Add how many fluid ounces are in this measure and click on "
Add
" The new unit will now show in the list. 
When adding a 
Quantity
, quantities are multiples of 1.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Setting Up Inventory Suppliers

Setting up suppliers is the next step after setting up units. 
Visit this article here for information on setting up units. 
Setting Up Units In Inventory
Suppliers can be setup in the 
Back Office
 in the 
Inventory
 Tab under 
Setup
.
 
Adding A New Supplier.
 
To add a new supplier, click on "
Add New
" 
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Configuring Product Departments and Product Types

You can configure 
Product Departments/Types 
in the 
Departments/Types
 section of the 
Inventory
 tab. 
 
Product Departments
These are likely to be Dry, Wet, Retail, or Other. 
You count stock by the product departments.
To add a 
Product Department
, enter a 
Department
 name and click "
Add Department
"
Product Types
These can be seen in the same area. They are how you group your individual items such as wine, beer, chicken, frozen food.
Product types are for reporting purposes.
To add a 
Product Department
, enter a 
Department
 name and click "
Add Department
"
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Adding & Editing Products

Products can be configured in the 
Add/Edit Products
 section in the
 Inventory
 tab under 
Setup
. 
 
Search Products
This section sorts through all products via the specified filters (
Product Department
, 
Product Type
, 
Product Supplier
, etc)
Adding Products
Click on "
Add New
" to add a new product.
Product name
 - The name of the product
Product Receiving Unit
 – How you will purchase / deliver the product
Product Count Unit
 - What you will count the product in 
Product Report Unit
 - What you want to see on your reports.
Normally will be the same as the count unit
Product Recipe
 
Unit
 - What unit you will use for taking the item out of inventory. 
Normally the smallest unit. If you purchase a barrel you would recipe in ounces or pints
Product cost
 > The cost of each “
Product Receiving Unit”
Product Department
 > Inventory is counted by Department. 
If you add this to a department of “
Dry
” then when you count your “
Dry
” inventory this product will be included in that inventory
Product Type
 - used for reporting
Product stock number
 – Optional. This is an internal reference for this product. Products can have multiple suppliers and each supplier may have their own stock number. This one is unique to the product
Sales Item
 - If “
Yes
” is selected then the system will allow you to sell the item by searching or scanning without you creating a Sales Item. But it will not create a button
Less Than() Remaining
 - The reorder point. If product gets below this point it will show in the ordering section in red
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Item Recipes

To take 
Products
 or a part of that 
product
 out of 
Inventory
 the 
product
 needs to be part of a 
Recipe. 
Inside of recipes, products are referred to as “
Ingredients
”
Item Recipes
 can be configured in the 
Back Office
 in the 
Inventory
 Tab under 
Setup
.
Scroll through the list to find the item you want to add the ingredients to.
If you press Ctrl + F, you can enter in the name of the item and find it faster.
The number is how many 
Ingredients
 are in the recipe for that 
Menu
 
Item
Click on the pencil icon for the sale item you want to add a recipe to.
 
This will take you to a section where you can add ingredients or choose another item and copy its recipe 
The ingredient will now show in the list. Choose a Unit from the drop-down box then choose an Amount which is a multiplication of that unit. The options for the unit are determined by what was chosen in the Product when it was set up. Once a product is set you cannot change the unit type. If you made a mistake and want to use Quantity instead if Liquid volume you would need to delete the product and create a new one. 
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Option Recipes

Options
 are another name for 
Modifiers
.
Some 
Menu
 
Items
 have 
Modifiers
.
If you sell a burger it may come with a choice of sides. These choices could be in a 
Modifier
 
Group
 which are attached to the 
Menu
 
Item
. 
You know what is in the burger and you are able to create a recipe for it. But you do not know what 
Modifier
 the customer will choose as a side so there is no way to add it to the 
Recipe
 for the 
Menu
 
Item
. This is where 
Option
 
Recipes
 come in. 
Option Recipes 
can be configured in the 
Back Office
 in the 
Inventory
 Tab under 
Setup
.
If you edit the recipe for any Menu Item that has Modifiers you will see the modifiers already listed in the Recipe.
After the Option Recipe is entered, this area will be populated automatically in any Menu Item that used that Modifier Group
This saves you from editing the Recipe of every Menu Item. 
Inventory will only be affected when that Modifier is chosen.
You can filter by the Modifier Sets or by the Category that the Menu Item that contains the Modifier Set belongs to. The Modifiers are set into Modifiers and Stand alone Modifiers
Set Name - 
The name of the 
Modifier
 
Group
Category Name
 – The name of the 
Category
 the 
Menu
 
Item
 that uses the 
Modifier
 belongs to
Modifier Name
 – The name of the 
Modifier
# Products in Recipe
 – Is the number of Ingredients contained in the 
Recipe
 for that 
Modifier
Once you've found the modifier click on the 
Pencil Icon
 to go the edit screen.
Choose an Ingredient from the drop-down box and click 
Repeat this step until all Ingredients have been added. 
Enter an Amount and choose a Unit for each Ingredient in the Recipe.
After all of the information has been entered select. 
You can also choose to use the Same Recipe as another item.
You can also choose to use the Same Recipe as another item
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Simple Item Recipe List

These are suitable if you order in the lowest quantity you would use to sell in and there is only one item in the recipe
You choose the inventory item which is already linked to the quantity that Product is purchases / Delivered in. 
Then you choose an amount which is a multiplication of the inventory item size
Example
: If you had beers which you purchase as individuals you could then set the amount in the simple item recipe to one.
If they come in a package of twenty four, you could set the 
Product Receiving unit
 to be a package of one and when you do your purchase order choose package of twenty four from the list. Although the default will be package of one. That way you can use the amount of one in the Recipe
Simple Item Recipe Lists 
can be configured in the 
Back Office
 in the 
Inventory
 Tab under 
Setup
.
You can use a decimal value in the amount field instead but this means doing a calculation for each product
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Recipes & Deleted Products

In the 
Back Office
 in the 
Inventory
 Tab, if you click 
Add/Edit Products
, you can delete a product by clicking on the 
In this example the product of “
Bud Bottle
” is in the Recipe of “
Budweiser
” I am able to replace the Product in every Recipe it is in by selecting a new Product from the drop-down box
This will list all other Products that use the same Unit. If you delete a Product that uses Quantity then you can replace it with any other Product that also uses Quantity. But products that use Liquid Volume or Dry Volume will not appear.
If you choose not to do so then the Product will be deleted but the Ingredient will still exist in the Recipe which is a problem.
To check to see if you have any orphaned products in recipes you can go to 
Back Office
 > 
Inventory 
> 
Setup
 > 
Recipes & Del. Products
Here you can see a list of all Item and Option Recipes that have deleted Products.
If you click on the Pencil icon you are taken to the edit page for that Recipe where you can change the Ingredients.
If for example you have a particular vodka in all of you cocktails and you are changing the vodka that you use you would do the following.
Create the new Vodka product and keep the units the same
Delete the old Product
Choose the new product from the list to replace it
Now all recipes that used the old vodka will use the new one.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Edit Retail Item List

Retail items are also known as Inventory Items. These are Menu Items that you set up from Menu Management.
You can choose Inventory Items as the Menu Item Type when creating Menu Items in the 
Back Office
When you choose to make the Menu item an Inventory Item you get a few extra options
These options relate to the Product. A new product will be created for each Inventory Item. The Unit chosen here will become the Delivery Unit
When you save the new Item, a Recipe will be created linking the Inventory Item to the Product and one will be input as the amount to be taken out of inventory.
Inventory Items are intended for retail and save you time when creating Items as you can create the Product and recipe at the same time. Normally inventory items are sold as a package of 1. Such as a drink, some gum, packet of chips etc.
It does not add everything about the product. It assumes the other unit amounts are package of 1 and it does not add the supplier or reorder amount for you. 
If you have any 
Retail Items
 you will see them in this section. You are able to change the price of the item the Barcode and the Tax Code without having to go into each Item Individually
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: When Are Items/Products Removed From Inventory

If I sell a burger and that burger has a recipe of one patty and one Bun then when do those products get removed from Inventory?
The answer is 
When the Item is sold
The Item has to be on the ticket when the check is paid or it will not come out of inventory. If an Item is sent to the kitchen and removed from the check because the food was dropped then the products that were in the recipe for that item will not come out of inventory. 
To take care of this problem we have 
Wastage
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Submitting A Starting Inventory Count

Once you have all your items, products, and receipts entered. You need to perform an inventory count known as "processing".
Processing can be found in the 
Back Office
 in the 
Inventory
 tab under "
Processing
".
Choose a Department and click on "
Sort
"
“
Show Calculations
” will show you the inventory adjustment
Enter a count of 
Zero
 and click on "
Save and Finalize
"
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Ordering Inventory

The following process will allow you to create a purchase order for your suppliers.
The section for 
Ordering 
is located in the Inventory tab under "
Ordering
"
You may get a warning if you haven’t performed a calculate on hand recently. You are given the option of 
proceeding
 
without
 
calculating
 or to 
calculate
 
now
. 
It's recommended to choose "
Calculate Now
"
This process calculates what inventory levels you should have based on previous input and sales movements.
Any items that the system calculates are below your order point will show in red. If you want to see all of the products then untick the “Only return items with quantity below reorder point” box. 
Click the orange arrow next to the product to add it to the purchase order
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Receiving Stock

This is where you would go to deliver in your stock. Click on Receive PO for the PO in question Enter the invoice amount in the invoice total field
The delivery and tax amounts will be deducted from the invoice total. What is left should match what the invoice was initially raised for. The products when entering an amount do not include tax. Enter the amount of each product in the Amount Received field Confirm and receive items.
You are able to managed received inventory in the "
Receiving
" section in the 
Inventory
 tab in the 
Back Office
. 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Wastage

If you remove an item from the check then it will not come out of inventory. 
If there is a reason to remove food that has already been made from someone’s check then you need to use 
Wastage
From the front select the item that you need to 
Waste 
from the 
Current Ticket
 list
Click on "
Order Functions
" > "
Wastage
"
You will be asked for a reason and have the option to add notes. Choose a reason and add notes if needed
An override is required for this function. The privilege for this is in 
Back Office
 >  
Employees
 > 
Privileges
 >  “
Waste
 
Items
”
The Item will stay on the ticket but have the value reduced to 
zero
. This way the products still come out of 
Inventory
 correctly and reports as 
Wastage
 
There is a second reason that you would enter wastage. That is if you have wastage of Products that have not been used yet. 
Example: Your freezer breaks and spoils the food. The food is past its sell by date or you have breakages. 
In this case you can use wastage in the back office. 
Go to 
Back Office 
> 
Inventory 
> 
Wastage
Click on "
Manage Reasons"
Enter a Reason
Click on "
Add Reason
"
Click on "
New Wastage Event
"
Add a Title for the event. For example, 
Tuesday’s
 
Wastage
 
Choose a date and time that the wastage occurred
You will see a list of all of the products which you can filter if you wish to find the products in question.
When you have found the product, you need to waste click on "
Add
" next to it
You are presented with the following screen 
Enter The information reused and press “
Save
”.
Once all the items and amounts have been added to the 
Wastage
 event Press 
Save.
.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Employee Privileges

Overview
Back
 
Office
 > 
Employees
 > Employee Manager > Privileges
 is where you assign Employee Privileges.
From here you can enable or disable access to various privileges.
Employee Privileges
Abandon Offline Credit Transactions 
Determines whether the employee can abandon offline credit transactions that have been attempted.
 
Accept Check
Determines wh ether the employee can override the payment method of check (if override enabled).
 
Access All Tables
Determines whether the employee can access all tables.
Activate Gift Cards
Determines whether the employee can perform an override on activating a gift card without a sell.
 
Add Depleted Items
Determines whether the employee can add items determined to be depleted by the "Counter Groups".
 
Add Fingerprint
Determines whether the employee can add a fingerprint to an employee.
 
Add Gratuity
Determines whether the employee can add gratuity to an ord
er.
 
Add Tips
Determines whether the employee can add tips to credit transactions.
 
Add VIP Points
Determines whether the employee can manually add VIP points to a VIP card.
 
Add to Account
Determines whether the employee can add an order to an account.
 
Alter Gratuity
Allows one to alter gratuity.
 
Assign Drawers (SCM)
Determines whether the employee can assign drawers with Simplified Cash Management.
 
Assign Transaction (Bar)
Determines whether the employee can assign a bar transaction to an employee.
 
Assign Transaction (Delivery)
Determines whether the employee can assign a delivery transaction to an employee.
 
Assign Transaction (Drive Thru)
Determines whether the employee can assign a drive thru transaction to an employee.
 
Assign Transaction (For Here)
Determines whether the employee can assign a for here transaction to an employee.
 
Assign Transaction (Retail)
Determines whether the employee can assign a retail transaction to an employee.
 
Assign Transaction (Table)
Determines whether the employee can assign a table transaction to an employee.
 
Assign Transaction (Takeout)
Determines whether the employee can assign a takeout transaction to an employee.
 
Assign Transaction (To Go)
Determines whether the employee can assign a togo transaction to an employee.
 
Bank Reports
Determines whether the employee can print a server's report.
 
Break Monitoring
Causes the break monitoring screen to pop up when logging in.
 
Cancel Delivery
Determines whether the employee can cancel a delivery order.
 
Cancel Drive Thru
Determines whether the employee can cancel a drive thru order.
 
Cancel Takeout
Determines whether the employee can cancel a takeout order.
 
Cash Drawer
Determines whether the cash drawer will open for the employee during a transaction.
 
Clock Overrides
Determines whether the employee can perform clock overrides.
 
Clocked Out
General Access Select "" if the employee has access the terminal while clocked out.
 
Clocked Out
Overrides Select "" if the employee has access to perform overrides while clocked out.
 
Close Till/Bank with Open Tables
Determines whether the user can authorize closing a bank/till with open orders
 
Combine Bar Tabs
Determines whether the employee can combine bar tabs.
 
Complete Delivery
Determines whether the employee can complete a delivery for another driver.
 
Comps
Determines whether the employee can perform comps.
 
Consolidate Items
Determines whether the employee can override the consolidate items function.
 
Continue Without Skipping Break
Allows the employee to override continue without skipping breaks.
 
Create Invoice
Allows the user to create invoices on the POS.
 
Credit Batch
Determines whether the employee can perform a credit batch.
 
Credit Server Selection
Determines whether the employee can change the NETePay credit serve
r.
 
Custom Gift Cards
Determines whether the employee can perform an override on selling custom gift cards.
 
Custom Item
Determines whether the employee can add a custom item to an order.
 
Custom Item w/ Price
Determines whether the employee can add a custom item to an order with a price.
 
Custom Modifier
Determines whether the employee can add a custom modifier to an item.
 
Custom Modifier w/ Price
Determines whether the employee can add a custom modifier to an order with a price.
 
Database Settings
Determines whether the employee can enter the Database Settings section on the login screen.
 
Delivery Address
Determines whether the employee can override a delivery address determined to be outside of delivery area.
 
Drinks Per Guest
Determines whether the employee can perform an override on fewer number of drinks than guests.
 
Edit Customer Database
Determines whether the employee can edit the customer database.
 
Edit Menu
Determines whether the employee can edit the menu.
 
Edit Price
Determines whether the employee can edit the price of an item.
 
Edit Wait Times
Determines whether the employee can edit wait times for takeout and delivery orders.
 
Edited Order Adjust Override
Allows the employee to override sending changes to an edited order paid for
with credit that was not adjusted when DataCap Adjust Payments is on.
 
Employee Control Panel
Determines whether the employee can access the Employee Panel through the Control Panel.
 
End of Day
Determines whether the employee can perform an end of day.
 
Exit POS
Determines whether the employee can close the POS System.
 
Fail Delivery
Determines whether the employee can fail a delivery order.
 
Full Menu Editing If set to "No", limits "Edit Menu" to setting item counters and availability for the employee.
 
Ignore Printer Error
Determines whether the employee can perform overrides on printer errors.
 
Kitchen Tickets/KDS C. Panel
Determines whether the employee can use the kitchen tickets function of the Control Panel and - Allow access to KDS gear icon.
 
Labor Reports
Determines whether the employee can access labor reports.
 
Ltd Bank Close
Determines whether the user can close their own personal bank.
 
Ltd Bank Open
Determines whether the user can open a personal bank for themselves.
 
Ltd Till Close
Determines whether the user can close any till they are assigned to.
 
Ltd Till Open
Determines whether the user can open a till for the standard amount.
 
Ltd Till/Bank Info
Determines whether the user can view/print all of their own financial information.
 
Mgr Till/Bank Close
Determines whether the user can close any till or bank.
 
Mgr Till/Bank Info
Determines whether the user can view/print all financial information for other users.
 
Mgr Till/Bank Open/Assign
Determines whether the user can authorize opening custom tills, standard tills, and server banks. - Allows user to assign additional users to existing tills.
 
Modify Items on App
Determines whether the employee can modify an already sent item on the companion app.
 
No Sale - All Tills
Determines whether the employee can preform a no sale.
 
No Sale - Assigned Tills
Determines whether the employee can preform a no sale on a till that s/he is assigned to.
 
Offline Credit Transactions
Determines whether the employee can turn on/off offline processing.
 
Other Payment Override
Allows one to approve use of other payment methods when override is enable
d.
 
Override Credit Auth
Determines whether the employee can perform an override on credit authorizations.
 
Override Promotion
Determines whether the employee can perform an override on promotions.
 
Pay In / Pay Out
Determines whether the employee can perform pay in / pay out functions.
 
Pending Order Adjust Override
Allows the employee to override running the EOD or Batch when there are pending
orders that have been partially paid for with adjustable credit payments.
 
Punch Adjustments
Allows one to manage the employee's time clock punches.
 
Refunds
Determines whether the employee can perform refunds.
 
Remove Items
Determines whether the employee can remove an item based on the removal settings in the override settings.
 
Repeat Items Outside Timeset
Determines whether the employee can repeat an item that is available only during a timeset.
 
Reprint Credit
Determines whether the employee can reprint a credit slip.
 
Sales Reports
Determines whether the employee can access sales reports.
 
Scale
 
Override
Determines whether the employee can override a manually entered weight when a scale is present.
 
Scan Create Sales Item
Allows the user to create an inventory sales item when a scanned item is not found.
 
Scheduling
Determines whether the employee can perform scheduling.
 
Service Fees
Determines whether the employee can add service fees to an order.
 
Settings
Determines whether the employee can change settings on the terminals.
 
Show All Items
Determines whether the employee override to show all items.
 
Sign Out Delivery Orders
Determines whether the employee can sign delivery orders out to other drivers.
 
Skip Break
Allows the employee to skip breaks.
 
Stay Signed In After Order/Send
Determines whether the employee will be signed off after entering an order or checking out.
 
Tablet Connections
Determines whether the employee can connect or disconnect Order Tablets.
 
Tax Exempt Orders
Determines whether the employee can make a ticket tax exempt.
 
Transfer All Tables
Determines whether the employee can perform an override on the transfer of tables.
 
Transfer Own Tables
Determines whether the employee can perform an override on the transfer of own tables.
 
Unapplied Credit
Determines whether the employee can perform an override on viewing unapplied credit transactions.
 
Unassign Drawers (SCM)
Determines whether the employee can unassign drawers with Simplified Cash Management.
 
VIP Percentage
Determines whether the employee can change the percentage off for a VIP card.
 
View Accounts
Allows the user to see account information on add to account.
 
View All Tabs
Determines whether the employee can view and checkout/edit all bar tabs.
 
View All Tips
Determines whether the employee can view and add tips to all credit transactions.
 
View Closed Tills/Banks
Determines whether the employee can access closed tills/banks and edit their adjustments.
 
View Notifications
Determines whether the employee can perform view and clear notifications.
 
View Table Info
Determines whether the employee can view server names and times.
 
View Transactions
Determines whether the employee can view transactions.
 
Void Credit Transactions
Determines whether the employee can void credit transactions.
 
Voids
Determines whether the employee can void transactions.
 
Waste Items
Determines whether the employee can waste an item to account for inventory usage.
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterep
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Allow Employees To Take Offline Transactions

Overview
Enabling this setting will allow your employees to take or abandon offline credit transactions.
Adding The Privilege To An Employee
1) 
Navigate to the 
Back Office
2) 
Click "
Employees
" tab
3) 
Click the employee in the drop down
4) 
Click the blue "
Privileges" 
button
5) 
Switch both "
Abandon Offline Credit Transactions"
 and 
"Offline Credit Transactions"
 to 
"Yes"
      Save the Settings
Adding The Privilege To A Job Role
1) 
Navigate to the 
Back Office
2)
 Click 
"Employees"
 tab
3) 
Click "
Job Manager"
 on the left side of the screen
4)
 Click the pencil icon beside the job role you would like to add these to
5)
 Switch both "
Abandon Offline Credit Transactions"
and
 "Offline Credit Transactions"
 to "
Yes"
      
Save the Settings
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Managing Employees

Employee Managemen
t is where you create, manage and delete employees. 
Employee Management is located in the 
Back Office
 > 
Employees 
> 
Employee Management
From here you can allow your employees access to various parts of the system.
Employee
 
Info
 – Some basic information about the employee
Employee
 
Schedule
 – A legacy feature
Employee
 
hours
 – A report to show the employees hours for the current week
Employee
 
Privileges 
–
 
Shows a list of key privileges with a tick or a cross to show if that employee has that privilege. 
Note that this only shows if the privilege is set to “Yes” the employee may still have that privilege if they are assigned to a job that has that privilege
Employee
 
Stats
 – Shows some key stats to quickly asses the performance of an employee
Employee
 
Control
 – Shows some key stats on known areas of risk related to the employee
Employee
 
Reminders
 – A list of any reminders that have been set up and their due date
Employee
 
Notes
 – This notes box will show here and nowhere else
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Adding A New Employee

You can add an Employee using the
 Employee Manager
Employee Manager
 is located in the 
Back Office
 > 
Employees 
> 
Employee Management
Click on "
New Employee
"
Enter the Employee's Information
Press "
Save and Continue
"
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Creating/Editing Employee Passwords

You can edit or delete employee passwords using the
 Employee Manager
Employee Manager
 is located in the 
Back Office
 > 
Employees 
> 
Employee Management
Select an Employee from the dropdown
Click "
Passwords
"
Add Password / Card
This is where you control access to the front end. You can log onto the front end with a password or with a card swipe or fingerprint. Here we will address the first 2. As a card swipe is basically a very quick way of entering a number you
      
Enter your Passcode in to the “
Password / Card Number
” box. Then enter a Name for the password (Optional) this would be something like “Front End” or “Card”
The password you enter here can be entered in or it can be the number that is programmed into a card.
Click on “
Add Password / Card
” to save the password.
After a password is added it will show in the list where it can be edited or delete
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Creating A Back Office Login

If you want to create a
 Back Office
 login, it can be done using the
 Employee Manager.
Employee Manager
 is located in the 
Back Office
 > 
Employees 
> 
Employee Management
Select an Employee from the dropdown
Click "
Passwords
"
Back Office Access
This is where you create a Back Office login.
Enter a Username
Enter a Password
If you enter an Email address then it will request access for remote back office
If you want to 
remove
 back office access you just need to delete the username and password from this section and press save
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Employee Privileges

Privileges control what you are able to do within the system.
Privileges are split into 
Employee Privileges
 and 
Back Office
Employee
 
Privileges
 control access to the front end
Back
 
Office
 control access to the back office
Back Office privileges are controlled with a simple 
Yes
 or 
No
 to determine if you have access or not
Employee Privileges can be set to either 
Yes
 
No
 or 
Job
 
Title
It would be very time consuming and difficult to maintain if you had to enter a yes or no for every setting for every employee. Because of this we have Jobs. You create a Job, assign privileges to it and then assign that job to an employee.  Provided the employee privileges are all set to “Job Title” then when the employee clocks in and chooses that Job then they will have the access set up within that job code.
You are able to override the job privileges by explicitly setting the privilege to Yes or No
Yes
 – Explicitly set to yes for the employee
No 
– Explicitly set to No for the employee
Job
 
Title
 – The Job title they use to log in is what will control if they have access
Employee Privileges can be managed from the
 Employee Manager.
Employee Manager
 is located in the 
Back Office
 > 
Employees 
> 
Employee Management
Select an Employee from the dropdown
Click "
Privileges
"
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Jobs

Jobs are a collection of privileges and settings, that you can use to make sure the employee has the access they require in order to do that Job.
For example, bar staff may not need access to tables but servers would. They may also have different pay rates. It is possible that the same member of staff would be waiting on tables one day and tending bar the next. Instead of giving them access to everything they need for both jobs you assign them the jobs of server and Bar. When they log in they can choose which job they are doing that day and they will be assigned the correct privileges and paid the correct amount of money.  
You can set it so that you have to be clocked in and assigned to a Job before you are allowed to log on to the system
You can also allow access without being clocked in using the 
Clocked Out - General Access setting
Employee Jobs can be managed from the
 Employee Manager.
Employee Manager
 is located in the 
Back Office
 > 
Employees 
> 
Employee Management
Select an Employee from the dropdown
Click "
Jobs
"
Choose a
 Job Code 
from the list
Add a
 Pay Rate
 and 
Pay Type
 (If applicable)
Click on "
Add Job To Employee
"
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Editing Employee Info

This is where you can edit the employee information that you entered when you created the employee. 
For example, if the employee moved house then this is where you would go to change the address.
Employee Information can be managed from the
 Employee Manager.
Employee Manager
 is located in the 
Back Office
 > 
Employees 
> 
Employee Management
Select an Employee from the dropdown
Click "
Employee Info
"
After making your changes, click "
Edit Employee
" to save them. 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Employee Notifications

You're able notify your employees of particular events via an email or a text notification.
To enable this, you need emailed the emailed reports feature which you will need to speak to 
OrderCounter
 to have set up
Employee Information can be managed from the 
Employee Manager.
Employee Manager
 is located in the 
Back Office
 > 
Employees 
> 
Employee Management
Select an Employee from the dropdown
Click "
Notifications
"
Mobile Phone: 
Enter the employee's number they want to receive emails to.
Email: 
Enter the employee's email they want to receive emails to.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Job Manager

Jobs
 are a way of categorizing employees and contain a list of privileges that can be used to control what the employee has access to.
This way if you have 10 servers you do not have to set the privileges up for those employees individually. You would create a Job called “Server” , then assign that job to each employee. When the employee clocks into the till with the “Server” job code then they will get the privileges assigned to that job code. You can override one or more privileges at the employee level if needed.
An employee 
must
 be clocked in for the job privileges to apply.
Consider setting “
Clocked Out – General Access
” to “
No
” for each employee
Jobs
 can be managed in 
Job Manager
 in the 
Back Office
 >
 Employees
Creating a New Job
Click on "
Add New Job
" 
Job Title
 – What you want to call the job. Server, Manager etc.
Job Description
 – A notes box for any extra info you wish to record. It is only viewable in this location
Terminal Access
 – If set to “No” then anyone clocked on using this job code will not be able to log on to the till.
 
This would be useful for any staff that need to keep track of their hours but do not use the till. Kitchen staff for example
Job Category 
– You can assign the Job to a category if you wish. 
These categories will be shown in the Labor Tracking Report and the Labor Report 
Choose Table Section
 – If both are set to “
On
” then when an employee clocks in they will be asked what section they want to be assigned to.
Used in conjunction with 
Back Office 
> 
Settings 
> 
POS 
> 
Assign Sections. 
Claimed Tips
 –  If both are set to “
Yes
” then when an employee clocks out they will be prompted to enter their tip total for the day.  The amount they entered will be visible in the Claimed tips report.
Used in conjunction with 
Back Office 
>
 Settings 
>
 POS
> 
Claim Tips
Quick Sign In
 – If both are enabled then every employee that is clocked in (with Quick Sign In enabled) will show in a list on the login screen. You can select the name to sign in as that person
Used in conjunction with
 Terminal Settings
 > 
Quick Sign In.
Job Privileges
These are privileges that will be assigned to the job
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Clock In Messages

Clock in messages can be configured in the 
Messages 
section in the 
Employee
's tab.
This message will display the first time that employee logs in. 
An employee 
must
 be clocked in for the job privileges to apply.
Consider setting “
Clocked Out – General Access
” to “
No
” for each employee
Messages 
can be configured in 
Messages
 in the 
Back Office
 >
 Employees
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Employee Availability

Availability allows you to select when a member of staff is and is not available to work.
It is part of the legacy Schedule feature which is still used by some clients.
It is now highly recommended that for scheduling you use Schedule Gopher
Employee Availability
 can be configured in the 
Employee Manager
.
Employee Manager
 is located in the 
Back Office
 > 
Employees 
> 
Employee Management
Select an Employee from the dropdown
Click "
Availability
"
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Employee Reminders

When you create an Employee Reminder, if there is an employee that has "
Employee Reminders
" setup under 
Notifications
, they will get an email on the date the reminder occurs.  If they do not have Employee reminders set up under notifications then it will simply show on the Reminders section of the  employee screen.
Employee Reminders 
can be configured in the 
Employee Manager
.
Employee Manager
 is located in the 
Back Office
 > 
Employees 
> 
Employee Management
Select an Employee from the dropdown
Click "
Reminders
"
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Deactivating Employees

When a member of staff leaves employment then you will need to remove their access. 
It is not possible to delete an employee as it is linked to the reports and history. Deleting the employee would cause errors. 
You could re-use the employee and change the name, however if you do this then the history of the new and old employees will become muddled and is not recommended.
You can deactivate employees using the 
Employee Manager
.
Employee Manager
 is located in the 
Back Office
 > 
Employees 
> 
Employee Management
Select an employee from the dropdown
Click "
Deactivate Empl.
"
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Importing Employee information

Employee CSV Import
 will allow you to create a 
CSV file
 containing employee information and import all of those employees at the same time.
If any employees match then they will not get imported. This is to add employees that do not currently exist
The CSV structure is as follows:
First Name, Last Name, Password, Job Title, Pay Rate
You can have the first row contain these titles but they must match. 
The headers are not required to function.
Job title must match an existing job title in the system
Checks are performed before import so if there is a problem then the system will let you know.
The 
Employee CSV Import
 feature is located in the 
Back Office
 > 
Employees
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Edited Tickets

Overview
Edited tickets is the behavior of the printing system when a submitted item is changed in some way. Either the item is removed, one of the modifiers is removed or the modifier is changed. 
The system has the ability to send a ticket to the printer to say Edited Ticket. To send a Void Ticket, to Send a void ticket and reprint the edited ticket or to do nothing at all.
The recommended way to use this feature is to have a void ticket be sent and print another ticket. 
Recommended Settings
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Printers
 > 
Kitchen Edit Tickets = “
Yes
”
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Printers
 > 
Print Edited Items = “
On
”
This combination will send a void ticket when the Item is edited and resend an updated ticket with “Edited Ticket” above the items when Save and Send is pressed. 
The Set Up
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Printers
There are 2 settings here that determine the behavior
“
Kitchen Edit Tickets
” and “
Print Edited Items
”
Print Edited Items set to “
Off
”
Kitchen Edit Tickets has 3 options
Yes
 – When the item is edited a Void Ticket will be sent to the printer. When Save and Send is pressed then a kitchen ticket will be sent but will have no Items on it. 
Ticket
 
Notification
 
Only
 – When an item is edited then a ticket saying “Edited Ticket” will be sent to the kitchen with the ID so you can find the ticket
No
 
Edit
 
Notifications
 – No ticket is sent to the kitchen when the item is edited or when pressing save and send after editing the item
Print Edited Items set to “
On
”
Kitchen
 Edit Tickets
Yes
 – When the item is edited a void ticket will be send to the printer. When Save and Send is pressed then a new ticket will be sent to the kitchen with “Edited Item” displayed so you know then ticket is replacing an existing one.
This is how we recommend it is set up
Ticket Notification Only
 – When the item is edited a ticket will be sent to the kitchen saying “Edited Ticket” giving you the Order ID so you can find the affected ticket. But you will not get a new printout if you press save and send
No Edit Notifications
 - No ticket is sent to the kitchen when the item is edited or when pressing save and send after editing the item
Changes or suggestions can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounteret
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Reducing Ticket Length With Split Tickets

Setting Max Amount of Items On A Ticket
This can be done from the back office
Back Office
 > 
Settings
 
>
 
Printers 
> 
Max Items
Editing the kitchen max items items will result in the printer printing out another receipt once the limit of items has been passed.
If this is set to 0, then there will be no max item set, resulting in a long kitchen ticket.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Receipt Templates

Overview
Receipt templates are essential for creating professional and organized documentation of financial transactions. This guide will help you create and edit receipt templates, enabling you to customize and optimize your receipt generation workflow.
Navigation
To access Receipt Templates Settings:
Go to Back Office > 
Settings 
> Receipt Template
Editing Templates
Find the template you want to edit. You can also clone an existing template to begin creating a new one.
Click "
Edit
" to access the receipt items
Here is where you can arrange, add, or modify the various receipt lines.
To add a row, click the "
Add Row
" button at either the top or bottom
Once a receipt line is added, you'll see a 
 line. Click this and it'll bring you to a menu of receipt items
Once done, hit "
Save
"
 = Makes the text 
Bold
 = 
Underlines
 the text
 = Ink Color
 = The size of the text
S = Small
2xH = Double Height
2xW = Double Width
2xHW = Double Height/Width
Receipt Line Options
Authorization
: Approval by a payment processor for a transaction.
Blank Line
: An empty line.
Card Holder
: The individual who authorized the payment card.
Card Type
: The category of payment card used (e.g., Visa, Mastercard).
Cashier
: The employee who processed the payment.
Character Line
: A line for characters (letters, numbers, symbols).
Credit Copy
: A duplicate receipt for the merchant.
Credit ID
: An ID number for the credit card transaction.
Custom Text
: Enter custom text on the receipt.
Customer Address
: The address of the customer.
Customer Name
: The name of the customer.
Customer Notes
: Notes from the POS for the customer.
Customer Phone
: The customer's contact number.
Date
: The date of the transaction.
Date/Time
: The date and time of the transaction.
Discount
: A deduction from the total amount.
Driver Instructions
: Instructions for the delivery driver.
EMV Info
: Information related to EMV chip technology.
Entry Method
: The method of payment card entry (swiped, tapped, manually keyed).
Grand Total
: The total amount including subtotal, taxes, and additional charges.
Gratuity
: A tip provided by the customer.
Invoice ID
: A unique identifier for the invoice.
Kitchen ID
: A code used to reference the order in the kitchen.
Last 4
: The last four digits of the payment card number.
Loyalty Calculated New Balance Line
: The new balance of loyalty points after the transaction.
Loyalty Disclaimer
: Terms and conditions of a loyalty program.
Loyalty Points Used Line
: The number of loyalty points redeemed.
Loyalty Starting Balance Line
: The initial balance of loyalty points.
Merchant ID
: ID of the merchant.
Number Of Guests
: Number of guests assigned to an order or table.
Order ID
: Unique identifier for the order.
Order Method
: Method the order was completed (Delivery, Takeout, Table).
Order Notes
: Notes made during the order.
Order Number
: The order number.
Order Status
: Status of the order.
Order Tag
: Specific tags used for the order.
Paid Line
: The amount or method of payment confirming payment.
Pay Line Agreement
: Terms and conditions for payment.
Print Other Station Items
: Whether additional items should be printed at other stations.
Ready Time
: Estimated time for order pickup or delivery.
Receipt Header Text
: Information at the top of the receipt (business name, logo, address).
Reference
: A reference number or code for the transaction.
Restaurant Address
: The address of the restaurant.
Restaurant Email
: The email address of the restaurant.
Restaurant Info
: General information about the restaurant.
Restaurant Name
: The name of the restaurant.
Restaurant Phone
: The contact number of the restaurant.
Scheduled Order Date
: The date for a scheduled order.
Scheduled Order Line
: Details of a scheduled order.
Scheduled Order Time
: The time for a scheduled order.
Server
: The name of the server who assisted with the order.
Signature Line
: A line for the customer’s signature.
Station Number of Items
: The number of items at a specific station.
Station ID
: Identification number of the station.
Station Items
: Items associated with the station.
Station Name
: Name or label of the station.
Sub-Total
: Total amount before taxes and discounts.
Suggested Tips
: Tip recommendations.
Table Number
: Number assigned to the table.
Tax Total
: Total amount of taxes.
Terminal
: Device used to process the transaction.
Ticket Number
: Unique number assigned to the receipt.
Time
: Specific time of the transaction.
Tip Line
: Line for the customer to write the tip amount.
Total Items
: Total number of items in the transaction.
Total Line
: Final total amount to be paid.
Trans ID
: Transaction ID number for tracking.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Printer Settings

Overview
To configure various printer settings for your business, navigate to 
Back Office
 > 
Settings 
> 
Printers
.
General Printer Settings
General Printer Settings
Show Modifiers
: Display or hide item modifiers (like extra cheese) on receipts or tickets.
Print Custom Modifiers
: Show or hide custom changes (like "no salt") on receipts or tickets.
Print Quantity 1
: Decide if you want to print the number '1' on kitchen tickets or only print quantities other than '1'.
Display Modifier Quantity 1
: Choose whether to print/display the number '1' for item modifiers on kitchen tickets, receipts, and POS.
Specialized Printer Settings
Expo Printer
: Enable or disable the expediter printer, which helps in organizing orders.
Expo Printer Name
: Name your expediter printer.
Gratuity on Credit Slip
: Print a line for gratuity if it’s already added.
Tip Line
: Show a line for tips on credit slips.
Tip Receipt
: Print a separate receipt when tips are added.
Signature Line
: Include a line for signatures on credit slips.
Credit Barcode
: Add a barcode with the transaction ID at the bottom of credit slips.
Print Clock Slip
: Print a slip when employees clock in or out.
Clock Out Sales Since
: Decide how sales and tips are shown on clock out slips.
Clock Out Sales Server/Cashier
: Specify if sales/tips on clock out slips are for the server or cashier.
When Clock Out Slip Prints
: Choose if the clock out slip prints before or after the tip prompt.
Item Name Size
: Change the size of item names on kitchen receipts.
Receipt Spacing
: Add an extra line between each item on remote tickets.
Receipt Line
: Display a specific line at the bottom of receipts/tickets.
Receipt Box
: Enable or disable the box outline on receipts.
Print Address
: Print the restaurant’s address at the top of receipts.
Suggested Tip Percentages
: Set three different suggested tip percentages.
Suggested Tips Use Paid
: Choose whether suggested tips are calculated on the paid amount or total amount.
Description on Tickets
: Print item descriptions on kitchen/bar tickets.
Print Edited/Removed Items
: Print items that were edited or removed on kitchen/bar tickets.
Kitchen Edit Tickets
: Decide if edited items should print or send an edit ticket.
Other Station Items
: Print items from other stations.
Print Timing Delays
: Allow delays in printing receipts to remote printers.
Kitchen Modifier Separation
: Choose to display modifiers on their own line or separated by commas.
Grand Total Large Font
: Print the grand total in large font on customer tickets.
Pre Auth Slip
: Print a confirmation slip for pre-authorizations.
Pre Auth Slip Text
: Set the text at the bottom of the pre-auth slip.
Show Tab Name
: Display the bar tab name on receipts.
Print Receipts Without Tip Line
: Print receipts with a signature line if there is no tip line.
Print # of Tickets
: Indicate the number of tickets at other stations on kitchen tickets.
Print After Bump
: Print kitchen tickets immediately or after the order is bumped from the KDS screen.
Print Account Balances
: Print the account balance on receipts for closed accounts.
Prefix Items with Seat
: Add seat numbers to items or use headings to denote seats.
Print Prices On Order Tickets
: Print prices along with items on station order tickets.
Hide Cash on Till/Bank Reports
: Hide cash totals on till and bank reports.
Receipt Settings
Customer Receipt Prompt
: Prompt to print customer receipts.
Refund Receipt Prompt
: Prompt to print refund receipts.
Void Receipt Prompt
: Prompt to print void receipts.
Print Till Report
: Enable printing of till reports.
Print Slips on Delivery Orders
: Print receipts and credit card slips for delivery orders.
Print Slips on Assign Driver
: Print receipts and credit card slips when assigning a delivery driver.
Print Slips on Takeout Orders
: Print receipts for takeout orders.
Print Gift Cards Sale
: Print a separate receipt for gift card sales.
Prevent Multi Receipt Printing
: Prevent printing the same receipt multiple times.
Credit Simple/Detailed Guest Copies
: Set the number of simple or detailed guest copies for credit cards.
Credit Simple/Detailed Merchant Copies
: Set the number of simple or detailed merchant copies for credit cards.
Credit Final Receipts
: Set the number of final receipt copies for credit cards.
Final Receipts
: Set the number of final receipt copies for all payment types.
Scenarios
Scenario 1: Simplifying Kitchen Orders
You own a restaurant and want to make sure your kitchen staff can easily see item modifications like "extra cheese" or "no onions." Enable 
Show Modifiers
 and 
Print Custom Modifiers
 to print these details on kitchen tickets.
Scenario 2: Managing Employee Clock-Ins
As a manager, you want to keep track of your employees' clock-in and clock-out times. Enable 
Print Clock Slip
 and set 
When Clock Out Slip Prints
 to print the slip before or after the tip prompt.
Scenario 3: Enhancing Customer Receipts
To improve customer experience, you decide to print suggested tips and the restaurant’s address on receipts. Set 
Suggested Tip Percentages
 and enable 
Print Address
 to include these details on every customer receipt.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Automatic Gratuity

Overview
This feature will automatically add gratuity to the check. It can do this by 
Setting Up Auto Gratuity
⦁
 
Go to 
Back Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
POS
 > 
Gratuity Edit
 This needs to be set to 
Yes
⦁
 
Go to 
Back Office
 >
 Settings
 > 
Service Fees
⦁
 
There will now be a section here called 
Auto Gratuity
⦁
 
Select  
"Add Auto Gratuity"
⦁
 
Fill out the following
Guest Count – 
The minimum number of guests required to trigger the gratuity
Gratuity
 – The percentage of gratuity that will be added to the bill 
Method
 – The order method this rule applies to.
Using Auto Gratuity
Using auto gratuity is simple. You ring up the order as normal.
If the number of guests and the order type trigger the Auto Gratuity then gratuity will be added for you automatically  
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Break Monitoring

Overview
Break Monitoring will allow you to set the maximum number of hours an employee can work before taking a break. The system will then alert that person at login that they are due a break. At this point they can either take their break, continue without taking a break or skip their break
You can give someone the ability to be a “
Break
 
Monitor
” which will (at login) alert them to any member of staff that is due a break. 
The Set Up
       
1) 
Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
POS
 > 
General
 
Settings
 > “
Break
 
Monitoring”.
 Set “
Break
 
Monitoring
” to “
Yes
”
This will enable Break Monitoring notifications (An extra screen upon login)
      
2)
 Go to Back 
Office
 > 
Employees
 > 
Job
 
Manager
 > and 
edit
 
a
 
job
.
When Editing a Job there are 2 new settings
Hours
 
Between
 
Breaks
 – How many hours the employee is allowed to work before they require a break
Break
 
Notification
 
Hour
 – How many hours the employee can work before being notified about a break. The law may require a break every 3.5 hours but you may want to be notified of a break at 3 hours.
      
3)
 Enable the override for Skipping breaks
Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Overrides
 and set “
Skip
 
Break
” to “
On”
      
4)
 Under to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Employees
 > 
Job
 
Manager 
or to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Employees
 > 
Employee
 
Manager > Job Privileges 
 Set “
Skip
 
Break”
 to “
Yes
” This will allow the employee get past the override and skip their break. Set this to “
No
” if you do not want the employee to be able to skip their breaks
These four steps are all you need to allow a person to be notified of breaks and have the ability to skip them.
If you want an employee to have visibility of all currently clocked in employees and when they are due for, or are overdue for their breaks then continue to step five.
      
5)
 Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Employees
 > 
Job
 
Manager
 > Click on the pencil icon next to one of the jobs to edit it > Under 
Job
 
Privileges
 set 
Break
 
Monitoring
 to “
Yes
”
When you are clocked in using that job code you will, upon login in, be presented with a Break Monitor Screen. This screen will show all employees that are currently clocked in as well as information as to when they are due to take their breaks. 
To enforce the use of the break monitoring system you may want to set the employee privilege of “
Clocked Out - General Access” 
to “No”. This will stop the employee form being able to log on without being clocked in
Using The Break Monitoring System
When you log in and have the Break Monitoring Privilege enabled, you will be presented with the following screen which will show all employees currently clocked in
Previous Clock-In
 – Time and date the employee last checked in
Name
 – Name of the Employee in question
Time Since Last Clock-In
 – How long it has been since the last time the employee clocked in 
Time Until Break Due/Past Due
 – If this is white then it represents the time until the employee is due a break. If this is red then it is the time that has elapsed since the employee should have taken a break
If the employee is clocked in using a job code that has the “
Hours Between Breaks
” and “
Break
 
Notification
 
Hour
” set, then they will receive notifications regarding breaks. The Break Monitoring setting will allow them to see the break monitoring screen upon login.
This is what the notification screen looks like.
             
Skip
 
Break
 – This will clock you out then clock you back in again. 
Continue without skipping break
 – Allows you to log on without skipping the break. The next time you log on you will be presented with the same screen
In order to take your break you must clock out.
Reporting
Back
 
Office
 > 
Data
 
Mining
 > 
Employee
 
Reports
 > 
Employee
 
Hours
 
Report
. If the employee skips their break then this report will show a clock out then a clock in 1 second later. The report will show that the employee chose to skip their break
Changes or suggestions can be made here:
 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterbm
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Defining How The System Counts The Number Of  Guest

Overview
Guests used to be calculated purely from a pop up box that would ask how many there were. There is now a system in place that allows you to decide how the number of guests re calculated. 
The Set Up
Go to 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
POS
 > 
Guest
 
Count
 
Settings
There are 5 ways the system can determine how many guests there are and this can be set individually for each order method.
Prompt
 – A pop up box requesting number of guests will appear when creating a new order 
Amount
 – Used in conjunction with the “
Amount
 
Threshold
” setting. The guest count will start at 1. Every time the Amount Threshold is surpassed, the guest count increases by 1. For example, if you set the Amount Thrreshold to $9.99 and the check came to $20 the guest count would be 3 
Drinks
 – Every Item sold that is marked with the special item type of “Drink” will count as 1 guest
One
 - Guest count will always be 1
Zero
 – Guest count will always be zero
Retail Guest Count Method
  - Determines the Guest Count Method used for Retail orders
Takeout Guest Count Method
 - Determines the Guest Count Method used for Takeout orders
Delivery Guest Count Method
 - Determines the Guest Count Method used for Delivery orders
Bar Tab Guest Count Method
 - Determines the Guest Count Method used for Bar Tab orders
Table Guest Count Method
 - Determines the Guest Count Method used for Table Orders
For Here Guest Count Method
 - Determines the Guest Count Method used with For Here Orders
To Go Guest Count Method
 - Determines the Guest Count Method used for To Go orders
Drive Thru Guest Count Method
 – Determines the Guest Count Method used for Drive Thru orders
Amount
 
Threshold
 – Used with the Amount guest count option. Please see “
Amount
” guest count type above. 
Max
 
Prompt
 
Entry
 – This is the maximum number of guests that can be entered when prompted. If zero is used then there is no maximum. 
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here:
 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterdhtcs
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Override Tax On Menu Items Based On Order Method

Overview
This feature will enable you to automatically change or remove tax on some Menu Items when using particular Order Methods. This is because there are legal requirements in some locations to charge a different tax rate when eating out vs eating in. This however only impacts some foods.
Setting up
      
1)
 Go to the 
Back Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
POS
 > “
Tax by Order Method
”
      
2)
 Change Tax by Order Method to Yes and Save


      
3) 
Click on the blue Setup link
      
4)
 Here you can choose which order methods will override the Tax rate for particular Menu Items. Choose the Tax rate you want to automatically apply when using each order method and press save
      
5)
 Go to the Menu Item edit screen from either the back office or the front end
      
6)
 There is a checkbox called “
Don’t Allow Tax Overrid
e” If you enable this box then the tax rate will never be overridden. This means you need to tick this box for any item you do not wish to charge a different rate
Using The New Override Feature
In this case we are selling a pastry. This can be eaten in or taken out. If the customer eats in then they pay tax. If the customer eats out, then they don’t.
We set up the item to have “
Don’t
 
allow
 
tax
 
override
” Unticked. We want to override the tax for this item
We want to change “
Tax
 
by
 
order
 
method
” to be “
On
”, and we want to choose “
Tax
 
Exempt
” for the order method of “
Takeout
”
Now when we use “Takeout” order method to sell the Item it will not charge tax but if we use any other order method it will.
Be careful to check the “
Don’t
 
allow
 
tax
 
override
” setting and tick it for any item that you want to be overridden by this new feature.
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here:
 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterotomi
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Automatically Clocking Out Users

Overview
This is a feature that will check a setting every half an hour. If the time since last clock in is longer than is set in this setting then the user will be clocked out. 
This setting is global an not set per user. This means that if it is enabled then any employee clocked in past the allowed time period will be clocked out
This allows the site to make sure people are not left clocked in accidently.
The set up
      
1)
 Go to 
Back Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
POS
 > 
Timers
 > 
Auto Clock Out
      
2)
 Enter an amount of time in hours. This is how many hours the employee is allowed to be clocked in for before they will be clocked out. “0” means it is not set
      
3)
 Save Settings
Using the feature
      
1)
 Clock in a user
      
2)
 Wait the period of hours defined in the “
Auto Clock Out
” setting
      
3)
 As the check occurs every half an hour it is possible that the employee will be clocked out up to 30 mins after the time set in the auto clock out setting
     
 4)
 If an employee is clocked out automatically, they will have a missing punch in the employee Hours Report to indicate that a punch needs to be added
Changes or suggestions can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounteraco
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: POS Settings

This guide explains all the settings available in the OrderCounter POS system and their purposes. To access these settings, go to Back Office > Settings > POS.
General Settings
Accept Cash:
 Enable or disable cash as a payment method.
Accept Credit:
 Enable or disable credit cards as a payment method.
Accept Gift Checks:
 Enable or disable checks as a payment method.
Accept Gift Cards:
 Enable or disable gift cards as a payment method.
Claim Tips:
 If enabled, employees must enter their daily tips when clocking out.
Change Tips:
 Allow employees to adjust their credit tips.
Tip Confirmation:
 Show a confirmation window when entering credit card tips.
Tip Entry Method:
 Choose between entering just the tip amount or the total transaction amount including the tip.
Custom Item:
 Add or remove the “Custom Item” button on the front end.
Custom Modifier:
 Add or remove the “Custom Modifier” button on the front end.
Credit Processing:
 Enable if using OrderCounter for credit card processing.
Authorize Bar Tabs:
 Authorize a credit card for bar tabs (requires Credit Processing to be on).
Authorize Confirm Windows:
 Show a confirmation window after authorizing a credit card.
Confirm Tab Name:
 Confirm the bar tab name after authorization.
Order Numbers:
 Print order numbers on kitchen tickets for various order types (retail, takeout, delivery, etc.).
Customer Name:
 Print customer names on kitchen tickets for different order methods.
Removal Reason:
 Prompt for a reason when removing an item without requiring a manager override.
Authorize Amount:
 Set a specific amount for authorizing credit cards for bar tabs.
Deposit Tax Method:
 Decide if deposits are taxable and how tax is calculated.
Save Tab Immediate:
 Choose whether to save bar tabs immediately or after items are rung up.
Clock In Message:
 Display a message to employees when they clock in.
Back Up Prompt Days:
 Remind to back up data if it hasn’t been done for a set number of days.
Previous Years Stats:
 Show previous year’s stats on the dashboard and reports.
Barcode Scanning:
 Enable barcode scanning for item entry.
Rounding Off:
 Round the grand total to a specified nearest amount.
Order ID Type:
 Choose if the order ID is random or sequential.
Paid/Unpaid Break Title:
 Set the titles for paid and unpaid breaks.
Scales Export:
 Show the scales export page.
Show I.A.N:
 Display the Item Availability Notice button on the login screen.
Internet Timeout:
 Set the timeout period for internet-related functions.
Change Order Method:
 Allow employees to change the order method.
Ticket Item Order:
 Choose the order in which items appear on receipts.
Clear Order Prompt:
 Warn when an order will be lost before creating a new one.
Confirm Fast Cash/Credit:
 Request confirmation before submitting quick cash or credit payments.
Combine Bar Tabs Method:
 Choose how bar tabs are combined.
Tip Notice Percentage:
 Highlight tips in red if they exceed a set percentage of the subtotal.
Reopen Unsaved Tabs:
 Enable picking up unsaved tabs from where they were left off.
Modifier Order:
 Set the order of modifiers on the ticket screen.
Redeem Larger Deposits:
 Allow redeeming deposits larger than the balance due.
Default Custom Item Tax:
 Set the default tax code for custom items.
Enable Inventory Invoice Edits:
 Allow edits to inventory invoices after receipt.
Auto Customer Lookup:
 Automatically look up or create customers at pre-authorization.
Save and Send Retail:
 Enable the Save and Send button for retail orders.
Show Tare:
 Display tare amounts next to items on receipts.
Tax Order by Order Method:
 Assign different tax codes based on order method.
Manual Account Balance Adjustments:
 Allow manual adjustments without reflecting in system accounting.
Force Report Category Selection:
 Require selection of a report category to save a menu item.
Maximum Tip:
 Set a maximum tip amount to prevent entry of excessively large tips.
Prepend Time to Item Name:
 Add the time to item names on receipts.
Force Order Scheduling:
 Prompt for order scheduling before checkout for certain order types.
Break Monitoring:
 Enable break monitoring to notify employees of their break times.
Clear Payments:
 Enable or disable the Clear Payments button on the checkout screen.
Repeat Quantity:
 Set options for repeating item quantities in orders.
Settle by Number Mode:
 Choose the screen displayed when settling by order number.
Keep Server Transfer Ticket:
 Decide who the table is assigned to after transfer.
Table Service
Assign Sections:
 Assign table sections to employees when clocked in.
Advanced Table Statuses:
 Enable advanced table statuses represented by different colors.
Auto Table Reset:
 Automatically reset tables when tickets are cashed out.
Table Check:
 Prevent employees from clocking out with open tables.
Open Gratuity:
 Toggle between zero and set gratuity amounts.
Gratuity:
 Choose if gratuity is added before or after tax.
Number of Guests:
 Prompt for the number of guests when opening a table.
Drinks Per Guest:
 Warn if the number of drinks is less than the number of guests.
Server Accept Payments:
 Determine if servers can accept cash, credit, checks, or gift cards.
Action After Send:
 Decide what happens after sending an order.
Print Button:
 Enable a print button on the order screen.
Table Service Checkout Button:
 Enable a checkout button on the order screen.
End of Day / Reports
End of Day Reports:
 Decide which reports print at the end of the day.
Must Close Bar Tabs:
 Require all bar tabs to be closed before running end of day.
Auto Save Bar Tabs:
 Save bar tab totals when an item is added.
Quick Reports:
 Set the number of quick reports allowed between end of day runs.
Report Time Cutoff:
 Set the cutoff time for the end of day.
Start Day:
 Choose the day your week starts.
Retail Only:
 Exclude restaurant-specific information from end of day reports.
Show All Items Button
Timeset Items:
 Display items even if made unavailable by Timeset.
Unavailable Items:
 Display items even if marked as unavailable.
Order Type Items:
 Display items even if not available for the current order type.
Menu Font Options
Category and Items:
 Customize the font style and size for category, items, and options buttons.
Show Price:
 Display item prices on menu buttons.
Checkout Quick Tender
Quick Tender Buttons:
 Set the values for quick tender buttons on the checkout screen.
Use Quick Payments:
 Enable quick payments for cash, credit, gift cards, and checks.
Confirm Quick Payments:
 Request confirmation before submitting quick payments.
EOD Settings
Server Terminal:
 Define which terminal is used as the server.
Auto EOD:
 Enable automatic end of day/batch processing.
Auto Start Time:
 Set the time for automatic end of day/batch processing.
Timers
Order Button Timer:
 Set the delay before the order button can be pressed again.
Save Tab Screen Timer:
 Set the duration for the save bar tab confirmation screen.
Change Screen Timer:
 Set the duration for displaying the change screen after payment.
Auto Restart:
 Enable automatic software restarts after a set period.
Auto Clockout:
 Automatically clock out employees after a set period of inactivity.
Order Wait Time Settings
Display Wait Times:
 Show or hide takeout and delivery wait times.
Default Wait Times:
 Set default wait times for takeout and delivery.
Auto Time Reset:
 Automatically reset wait times to defaults at a specified time.
Guest Count Settings
Guest Count Methods:
 Choose how guest counts are calculated for different order methods.
Amount Threshold:
 Set the amount that triggers an additional guest count.
Max Prompt Entry:
 Set the maximum number of guests that can be entered manually.
Popup Confirmations
Disable Confirmations:
 Disable confirmation boxes for kitchen ticket reprints, delivery orders, and orders without payment.
Scenarios for Using POS Settings
Managing Payment Methods
:
Scenario: A small café decides to stop accepting checks.
Solution: Set “Accept Checks” to “No” in the General Settings.
Handling Large Orders
:
Scenario: A busy restaurant wants to ensure customer names print on kitchen tickets for large orders.
Solution: Enable “For Here Customer Name” and “To Go Customer Name” in the General Settings.
Speeding Up Checkout
:
Scenario: A fast-food chain wants to reduce wait times at the checkout.
Solution: Use the Quick Tender buttons in Checkout Settings to allow employees to quickly enter common payment amounts.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Auto EOD

Overview
The following settings allow you to configure the Auto EOD settings. Auto EOD will run the End Of Day automatically based on the configurations you set below.
Automated Services
 
Enable Automated End of Day Services
Server Terminal 
This terminal is the terminal where automated services will take place. This should be the primary server terminal of the system(if not some services will fail). Only terminals that have been connected will appear here as an option. Please be aware that this setting may be available in other areas of the back office for other automated services. Changing it will change it everywhere.
Auto EOD
Enable Auto EOD to be run at the specified time
Auto EOD Terminal
This terminal is the terminal where the auto EOD will be completed. Only terminals that have been connected will appear here as an option.
Auto Batch
Enable Auto Batch toe be run at the specified time
Auto Batch Terminal
This terminal is the terminal where the auto batch will be completed. Only terminals that are able to run the batch should be set. Only terminals that have been connected will appear here as an option.
Auto Start Hours
This is the hour the auto EOD/Batch will start.
Auto Start Minute
This is the minute the auto EOD/Batch will start.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Table Service Settings

Overview
The following settings allow you to configure the Table Service Settings.
Assign Sections
Determines whether a table section is assigned to a server upon clocking in. Sections must be setup in Settings -> Table Sections.
Advanced Tables Statuses
If turned on, advanced table statuses will be used.
Auto Table Reset
Determines whether a table is automatically set to open when all tickets are cashed out.
Table Check
If turned on, servers can not clock out with open tables.
Open Gratuity
Determines whether gratuity amount can be entered when gratuity is added.
Gratuity
Determines whether gratuity is added before or after tex.
Gratuity Includes Discounts
Determines whether gratuity is calculated including or excluding discounts.
Gratuity Amount
Percentage of gratuity added to tickets.
Gratuity Edit
Determines whether gratuity can be edited on the checkout screen. This also enables Auto gratuity thresholds.
Gratuity Edit Default Type
Determines whether gratuity defaults to amount or percentage. This also enables Auto gratuity thresholds.
Gratuity Includes Non-Payments Fees
Determines whether gratuity is calculated including or excluding fees that are not payment fees. Payment fees are never included in gratuity calculation.
Number of Guests
Prompts for number of guests when a table is opened.
Drinks Per Guest
Prompts when number of drinks is not equal or greater than number of guests.
Server Accept Cash
Determines whether a server can accept a cash transaction.
Server Accept Credit
Determines whether a server can accept a credit transaction.
Server Accept Check
Determines whether a server can accept a check transaction.
Server Accept Gift Card
Determines whether a server can accept a gift card transaction.
Action After Send
Determines what action takes place after sending an order.
Print Button
Determines whether a print button appears at the top of the screen allowing users to print all tickets.
Table Service Checkout Button
Determines whether the checkout button will appear in the bottom right on table orders.
Exempt Gift Cards From Gratuity
Determines whether or not gift cards are exempt from Gratuity.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Accept Cash

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS
 
> 
General Settings
​
   
 
Determines if Cash is an accepted payment method. If set to “
No
” then the Cash payment method will be removed from Tills and Banks.
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Accept Credit

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 
> 
General Settings
​
Determines if Credit is an accepted payment method. If set to “
No”
 then the Credit payment method will be removed from Tills and Banks
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Accept Checks

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS
 
> 
General Settings
​
Determines if Checks are an accepted payment method. If set to “
No”
 then the Checks payment method will be removed from Tills and Banks
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Accept Gift Cards

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS
​
Determines if Gift Cards are an accepted payment method. If set to “
No
” then the Cash payment method will be removed from Tills and Banks
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Claim Tips

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS
 
> 
General Settings
​
Used in conjunction with 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Employees
 > 
Job
 
Manager
 > 
Edit
 
Job
 > Claimed Tips. If both are set to “
Yes
” then when an employee clocks out they will be prompted to enter their tip total for the day.  The amount they entered will be visible in the Claimed tips report
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Change Tips

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS
 
> 
General Settings
​
Determines if Employees can change their credit tips. If Set to “
No
” then credit transactions with tips will not show in the “
Add Tips
” list. The privilege of “
View all tips
” overrides this setting. If “View all tips” is set to “
Yes
” then the employee will always be able to change their tips. 
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Tip Confirmation

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines if a confirmation window appears when entering credit card tips.
 
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Tip Entry Method

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
“
Tip
 
Total
” means you enter the tip only. Or “
Grand
 
Total
” which means you would enter the tip and the transaction amount and tip added together and the system would work out what the tip should be
Options
Tip Total/Grand Total
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Claim Tips Include Credit Tips

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines if credit tips are to be included when claiming tips.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Acceptable Claim Percentage

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
The percentage over or under electronically documented tips that claimed tips should be within.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Tip After Account

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether the program will ask for a tip after adding an order to an account.
Options
On/Off
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Custom Item

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Allows a custom item and price to be entered.
Options
On/Off
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Custom Modifier

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Allows a custom modifier and price to be entered.
Options
On/Off
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Credit Processing

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Credit processing should be turned on if using the POS system to process credit cards. Credit processing should be turned off if using a separate terminal for credit processing.
Options
On/Off
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Authorize Bar Tabs

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Authorizes
 a credit card for bar tabs. Credit processing is required.
Options
On/Off
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Disable PreAuth Button

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Removes the Pre Auth button under Order Functions.
Options
On/Off
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Authorize Confirm Windows

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether a window stating the card was authorized appears after authorizing a card.
Options
On/Off
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Confirm Tab Name

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether a window confirming the bar tab name appears if name is pulled from credit authorization.
Options
On/Off
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Adjust Payments

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines if payments can be adjusted for takeout and delivery orders when using DataCap processing. "
Incremental Auth
" is required for this functionality to work.
Options
On/Off
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Open Order Pre-Auth EOD/Batch Override

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines if when there are open orders with pre-auth payments the user can override running the EOD or batch. An example of this is if a paid for ticket is adjusted and not closed back out for takeout or delivery orders scheduled in the future.
Options
On/Off
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Auto Process Offline at Batch

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Enables automatically processing offline transactions when the batch is run.
Options
On/Off
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Disable Manual Process Offline

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Disables processing offline transactions before batch when "
Auto Process Offline at Batch
" is turned on.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Credit Un-Apply Void

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Allows the user to unapply credit transactions instead of voiding them when voiding an order with credit transactions.
Options
On/Off
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Void Un-Applied Credit At Batch

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
When enabled the system will void all un-applied credit transactions prior to batching.
Options
On/Off
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Clear Credit on Order Change

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
When enabled the system will unapply or void credit transaction applied to a ticket when adding/removing items, adding/removing priced modifiers, changing an item.
Options
Void
Unapply
Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: DataCap Surcharge With Lookup

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether when there is a credit payment fee on an order and DataCap processing is being used, the fee is sent as a Surcharge to DataCap. DataCap will not charge the surcharge if the transaction is a Debit transaction.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: DataCap SAF Surcharge

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether when DataCap Surcharge With Lookup is enabled, if payment fees are included or excluded when in SAF mode.
Options
On/Off
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Retail Order Number

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Asks for an order number that prints on the receipts for retail orders.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Takeout Order Number

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Asks for an order number that prints on the receipts for takeout orders.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Delivery Order Number

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Asks for an order number that prints on the receipts for delivery orders.
​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Bar Order Number

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Asks for an order number that prints on the receipts for bar orders.
​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Bar Order Guests

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Asks for the number of guests when placing a bar order.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: For Here Number

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Asks for the order number for a for here order.
​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: For Here Customer Name

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Asks for the customer name for For Here orders.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Togo Customer Name

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Asks for the customer name for togo orders.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: ToGo Number

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Asks for the order number for a ToGo order.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Drive Thru Customer Name

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Asks for the customer name for drive thru orders.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Retail Customer Name

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Asks for the customer name for retail orders.
​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Table Customer Selection

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Require customer selection for table orders.
​​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Table Tab Customer Selection

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Require customer selection for bar orders.
​
​​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: For Here Customer Selection

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Require customer selection for for here orders.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: ToGo Customer Selection

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Require customer selection for ToGo orders.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Drive Thru Customer Selection

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Require customer selection for drive thru orders.
​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Retail Customer Selection

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Require customer selection for retail orders.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Removal Reason

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Prompts for a reason when removing an item that does not require a manager override.
​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Invoice Totals Entry

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether invoice total entries are enabled for invoices. If enabled, invoices cannot be created when there is a difference in the invoice total entries and the total of goods received.
​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Authorize Amount

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Authorizes a credit card for bar tabs. Credit processing is required.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Prompt for Authorize Amount

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether a prompt for amount is given to the user when authorizing a credit card.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Deposit Tax Method

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether a prompt for amount is given to the user when authorizing a credit card.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Save Tab Immediate

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether a tab is saved before or after ringing items.
​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Deposit Tax Code

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines the taxcode used on deposits, if applicable.
Options
Tax Exempt/Default Taxrate
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Clock In Message

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
This message will display to employees when they clock in.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Back Up Prompt Days

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Prompts to create backup if a backup has not been made in set number of days..
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Previous Year Stats

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether the previous years stats appear on dashboard, end of day, and notifications.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Barcode Scanning

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether the scan items button appears.
​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Rounding Off

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Rounds the grand total of the order to the nearest amount. For example: to round to the nearest quarter, enter 0.25.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Rounding Taxcode

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Need to charge tax on the amount used to calculate rounding? Choose it here. 
Note
: This should be a reverse tax, otherwise rounding will not be as expected.
Options
Tax Exempt/Default Taxrate
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Rounding Print Display

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Need to charge tax on the amount used to calculate rounding? Choose it here. 
Note
: This should be a reverse tax, otherwise rounding will not be as expected.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Rounding Includes Payment Fees

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines if rounding off for payments that include payment service fees or only for non payment service fee payments.
Note
: Rounding is not fully supported with payment based service fees. Support. includes rounding to either the pre service charge amount or the post service charge amount. The system will not turn off any rounding additions to the total for specific payment methods.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Calculate Fee Taxes in Payment Fees

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
If turned on, when a payment fee is calculated includes taxes and the payment fee is taxed, the payment fee will attempt to calculate the tax that will be applied based on its final price.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Show Payment Fee Totals

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
If turned on, when there is a payment fee on an order and the Show Totals button is pressed on the order screen, both the cash and credit totals will be displayed.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Order ID Type

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determine whether to display a random or sequential Order ID.
Options
Random/Sequential
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Paid Break Title

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines the title of the paid break button. Only enabled when integrated with ScheduleGofer.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Unpaid Break Title

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines the title of the unpaid break button. Only enabled when integrated with ScheduleGofer.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Scales Export

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether scales export page is available
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Show I.A.N

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether the Item Availability Notice button appears on the login screen.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Internet Timeout

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines the timeout setting in milliseconds that an API will fail to an internet service (Google Maps, OrderCounter API, etc.)
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Change Order Method

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether employees can change the order method by going to Order Functions -> Order Method.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Late Order Mins

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Creates a notification when an pending order is late this amount of minutes.
​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Ticket Item Order

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether new items show on the top or bottom of the order screen.
Options
New Item On Bottom/New Item On Top
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Table Tab Prompts

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether a prompt appears when saving a bar tab or canceling a PreAuth.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Auto Clear For Here Orders

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether pending For Here orders are automatically cleared at EOD, Till/Bank close, and auto sign off.
​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Auto Clear ToGo Orders

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether pending ToGo orders are automatically cleared at EOD, Till/Bank close, and auto sign off.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Auto Clear Drive Thru Orders

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether pending drive thru orders are automatically cleared at EOD, Till/Bank close, and auto sign off.
​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Auto Clear Retail Orders

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether pending retail orders are automatically cleared at EOD, Till/Bank close, and auto sign off.
​​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Confirm Fast Cash

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether a confirmation step is required for fast cash.
​​​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Combine Bar Tabs Method

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether combining bar tabs will add the tabs to separate ticketed or one ticket on the combined tab.
Options
Separate Tickets/One Ticket
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Quick Sign In Reset

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether the quick sign in list is reset when closing tills or performing end of day.
Options
Close Till/End Of Day
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Tip Notice Percentage

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
The percentage over subtotal to highlight tip line in red on add tips screen.
Options
Close Till/End Of Day
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Reopen Unsaved Tabs

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether a prompt to continue working on last tab will be displayed if the last tab was not saved.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Modifier Order

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether the modifiers mods will show in ascending or descending order on the ticket screen.
​
Options
Descending/Ascending
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Modifier Print Order Mode

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether the modifiers mods print priority adjusts the print priority of the modifier or replaces it.
Options
Replace/Adjust
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Redeem Larger Deposits

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Allow users to redeem deposits with amounts over the balance due.
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Default Custom Item Tax

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
The tax code that is preselected when creating a new custom item.
Options
Tax Exempt/Default Taxrate
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Gift Cards On Account

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether Gift Cards can be charged to Accounts when being sold. This feature is not supported with Cash Basis turned on.
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Tips On Accounts

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether tips can be added to orders that were closed to accounts.
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Add Tip Auto Decimal

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether when adding tips the pop up already includes a decimal point(requires user to enter 500 for $5.00 tip).
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Enable Fiscal Invoices

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether Fiscal Invoices can be printed under View Transaction.
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Auto Customer Lookup

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether the a customer is looked for or created at pre-auth automatically.
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Modifier Mods Stay Down

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether modifier mod buttons will stay selected until pressed a second time.
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Save And Send Retail

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Enables the save and send button for retail Orders.
​
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Default Pending Order Sort

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Changes the sort order on the pending orders sort.
​
​
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Show Tare

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Displays the tare next to the item on the cart.
​​​
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Tax By Order Method (Setup)

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
This will allow you to designate a different tax code to menu items based on the order method. It will override tax code 1 for all items that are set up to allow tax code override.
​​​
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Manual Account Balance Adjustments

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
When active, no adjustments made in this way will be reflected in the system accounting.
Please use a sale, a refund, or a payment to the account to have balance changes reflected in system accounting.
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Custom Gift Card Item

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines the item custom gift card sales will be listed under.
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Maximum Tip

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Sets the maximum amount that a tip can be.
Some processors have a tip max which will override this setting.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Force Report Category Selection

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether a report category selection is required when creating or editing a menu item.
​
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Prepend Time to Item Name

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Adds the time the item was rang in front of the item name.
​​
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Force Order Scheduling

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
When active, the schedule order prompt will be displayed before checking out or saving retail, takeout, and delivery orders.
​
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Break Monitoring

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Turns on or off the break monitoring system, which will show alerts to employees that need to take breaks.
​
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Clear Payments

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Allow payments to a ticket to be cleared on the checkout screen.
Options
Yes/No
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Repeat Quantity

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines the quantity of an item when using the Repeat Item function: current quantity, always one, or prompt for quantity.
Options
Current Quantity/Always 1/Prompt
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Settle By Number Mode

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether using the settle by number function goes to the manage ticket screen or directly to checkout.
Options
Manage Tickets/Checkout
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Keep Server Transfer Ticket

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
If on, the server who originally had the table will stay on the table. 
If off, the server who is transferring the table will take the table. If prompt, the user will be asked who will have the table.
Options
On/Off/Prompt
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Keep Server Re-ring Ticket

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
If on, the server will be asked who will receive the funds for the transaction
If off, the server who will be re-ringing the ticket will receive the funds
Options
On/Off/Prompt
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Repeat Item Button

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Allow users to use the Repeat Item button to ring a copy of an item in.
Options
On/Off/Prompt
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Quantity Button

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Allow users to use the Quantity button to change the quantity of an item that was rang in.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: View Account Information

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
When this setting is off, account information will be hidden for add to/pending account screens on the POS. 
Only users with the view account privilege will be able to un-hide account information on add to/pending account.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Giftcard Digit Length

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Changes the accepted number of digits of a giftcard number.
 In order to update this number you must use the format: #,#,#. Example: 10,12,14
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: EBT Feature

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines if EBT Features are activated.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Show Promotions In Carts

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines if promotions show up as a line item in the cart on the order screen. 
When displayed this way, promotions can be removed from an order the same way items are removed.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Enable eGift Balance Popup at Checkout

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines if promotions show up as a line item in the cart on the order screen. 
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Set Scanned Items As Sent

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether a scanned item counts as being sent to kitchen when it is scanned it.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Require Customers on Orders

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Require a customer to be on an order before being able to check out.
​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Itemized Refunds

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Enables itemized refunds that require the user to scan receipts and only ring up items for the refund that were on the scanned receipts as long as those items have not already been refunded.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Allow Customer Card Lookup

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Enables looking up a customer card using the customer phone number or name when using advanced loyalty.
​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Default Comp Percentage

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Default percentage pre-selected when performing a comp.
​
Options
None/5%-100%
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Default Comp Reason

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Default reason pre-selected when performing a comp.
Options
Choose from your reasons. 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Data Grid Row Size

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines the row height of View Transactions and Add Tips.
Options
1x/2x
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Item Commissions

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Enables the commission system for items. When enabled, the back office item edit screen will show a commissions section that will allow the user to add a commission to a normal item.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Advances

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Enables the advances system for items. When enabled, a new item type called Advance is available. This type of item when rung up will remove its price from cash whenever it is sold. This also allows flat fees to be automatically added to an order when an item is added to the order.
​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Require Item Descriptions When Adding/Editing Items

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
When enabled, requires an item description to be added when adding or editing menu items.
​
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Attach Accounts To Orders

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
When enabled, an account can be attached to an order. If an order has an account attached to it, the account balance is taken into account when items are rung up. Items that cause the order to exceed the available account balance will notify the user that the account does not have enough remaining funds for the order.
This feature does not take edits to modifiers into account when checking the remaining account balance.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Account Violations Remove Item

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
When enabled, if an account is attached to an order and an items causes the order to exceed the remaining account balance, the item will be removed.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Remove Fees From Cash

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
General Settings
Determines whether or not non-sales fees are subtracted from cash or not on EOD, Quick, and Operations Reports.
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Automated Services

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
EOD Settings
Enable Automated End of Day Services
Options
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Server Terminal

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
EOD Settings
This terminal is the terminal where automated services will take place. 
should be the primary server terminal of the system.
If not some services will fail
Only terminals that have been connected will appear here as an option. Please be aware that this setting may be available in other areas of the back office for other automated services. Changing it will change it everywhere.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Auto EOD

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
EOD Settings
Enable Auto EOD to be run at the specified time
Options
: 
On/Off
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Auto EOD Terminal

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
EOD Settings
This terminal is the terminal where the auto EOD will be completed. 
Only terminals that have been connected will appear here as an option.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Auto Batch

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
EOD Settings
Enable Auto Batch to be run at the specified time.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Auto Batch Terminal

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
EOD Settings
This terminal is the terminal where the auto batch will be completed.
Only terminals that have been connected will appear here as an option.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Auto Start Hour

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
EOD Settings
This is the hour the auto EOD/Batch will start.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Auto Start Minute

This setting can be found in the
 Back Office 
under 
Settings
 > 
POS 
> 
EOD Settings
This is the minute the auto EOD/Batch will start.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Labor

Overview
Back Office > Settings > Labor
Settings
⦁
Work Week Starts – 
Choose a day the work week starts

Pay Period –  
Choose from

Weekly – 
Every Week

Bi-Weekly – 
Once every two weeks


      *
If you choose Bi-Weekly you will need to select whether the pay period ends this week or next week

Minimum Wage – 
Enter the Minimum wage amount. This will then highlight on reports the employees that fall below this amount. This is server wage + tips

Overtime – 
Choose from Percentage or Amount per hour. Enter the figure here

Overtime Hours – 
Enter the number of hours over which the employee will receive the overtime rate

Early Clock In Limit – 
No longer used. Replaced by Schedule Gopher settings

Tardy Notification – 
No longer used. Replaced by Schedule Gopher settings
	
Tardy Limit – 
How many minutes past the shift start time the employee can clock in without being considered Tardy. 

Late Clock Out Notification – 
No longer used. Replaced by Schedule Gopher settings

Late Clock Out Limit – 
No longer used. Replaced by Schedule Gopher settings

Salary Employees Percentage Per Hour
Labor Period Name – 
Enter a name for the labor period

Hours – 
Enter the hours that count as part of this labor perio
d

There are 5 labor periods. This allows you to split them up if you wish. For example, Lunch, Dinner etc
Changes or suggestions can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterlabor
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Customer Facing Display

The Customer Facing Display feature lets you add a screen for customers to see their order details and the total amount due. It can also capture customer signatures for credit transactions and allow them to add tips. This can be set up on a second screen attached to the cash register or on a separate device.
Settings
To set up the Customer Facing Display, go to:
Back Office > Settings > Rear Facing Customer Display
Key Settings
Thank You/Change Display Time
:
How long the thank you or change page is shown after a transaction, in milliseconds. For example, to display it for 3 seconds, enter 3000 milliseconds.
Customer Display Version
:
Use version 2.0 for the latest features.
Terminal
:
Select the terminal you want to use for the Customer Display and click "Edit".
Display Options
Customer Display
: Turn the display on or off.
Display Monitor
: Choose which screen to show the display on.
Separate Machine
: If set to “No,” the display will run on the same machine as the POS. If “Yes,” it will run on a different machine.
Display Font and Size
: Customize the font and size of text on the display.
Display Resolution
: Set the resolution to match your screen for a full-screen display.
Fade Transitions
: Enable fade effects for changing slides or pages.
Images and Prompts
Order Page Image
: Background image for the order page.
Change Page Image
: Background for the change page after payment.
Thanks Page Image
: Background for the thank you page.
Show Credit Prompt
: Display a prompt when using credit for payment.
Credit Page Image
: Background for the credit prompt.
Main Page Image
: Background when the display is idle.
Slide Timing
: Time each slide is displayed in seconds.
New Slide Image
: Add images to a slideshow.
Orientation
: Orientation of the signature form.
Show Signature
: Prompt for a signature after card payment.
Show Tips
: Prompt for a tip amount after a credit payment (not supported with PAX processing).
Tip Amount
: Set suggested tip amounts as a monetary value or percentage.
Signature/Tip Page Image
: Background for the signature/tip page.
Receipt Page Image
: Background for the receipt page.
Keyboard Page Image
: Background for the keyboard page for email receipts.
Basic Setup
Choose Software Version
:
Back Office > Settings > Rear Facing Customer Display > Customer Display Version
Select Terminal
:
Back Office > Settings > Rear Facing Customer Display > Customer Display
Choose your terminal number and click "Edit".
Enable Display
:
Set 
Customer Display
 to “On”.
Set 
Display Monitor
 to the desired screen.
Using a Customer Display on a Separate Machine
You can run the Customer Display on a different device, like a touchscreen tablet. This is useful if you want to avoid interruptions from till reboots or use a slideshow.
Steps:
Set Up Terminal
:
Make sure “Separate Machine” is set to “Yes”.
Install Software
:
Install OrderCounter on the separate device.
Sync Terminal Numbers
:
Set the terminal number on the new device to match the main terminal (e.g., both set to 001).
Create Shortcut
:
Create a shortcut to 
"C:\OCPOS\OCPOS - Point of Sale Suite.exe"
.
Edit the shortcut target to add 
Customer_Display
 at the end.
Calibrate Touch Screen
Search for
:
Win+S/Search for “Calibrate the screen for pen or touch input” or go to Control Panel > Hardware & Sound > Tablet PC Settings.
Setup
:
Follow prompts to touch both the merchant and customer side touch screens.
Practical Scenarios
Scenario 1: Retail Store Checkout
A customer is checking out items in a retail store. They can see each item scanned and the total amount on the Customer Facing Display, ensuring transparency and accuracy.
Scenario 2: Restaurant Payment
In a restaurant, after dining, a customer can review their bill, add a tip, and sign for a credit card payment directly on the Customer Facing Display.
Scenario 3: Promotional Display
A café uses the Customer Facing Display on a separate tablet to run a slideshow of daily specials and promotions. This continues even if the main till is restarted, keeping customers engaged.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Tills

This guide is designed to help you understand how to manage your tills (cash drawers) and banks (money belts) in OrderCounter. We'll explain the settings and how they affect your daily operations in simple terms.
General Till Settings
Till Type:
Tills
: These are the cash drawers where money is kept.
Banks
: These are money belts that employees wear. They help keep track of all payment types through the "bank" on the till.
Group Till:
Any employee can use the till and take orders. All money from these orders goes into the till.
Strict Till:
Only employees assigned as cashiers can use the tills for payments. You can assign cashiers in the Control Panel.
Pay In/Outs:
Decides if pay ins/outs can be done from personal banks and tills or just tills.
Credit Over Tender:
Determines if a card payment can be made for more than the total amount. Extra money can go to tips or be given back as cash.
Check Over Tender:
Same as Credit Over Tender but for checks.
Gift Card Over Tender:
Same as Credit Over Tender but for gift cards.
Other Over Tender:
Same as Credit Over Tender but for other types of payments.
Default Starting Amount:
The amount of cash you start with in the till at the beginning of the day. You can choose the default amount or enter a custom amount.
Fee Split Groups:
Determines if tips are split into different fee groups.
Default Fee Group:
The main group used to split tips or fees.
Retain Credit Tip Percentage:
Percentage of credit card tips kept by the restaurant.
Retain Gratuity Percentage:
Percentage of gratuity kept by the restaurant.
Personal Bank Settings
Personal banks are money belts worn by employees. This makes them like a cash drawer.
Default Starting Amount:
The amount of money a personal bank starts with.
Table/Bar/Retail/Takeout/Delivery Orders:
Allows employees without a till to handle these types of orders and have the funds go to their personal bank.
Driver Banks:
If on, funds from delivery orders go to the delivery driver bank. If off, funds stay where they were originally assigned.
Banks - Check for Open Orders:
Ensures that all open orders (tables, bar tabs, takeout, delivery, retail) are checked before closing a bank or till.
Cash Drawer Opens
Settings that control when the cash drawer opens
Cash Refund
: Opens on a cash refund.
Credit Refund
: Opens on a credit refund.
Check Refund
: Opens on a check refund.
Gift Card Refund
: Opens on a gift card refund.
Account Refund
: Opens on an account refund.
Cash Void
: Opens on a cash void.
Credit Void
: Opens on a credit void.
Check Void
: Opens on a check void.
Gift Card Void
: Opens on a gift card void.
Adjustment Settings
Settings for end-of-day adjustments:
Adjustments Required
: You need to enter counts for each payment type at the end of the day.
Cash Calculator
: Helps you calculate cash by entering the quantities of different denominations.
Show Expected Values
: Shows expected values for payment methods when entering adjustments.
Scenarios Where You Would Reference This Guide
New Employee Training:
 When a new cashier is learning how to use the tills and personal banks.
End-of-Day Procedures:
 When a manager needs to ensure all payments and adjustments are properly accounted for.
Handling Refunds and Voids:
 When a customer requests a refund or a transaction needs to be voided, and you need to know if the cash drawer will open.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Starting And Ending The Day

Overview
Starting the day means putting the tills into a position where employees have a way to settle a check.
Ending the day is declaring that the tills are closed and taking an account of the money
Starting the Day
Opening a till
There are 2 ways to take money. Either through the 
Till
, which means a cash draw. Or by using a Personal Bank, which means money belts. 
Both of these are just virtual locations that the reports will reflect. They will either say the money is in the till or the bank (money belt)
There are 2 different types of Tills, 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Tills
 > 
Till
 
Types
“Group Till”
 – Any employee will be allowed to settle a check. Any money taken will go to the till
“
Strict Till
” - Only employees that are assigned as a cashier to the till can use the tills to take payments. You can assign a cashier in 
Control
 
Panel
 > 
Till
 
and
 
Back
 
Manager
. Select 'Add Cashier' and then the employee from the drop-down box and click “
Add User
” 
Personal Banks are set on or off for each order type. This affects all employees that use that order type. So either all employees can use personal banks for an order type or none of them can.
This Is set in Back Office > Settings > Tills > under the “Personal Bank Settings” section there are settings for 
Table Order
Bar Order
Retail Order
Takeout Ordre
Delivery Order
Starting Amount
Driver banks
To settle a check, an employee needs to be assigned to a till (strict till), use group tills or have personal banks enabled for that order type.
If you are assigned to a till or are using group tills but  are not allowed personal banks then the money will go to the cash draw. If you have a personal banks allowed  but no till open or assigned then the money will go to your personal bank. If you have both, then the money will go to your cash draw
You also need to be able to settle to at least one payment method
  These settings can be found in The 
Back Office
 >  
Settings
 > 
Pos
 > 
Table Service section. 
Again, these settings are store wide. 
Server Accept Cash
Server Accept Credit
Server Accept Check
Server Accept Gift Card
Server Accept Gift Certificate
Scenario 1
 – Personal Banks are not used and anyone can settle a check using the till (group till)
Go to the front end > 
 > 
 > 
You will then be asked for the open till amount. One option will be the default amount set in 
Back Office 
>
 Settings 
>
 Tills 
>
 Default Starting Amount. 
 The other option will be a custom amount. This is asking how much money is in the cash draw right now. How much are you starting with?
You need to have permission per employee to open a till. This is set in 
Back Office 
>
 Employees 
>
 Privileges 
> 
Ltd Till Open
. This need to be set to “Yes”
You will now be able to take payments
Scenario 2
 – Personal Banks are not used and only people assigned to the till are allowed to settle a check (Strict Till)
Follow the steps above to open the till. You must add a cashier to the till in order to take payments
Go to the front end > 
 > 
 > 
You need to have permission per employee to assign cashiers. This is set in 
Back Office 
>
 Employees 
>
 Privileges 
>  
Mgr Till/Bank Open/Assign
Enter your passcode
Pick an employee from the list
That employee will now be able to take payments
Scenario 3
 – 
Only Personal Banks
 are used. There are 
No Cashdraws
.
In this case you would set the till to be “
Strict
” but not assign anyone to the till.
You would enable personal banks for the order type you intend to use
 The first time you settle a check, the system will try and open a personal back for you. 
You will be presented with this message
There is a security setting that sets if you are allowed to do this. 
Back Office 
>
 Employees 
>
 Privileges 
> 
Ltd Bank Open and Ltd Bank Close
Enter the passcode for an employee with the correct privilege
You will now be able to settle checks
Scenario 4
 – you want to use personal banks and tills. 
You will want to set the 
Till
 to be 
Strict
 and 
enable
 
Personal
 
Banks
 for the order type you wish to use. 
Do
 
not
 assign the people with personal banks to the till. If you do then any money processed by them will go the till and not the bank.
Ending the Day
Closing a bank or a till is you telling the system that you are finished with that till or bank and you are ready to count up the money and make sure it matches.
You can close out a till and bank before running the end of day. This is what is recommended. However Running the EOD will actually close the tills and banks at every till but will assume that the money count is perfect and there is no variance
There are several reports that print out from the receipt printer when you run the end of day. These can be enabled or disabled from 
Back Office 
>
 Settings 
>
 POS 
under
 the End of Day 
/
 Reports
I Suggest you turn them all on and then look to see which ones you think will be useful and disable the rest
Closing a Till
 
Go to the front end > 
 > 
 > 
You need to have permission per employee to close a till. This is set in 
Back Office 
>
 Employees 
>
 Privileges 
> 
Ltd Till Close
. This need to be set to “Yes”
    2. Enter a Passcode
The till at this point is closed. You could if you wanted to open another till at this time. Now you can view the closed till and decide if you want to perform a declaration. That is to count the money, enter it and see if there is a variance. 
This is referred to as 
closing out the till
      3. Click on 
You need to have permission per employee to view a closed till. This is set in 
Back Office 
>
 Employees 
>
 Privileges 
>
View Closed 
Tills/Banks
Enter a passcode
Choose a Till or Bank from the list
Click on 
You will then get a screen where you can enter the amount for each settlement type
 
You can turn 
off
 the expected amounts by changing 
Back Office 
>
 Settings 
>
 Pos 
>
 Show Expected Values 
to
 
“
Off
”
If there is a variance in the amount entered then you will get a warning saying there is a variance and will be asked if you would like to accept. 
If there are multiple tills open then close out the rest in the same way. 
After the till is closed a Till report will print from the receipt printer 
Till Report
Terminal 001
Drawer #1
Till Reference # 38
11/26/2018 9:02 AM
Starting Amount               
 
$300.00
Transaction Totals
Cash Transactions (1) 
 
$39.41
Total Transactions (1)                
 
$39.41
Tip & Gratuity Totals
Total Tips$
 
0.00
Expected Totals
Expected Cash                
 
$339.41
Expected Total                     
 
$339.41
Employee Stats
Pay Ins (0)                          
 
$0.00
Pay Outs (0)                         
 
$0.00
Guests                                   1
On Account (0)      
 
$0.00
Discounts (0)             
 
$0.00
Comps (0)                    
 
$0.00
Pre Send Removals (0)          
 
$0.00
Post Send Removals (0)         
 
$0.00
Guests                                   
 
1
Average Check                       
 
$37.00
Category Sales
Category Sales             
 
$37.00
Employee Sales
Lee Furness                       
 
$39.41
Tax Code Sales
Default Taxrate Sales:            
 
$37.00
Default Taxrate Collected:         
 
$2.41
Till/Bank Closeouts
Till/Bank Closeouts
Till/Bank Cash Total           
 
$0.00
Cash Totals
Cash Expected                 
 
$339.41
- Starting Funds                
 
($300.00)
+ Tll/Bank Closeout Cash          
 
$0.00
Cash Deposit                      
 
$39.41
Register Totals
Cash Deposit Total                
 
$39.41
Pay Outs (0)                         
 
$0.00
Discounts (0)                    
 
$0.00
Non Cash Deposit Total         
 
$0.00
On Account (0)                                
 
$0.00
Grand Total                          
 
$39.41
Sales Totals           
 
$37.00
+ Tax Collected    
 
$2.41
- Discounts                  
 
$0.00
+ Tip Discount             
 
$0.00
- On Account               
 
$0.00
+ Pay Ins                       
 
$0.00
- Pay Outs                                            
 
$0.00
+ Starting Cash              
 
$300.00
Expected Total        
 
$339.41
11/26/2018 9:02 AM
EMP SIGN: _______________________________
MGR SIGN: _______________________________
Total Attached: __________________
Closing A Bank
Go to the front end > 
 > 
All of the banks will be listed under “
Personal
 
Banks
”
If 
Back Office 
>
 Employees 
>
 Privileges 
> 
Ltd Bank Info 
is
 
set
 
to
 
“
Yes
” then the employee will be able to see the expected amounts on their bank but will not be able to see anybody else’s. 
If 
Back Office 
>
 Employees 
>
 Privileges 
> 
Ltd Bank Info 
is
 
set
 
to
 
“
No
” then the expected amounts will be hashed out as shown here.
If you are setting up a manager and you want them to be able to see the expected amounts for all Personal Banks then set 
Back Office 
>
 Employees 
>
 Privileges 
> 
Mgr Till/Bank Info  
to
 
“
Yes
”
     2. Go to the front end > 
 > 
  > Select the bank > 
 
You need to have permission per employee to close a Bank. This is set in 
Back Office 
>
 Employees 
>
 Privileges 
> 
Ltd Bank Close
. This need to be set to “Yes”
Enter a Passcode
At this point the Bank is closed. You could if you wanted to open another bank at this time. Now you can view the closed Bank and decide if you want to perform a declaration. That is to count the money, enter it and see if there is a variance.
Lots of customers decide not to do this step on banks as if there is a variance the employee will be expected to pay the difference. However, if you wish to preform a declaration this is how you do so.
      4. Click on 
 
You need to have permission per employee to view a closed till. This is set in 
Back Office 
>
 Employees 
>
 Privileges 
>
View Closed Tills/Banks
      
Select the bank you wish to close then select  
You can now enter your declaration and select 
Agree to a variance if the variance is correct
At this point you will receive a “
Server Bank Report
” from the receipt printer
Server Bank Report
Lee Furness
11/26/2018 10:46 AM
Transaction Totals
Credit Transactions (1)             
 
$15.98
Total Transactions (1)              
 
$15.98
Tip & Gratuity Totals
Credit Tips                          
 
$2.99
Total Tips                           
 
$2.99
CExpected Totals
Expected Cash                      
 
($2.99)
Expected Credit                    
 
 $18.97
Expected Total                      
 
$15.98
Employee Stats
Discounts (0)                        
 
$0.00
Comps (0)                            
 
$0.00
Pre Send Removals (0)                
 
$0.00
Post Send Removals (0)               
 
$0.00
Guests                                   
 
1
Average Check                       
 
$15.00
Category Sales
Default Category Sales              
 
$15.00
Cash Totals
Cash Expected                      
 
($2.99)
- Starting Funds                     
 
$0.00
Cash Deposit                       
 
($2.99)
Total Cash Due: 
 
($2.99)
EMP SIGN:______________________________
MGR SIGN:______________________________
End of Day
Once all 
Tills
 and 
Banks
 are closed you can perform the “
End Of Day
”
If you perform the “
End Of Day
” without closing the 
Tills
 and 
Banks
 then they will be closed automatically and it will be assumed that the declaration is perfect and there are no variances
All transactions 
must
 be complete in order for the 
Tills
 and 
Banks
 to close when running “
End Of Day
”
 
Go to the front end > 
 > 
 > 
The end of day will now run
You will get several reports print at this point and a backup will be performed
Some of the reports can be disabled from 
Back Office 
>
 Settings 
>
 POS 
under
 the End of Day 
/
 Reports
If you have not already closed the 
Tills
 and 
Banks
 then the reports that print when they are closed will now print. 
The report that will always print is the “
End of Day Report
” This reports figures are from 
all
 of the 
Tills
 and 
all
 of the 
Banks
 
combined
End of Day Report
11/26/2018 11:09 AM
Gross Sales:                       
 
$129.93
Refunds (0):                        
 
 $0.00
Discounts (0):                       
 
$0.00
Comps (0):                           
 
$0.00
Pay Ins:                             
 
$0.00
Pay Outs:                            
 
$0.00
Fees Collected:                      
 
$0.00
On Account:                          
 
$0.00
Adjusted Gross:                    
 
$129.93
Tax Collected:                     
 
($7.94)
Giftcards Sold (0):                  
 
$0.00
On Account:                          
 
$0.00
Pay Ins:                             
 
$0.00
Pay Outs:                            
 
$0.00
Net Sales:                         
 
$121.99
Deposit Summary
Cash Trans (2):                     
 
$60.71
Cash Gratuity:                       
 
$0.00
Tips Collected                     
 
($2.99)
Pay Ins:                             
 
$0.00
Pay Outs:                            
 
$0.00
Fees Collected:                      
 
$0.00
Cash Gratuity:                       
 
$0.00
Cash Refunds (0):                    
 
$0.00
Cash Event Deposits:                 
 
$0.00
Cash Deposit Expected:              
 
$57.72
Credit Trans (2):                   
 
$69.22
Online Credit Trans (0):             
 
$0.00
Credit Tips:                         
 
$2.99
Credit Refunds (0):                  
 
$0.00
Credit Event Deposits:               
 
$0.00
Credit Deposit Expected:            
 
$72.21
Check Trans (0):                     
 
$0.00
Check Tips:                          
 
$0.00
Check Refunds (0):                   
 
$0.00
Check Event Deposits:                
 
$0.00
Check Deposit Expected:              
 
$0.00
Gift Card Trans (0):                 
 
$0.00
Gift Card Tips:                      
 
$0.00
Gift Card Refunds (0):               
 
$0.00
Gift Card Event Deposits:            
 
$0.00
Gift Card Deposit Expected:          
 
$0.00
Other Payment Trans (0):             
 
$0.00
Other Tips:                          
 
$0.00
Other Payment Event Deposits:        
 
$0.00
Other Payment Expected:              
 
$0.00
Expected Deposit:                  
 
$129.93
Event Deposits:                      
 
$0.00
Adj Gross:                         
 
$129.93
Discounts (0):                       
 
$0.00
Comps (0):                           
 
$0.00
Pay Ins:                             
 
$0.00
Pay Outs:                            
 
$0.00
On Account:                          
 
$0.00
Fees Collected:                      
 
$0.00
Gross Sales:                       
 
$129.93
Expected Deposit Total:            
 
$129.93
Deposit Adjustment:               
 
($44.73)
Actual Deposit Total:               
 
$85.20
Accounts Invoiced:                   
 
$0.00
Giftcards Sold (0):                  
 
$0.00
Giftcards Redeemed (0):              
 
$0.00
Voided Transactions (0):             
 
$0.00
Refunds (0):                         
 
$0.00
Table Orders (4):                  
 
$129.93
Bar Orders (0):                      
 
$0.00
Retail (0):                          
 
$0.00
Takeout (0):                         
 
$0.00
Delivery (0):                        
 
$0.00
For Here (0):                        
 
$0.00
To Go (0):                           
 
$0.00
Drive Thru (0):                      
 
$0.00
Account Payments (0):               
 
$0.00
Deposits (0):                        
 
$0.00
Guests:                                  
 
4
Transactions:                            
 
4
Payments:                                
 
4
Average Net Trans:                  
 
$30.50
Average Net Payment Trans:         
 
$30.50
Pre Submit Removals (0):            
 
$0.00
Post Submit Removals (0):            
 
$0.00
Other Payment Methods
Troubleshooting
What to do if you get this message
​
This message will appear if you are using tills but have not opened a till
If you are using strict tills but have not been assigned to the till
Are using personal banks but personal banks have not been enabled for that order type
Changes or suggestions can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercountersaetd
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Access Controls

Access controls are settings that allow or restrict access to various parts of the OrderCounter system. These controls ensure only authorized employees can perform certain actions.
Logging In
  
You can log into the system using a passcode, a swipe card, or a fingerprint.
Passcode
Setup:
 Set from Back Office > Employee Manager > Passwords.
Pros:
 No extra equipment needed, easy setup.
Cons:
 Must remember passcode, potential for someone to see and misuse it.
Swipe Card
Setup:
 Swipe card and copy the code to the Password/Card Number box in Employee Manager.
Pros:
 Quick and secure, no passcode needed.
Cons:
 Requires purchase of swipe card reader and cards.
Fingerprint
Setup:
 Scan fingerprint in the Front End.
Pros:
 Highly secure, no passcode or card needed.
Cons:
 Requires purchase of fingerprint readers, may not work for all users.
Quick Sign On
Setup:
 Enable from the Front End settings.
Pros:
 Fast login without passcode.
Cons:
 Less secure, as anyone can log in without entering a code.
Overrides
  
Overrides are security settings that control access to specific actions in the system, such as opening a till or voiding an item. Overrides can be set to require permission from certain employees.
Setup:
Go to Back Office > Settings > Overrides.
Turn on the desired override, e.g., change "No Sale" to "On."
Assign permissions to employees via Back Office > Employees > Privileges.
Example:
 To allow an employee to perform a "No Sale":
Turn on the "No Sale" override.
Give the employee the "No Sale" privilege.
Overrides List
  
Here is a list of all overrides and their corresponding Employee/Job privileges:
Override
Where it Applies
Employee/Job Privilege
No Sale
Prevents pressing control panel > no sale button
No Sale - All Tills, No Sale – Assigned Tills
Custom Option
Order Functions > Custom Modifier. Override if modifier has a price or not
Custom Option
Custom Option W/Price
Order Functions > Custom Modifier. Override if modifier has a price
Custom Option with price
Custom Item
Order Functions > Custom Item
Custom Item
Custom Item w/price
Order Functions > Custom Item. Override if Item has a price
Custom Item w/price
Remove Items
When removing an item from the receipt box
Remove Item
Change Times
Changing Delivery/Takeout prep times
Edit Wait Times
Void Transactions
Control Panel > View Transactions > Highlight Transaction > Void Transaction
Voids
Refund
Control Panel > Issue Refund
Refunds
Approve delivery Address
When delivery zones are setup, if an address is outside the zones
Delivery Address
Cancel takeout
Pending Orders > Takeout > Select order > Cancel
Cancel Takeout
Cancel Delivery
Pending Orders > Delivery > Select order > Cancel Order
Cancel Delivery
Cancel Drive Thru
Pending Orders > Drive Thru > Select order > Cancel
Cancel Drive Thru
Fail Delivery
Pending Orders > Deliveries > Out Delivery Orders > Delivery Failed
Fail Delivery
View Transactions
Control Panel > View Transactions
View Transactions
Add Gratuity
Tickets Screen > GRAT
Gratuity
Edit Price
Select item on > Edit Price
Price Edit
Edit Customer Database
Control Panel > Customer Database
Edit Customer Database
Pay In/Pay Out
Control Panel > Pay In & Pay Out
Pay In/Pay Out
Depleted Items
Shows when selling an item that has counter enabled and has reached zero
Add Depleted Items
Credit Reprint
Control Panel > View Transactions > Select credit payment > Reprint Credit Receipts
Reprint Credit
End of Day
Control Panel > End of Day
End of Day
Batch
Control Panel > Batch/Settle
Credit Batch
Add Fingerprint
Control Panel > Add Fingerprint
Add Fingerprint
Menu Management
Control Panel > Menu Management
Edit Menu
Comps
Select item in receipt box > Comp Item(s)
Comps
Exit
The x on the logon screen
Exit POS
Ignore Printer Error
Appears when ignoring a printer error
Ignore Printer Error
Transfer tables
Manage Tickets > Trans
Transfer All Tables, Transfer Own Tables
Non Default Job
When clocking in as a non-default job code
N/A
Drinks Per Guest
When drinks are less than number of guests
Drinks Per Guest
Tip Amount Override
To add a tip above a percentage of the total order
Tip Amount Override
Check Payment
When paying off a transaction using a check
Pay with Check
Scale Manual Entry
When scale is enabled and quantity is manually entered
Scale Override
Scale Item Removal
Scale Item Removal
N/A
Skip Credit Authorization
When bar tab authorization is declined/skipped
Skip Credit Authorization
Add to Account
Pay Screen > Add to Account
Accounts
Service Fees
Order Screen > Order Functions > Add Service Fees
Service Fees
Table Access
When trying to access a table you are not assigned to
Access All Tables
Consolidate Items
Order Screen > Consolidate Items
Consolidate Items
Open Till
Control Panel > Open Till
Ltd Till Open
Combine Bar Tab
Pending Orders > Bar Tabs screen > Combine
Combine Bar Tabs
Skip Break
Allows employee to skip a break
Skip Break
Continue Without Skipping Break
Override to continue without skipping a break
Continue Without Skipping Break
Custom Gift Card
Selling a custom gift card from order functions
Custom Gift Cards
Activate Gift Card
Pressing "Activate Gift Card" button in order functions
Activate Gift Cards
Employee Privileges
  
Employee privileges can be assigned to individuals or job roles, determining what actions they can perform.
Example:
 If managers and supervisors need similar access:
Create job roles for managers and supervisors.
Assign the necessary privileges to each role.
Assign the roles to the employees.
Employee Privilege
Where it Applies
Override
Abandon Offline Credit Transactions
When offline transactions are unsuccessful
N/A
Access All Tables
When accessing a table you are not assigned to
Table Access
Accounts
Pay Screen > Add to Account
Add To Account
Activate Gift Cards
Legacy and no longer used
N/A
Add Depleted items
When selling an item with counter enabled and has reached zero
Depleted item
Add Fingerprint
Control Panel > Add Fingerprint
Add Fingerprint
Add Tips
Adding tips
N/A
Add VIP Points
Always enabled
N/A
Assign Transaction
Assigning transaction when paying for a table not yours
N/A
Backup System
Legacy and no longer used
N/A
Cancel Delivery
Pending Orders > Delivery > Cancel Order
Cancel Delivery
Cancel Drive Thru
Pending Orders > Drive Thru > Cancel
Cancel Drive Thru
Cancel Takeout
Pending Orders > Takeout > Cancel
Cancel Takeout
Cash Draw
Determines if cash draw will open
N/A
Clock Overrides
Time Clock > Mgr Override In/Out
N/A
Clocked Out – General Access
General access without being clocked in
N/A
Clocked Out Overrides
Perform overrides without being clocked in
N/A
Close Banks With Open Sales
Close a Bank without closing all sales
N/A
Combine Bar Tabs
Pending Orders > Bar Tabs screen > Combine
Combine Bar Tab
Complete Delivery
Pending Orders > Deliveries > Complete Delivery
N/A
Comps
Select item in receipt box > Comp Item(s)
Comps
Consolidate Items
Order Screen > Consolidate Items
Consolidate Items
Credit Batch
Control Panel > Batch/Settle
Batch
Custom Item
Order Functions > Custom Item
Custom Item
Custom Item w/ Price
Order Functions > Custom Item
Custom Item w/ Price
Custom Option
Order Functions > Custom Modifier
Custom Option
Custom Option W/Price
Order Functions > Custom Modifier
Custom Option W/Price
Delivery Address
When delivery zones are setup
Approve Delivery Address
Drinks Per Guest
When drinks are less than guests
Drinks Per Guest
Edit Customer Database
Control Panel > Customer Database
Edit Customer Database
Edit Employees
Legacy, replaced by back office Privileges
N/A
Edit Employee Privileges
Legacy, replaced by back office Privileges
N/A
Edit Menu
Control Panel > Menu Management
Menu
Edit Price
Select item on > Edit Price
Price Edit
Edit Times
Legacy and no longer used
N/A
Edit Wait Times
Edit wait times for delivery/takeout
Change Times
Employee control Panel
Control Panel > Employee Control Panel
N/A
End of Day
Control Panel > End of Day
End of Day
Exit POS
The x on the logon screen
Exit
Fail Delivery
Pending Orders > Deliveries > Delivery Failed
Fail Delivery
Full menu Editing
Limits "Edit Menu" to setting item counters and availability
N/A
Gratuity
Manage Tickets Screen > GRAT
Add Gratuity
Ignore Printer Error
Ignoring a printer error
Ignore Printer Error
Kitchen Tickets
Control Panel > Kitchen Tickets
N/A
Labor Reports
Control Panel > Reports > Employee Reports
N/A
Ltd Bank Close
Control Panel > Till and Bank Manager > Close Bank
N/A
Ltd Bank Open
Determines if you can open a bank
N/A
Ltd Till/bank Info
Replaces financial figures with # to obscure them
N/A
Mgr Till/Bank Info
View and print bank reports not your own
N/A
Mgr Till/Bank Open/Assign
Open a bank for someone else
N/A
Modify Item on App
Permission for a custom app
N/A
No Sale – All Tills
Control Panel > No Sale on any till
No Sale
No Sales – Assigned Tills
Control Panel > No Sale on assigned till
No Sale
Offline Credit Transactions
Control Panel > Offline Credit Transactions
N/A
Other Payment Override
Whilst paying with a manually added payment method
N/A
Override Credit Auth
Override Credit Auth
N/A
Override Promotion
Applying a promotion with "Requires Manager Override"
N/A
Pay In/Pay Out
Control Panel > Pay In/Pay Out
Pay In & Pay Out
Pay with Check
Payment screen > Pay with check
Check Payment
Refunds
Control Panel > Issue Refund
Refund
Remove Item
Order Screen > Select item from receipt box
Remove items
Reprint Credit
Control Panel > View Transactions > Reprint Credit Receipts
Credit Reprint
Sales Reports
Control Panel > Reports > Sales Reports
N/A
Scale Override
When scale is enabled and quantity is manually entered
Scale Manual Entry
Scheduling
Scheduling
N/A
Service Fees
Order Screen > Order Functions > Add Service Fees
Service Fees
Settings
Log on screen > Database Settings, Printer Settings or Till Settings
N/A
Show All Items
Order Screen > Order Functions > Show All Menu items
N/A
Sign Out Delivery Orders
Order Screen > Pending Orders > Out For Delivery
N/A
Skip Break
Allows employee to skip a break
Skip Break
Stay Signed In after Order/Send
Stay signed in after paying for a transaction or sending an order
N/A
Tax Exempt Orders
Manage Tickets Screen > “NoTax” Button
N/A
Time Clock Management
Logon Screen > Time Clock > MGR Override In or out
N/A
Transfer All Tables
Control Panel > Transfer Tables
Transfer Tables
Transfer Inventory
Legacy
N/A
Transfer Own Tables
Control Panel > Transfer Tables
Transfer Tables
Unapplied Credit
Override when viewing unapplied credit transactions
N/A
VIP Percentage
Editing percentage off on the VIP screen
N/A
View All Tabs
Pending Orders > Bar Tabs > Show All
N/A
View Closed Tills/Banks
Control Panel > Till and Bank Manager > View Closed
N/A
View Notifications
View notifications for printers not printing and clear them
N/A
View Table Info
View server name and table open time on table screen
N/A
View Transactions
Control Panel > View Transactions
View Transactions
Void Credit Transactions
Control Panel > View Transactions > Void Credit Transaction
Credit Void
Voids
Control Panel > View Transactions > Void Transaction
Void Transactions
Waste Items
Order Screen > Order Functions > Waste Items
N/A
Back Office Privileges
  
These are advanced settings allowing employees to access and manage backend functionalities, like adding new employees, managing menus, or handling inventory.
Setup:
Go to Back Office > Employees > Privileges.
Assign the necessary privileges, like "Add New Employee" or "Edit Menu."
Privilege
Description
All Privileges
Sets all Back Office privileges to Yes
Sales Chart
Legacy
Tills/Banks/Deposits
Sets all Tills/Banks/Deposits privileges to “Yes”
Employees
If set to “Yes” then it will set all of the employee related privileges to “Yes” including Job Manager and Schedule Manager
Employees Manager
If set to “Yes” then it will set all of the employee related privileges to “Yes” excluding Job Manager and Schedule Manager
Add New Employee
Allows access to the button on the Employee Manager screen
Activate/Deactivate Employee
Allows access to the button on the Employee Manager Screen
Employee Jobs
Allows access to the button on the Employee Manager Screen
Passwords
Allows access to the button on the Employee Manager Screen
Edit Employee Info
Allows access to the button on the Employee Manager Screen
Edit Employee Privileges
Allows access to the button on the Employee Manager Screen
Set Employee Notifications
Allows Access to the button on the Employee Manager Screen
Employee Availability
Allows Access to the button on the Employee Manager Screen
Set Reminder
Allows Access to the button on the Employee Manager Screen
Job Manager
Allows you to see the Job Manager link under Employees
Schedule Manager
Allows you to see Schedule Manager under Employees
Menu
If set to “Yes” then all Menu related privileges will also be set to “Yes” If set to “No” then you will be able to pick and choose which Menu related privileges you would like to apply
Menu Categories
Allows access to Menu > Menu Categories
Menu Items
Allows access to Menu
Menu Sets
Allows access to Menu
Add Sets to Items
Allows access to Menu
Modifier Text
Allows access to Menu
Taxcodes
Allows access to Menu > Taxcodes
Report Categories
Allows access to Menu > Report Categories
Menu Timesets
Allows access to Menu > Timesets
Coupons
Allows access to Menu > Promotions
Multi Item Edit
Allows access to Menu > Multi Item Edit
Report Groups
Allows access to Menu > Report Groups
Recommended Item Sets
Allows access to Menu > Recommended Item Sets
Price Levels
Allows access to Menu > Price Levels
Add modifier Sets to Modifiers
Allows access to Menu > Add Modifier Set to Modifier
Menu Counter Sets
Allows access to Menu > Menu Counter Sets
Auto Add Modifiers to Items
Allows access to Menu > Add Auto Modifiers to Items
Export Menu
Allows access to Menu > Export Menu
Import Menu
Allows access to Menu > Import Menu
Menu Update
Allows access to Database > Menu Update
Delete Modifier Options Template
?
Inventory
If set to “Yes” then it sets all Inventory privileges to “Yes”. If set to “No” then you are able to set them individually
Inventory Setup
If set to “Yes” then it sets all privileges needed to set up inventory to “Yes”. If set to “No” then you are able to set them individually
Setup Units
Allows access to Inventory
Add/Edit Products
Allows access to Inventory
Setup Suppliers
Allows access to Inventory
Inventory Dept/Type
Allows access to Inventory
Item Recipes
Allows access to Inventory
Option Recipes
Allows access to Inventory
Inventory Ordering
Allows access to Inventory > Ordering
Inventory Receiving/Removing
Will set the 2 below to “Yes”
Receive from Purchase Order
Allows you to click on “Receive” after creating an order
Receive without Purchase Order
Allows you to click on Inventory > Receiving
Inventory Processing
Will set the 3 below to Yes
Actual Inventory
Allows you to click on Inventory > Processing
Finalize Inventory
Allows you to click “Finalize Inventory” after starting processing
Data mining
Data mining
Sales Reports
Daily Transaction Report, Hourly Sales Comparison Report, Hourly Transaction Report, Terminal Performance Report, Menu Item Performance, Menu Category Sales, Estimated Deposit Report, Credit Card Detail Report
Gift card Report
Gift card Report
Operations Report
Operations Report
Employee Reports
Employee Hours, Payroll Report, Payroll Income, Claimed Tips Report, Credit Tips Report, Post Send Detail Report, Pre Send Detail Report, Employee Performance Report, Manager Performance Report, Fee Group Report
Inventory Reports
Inventory Current Market Value Report, Estimated Inventory Current Market Value Report, Inventory Gain/Loss Report, Inventory Markup Report, Inventory Theoretical/Actual Detail Report, Inventory Cost Report, Manual Invoices
Customer Reports
Customer Loyalty Report, Customer Performance Report, Customer Registration Report, Promotional Report
Menu Reports
Recipe Report, Menu Item Prices, Menu Item Performance, Menu Option Performance, Menu Option Performance by Item, Menu Category Sales, Custom Item Report, Custom Option Report
Database
If set to “yes” will set Database related privileges to “Yes” if set to “No” then you can set them individually
Create Database Backup
Allows access to Database > Create Backup
Sync with Website
Allows access to Database > Sync With Website
Export CSV
Allows access to Database > Export CSV
Export IIF
Allows access to Database > Export IIF
Insert Giftcard
Allows access to Database > Insert Gift Card
Insert VIP Giftcard
Allows access to Database > Insert VIP Card
Settings
If set to “yes” will set any settings related privileges to “Yes” if set to “No” then you can set them individually
Restaurant Info Settings
Allows access to Settings > Restaurant Info
POS Settings
Allows access to Settings > POS
Printer Settings
Allows access to Settings > Printers
Override Settings
Allows access to Settings > Overrides
Till Settings
Allows access to Settings > Tills
Schedule Settings
Allows access to Settings > Schedule
Website Settings
Legacy, no longer used
Pictures Settings
Legacy, no longer used
Default Customers Settings
Allows access to Settings > Customers and Addresses
Menu Transfer Settings
Allows access to Settings > Menu Transfer
Receipt Settings
Legacy
Scenarios for Reference
  
New Employee Setup:
Scenario: Setting up a new cashier who needs access to perform sales but not to void transactions.
Action: Assign the cashier role with the necessary sales privileges but without the void privilege.
Enabling Overrides for Managers:
Scenario: Allowing managers to approve void transactions.
Action: Turn on the "Void Transactions" override and give managers the corresponding privilege.
Switching to Fingerprint Logins:
Scenario: Enhancing security by switching from passcode logins to fingerprint logins.
Action: Set up fingerprint scanners at each till and enroll employees' fingerprints in the system.
This simplified guide aims to make access controls in OrderCounter clear and straightforward, ensuring even non-technical users can effectively manage and utilize these features.
 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Overrides

Overview
Here is a list of all overrides and their corresponding Employee / Job privileges
Auto Authorize
 - Determines whether a manager being logged in to the terminal will automatically authorize overrides.


No Sale
 - Determines whether a manager override is required for no sales (opens cash drawer).
Custom Modifier
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to add a custom option to an item. 
Custom Modifier w/ Price
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to add a custom option with a price to an item.
Custom Item
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to add a custom item.
Custom Item w/ Price
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to add a custom item with a price to an item.
Remove Items 
- Determines whether a manager override is required to remove items sent to the kitchen or all items. (Items Submitted)
Edit Wait Times
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to change delivery/takeout preparation times.
Voids
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to void a transaction.
Refunds
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to perform a refund.
Approve Delivery Address
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to approve a delivery address that failed smart mapping.
Cancel Takeout
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to cancel a takeout order.
Cancel Delivery
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to cancel a delivery order.
Cancel Drive Thru
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to cancel a drive -thru order.
Fail Delivery
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to fail a delivery.
View Transactions
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to view transactions or print the open batch report.
Add Gratuity
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to add gratuity to a ticket.
Edit Price
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to edit a price.
Edit Customer Database
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to edit the customer database.
Pay In / Pay Out
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to perform a Pay In / Pay Out.
Add Depleted Items - Determines whether a manager override is required to add an item that has been determined as depleted by the "Counter Groups".
Reprint Credit
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to perform a credit slip reprint.
End of Day
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to perform an end of day.
Batch
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to perform a credit batch.
Add Fingerprint
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to add a fingerprint to an employee.
Menu
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to edit the menu.
Comps
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to perform a comp.
Credit Void
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to perform a void of a credit transaction.
Exit POS
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to exit the POS system.
Ignore Printer Error
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to ignore a printer error.
Transfer Tables
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to transfer a ticket from one table to another.
Non Default Job
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to clock in as a non -default job code.
Drinks Per Guest
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to ring up a table with fewer drinks than guests.
Tip Amount Override
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to add a tip above a certain percentage of the total order.
Tip Amount
 - The amount that triggers the tip amount override, in percentage of the total.
Accept Check
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to checkout with a check.
Scale Manual Entry 
- Determines whether a manager override is required to enter a manual weight when a scale is present.
Scale Item Removal
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to remove an item that was weighed in with a scale.
Override Credit Auth
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to bypass a credit authorization.
Add to Account 
- Determines whether a manager override is required to add an order to an account.
Service Fees
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to add service fees to an order.
Table Access
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to access a table that is not assigned to the employee.
Consolidate Items
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to consolidate items.
Open Till 
- Determines whether a manager override is required to open a till.
Combine Bar Tabs
 - Determines whether a manager override is required to combine bar tabs.
Open Transferred Bar Tab
 - Determines whether an override is required to open a transferred bar tab.
Skip Break
 - Determines whether an override is required to skip a break.
Continue Without Skipping Break
 - Determines whether an override is required to continue without skipping a break in break monitoring.
Custom Gift Card
 - Determines whether an override is required to sell a custom gift card.
Activate Gift Card
 - Determines whether an override is required to activate a pre -made gift card.
Table Access By Barcode
 - Determines whether an override is required to access another user's table using the barcode on the ticket.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Managing Table Sections

Managing Table Sections in OrderCounter
Table sections help you organize your restaurant's tables into groups. This way, your staff can easily see which tables they are responsible for, preventing mix-ups and ensuring smooth service.
Setting Up Table Sections
In OrderCounter, go to 
Back Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Table Sections
.
Click the 
+
 button to add a new section.
Give the section a name (e.g., "Patio," "Main Dining Room") and click 
Save
.
Repeat these steps to create all the sections you need.
Under the "Tables" section, you'll see a list of all your tables. Assign each table to the appropriate section and set its capacity (number of seats).
To make sure staff are assigned to specific sections, go to 
Back Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
POS
 and set "Assign Sections" to "Yes."
Then, go to 
Back Office
 > 
Employees
 > 
Job Manager
. Edit each job role and set "Choose Table Section" to "Yes."
How Table Sections Work
When employees log in, they'll be asked to choose their section if their job role has the "
Choose Table Section
" option enabled.
      
After logging in, employees will see their assigned tables in the usual colors on the screen.
Tables that are available but not in their section will appear in pink.
Tables that are occupied and not in their section will appear in gray.
Accessing Tables Outside Your Section
If an employee needs to access a table outside their assigned section, they can do so by entering an override code. This requires the "Access All Tables" permission.
Important Note:
 The colors for available and occupied tables might change if you're using "Advanced Table Statuses." However, employees will still only be able to access tables within their assigned section.
Example Scenarios
Scenario 1:
 A waiter is assigned to the "Patio" section. They can only see and manage tables in the "Patio" section. If they need to access a table in the "Main Dining Room," they'll need to enter an override code.
Scenario 2:
 A manager has the "Access All Tables" permission. They can see and manage all tables in the restaurant, regardless of the section.
Scenario 3:
 A hostess is not assigned to any specific section. They can see all tables but cannot manage them (e.g., take orders, print bills).
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Payment Screen Button Customization

Overview
  
This guide will help you customize the tender buttons on the payment screen of your POS system. You can move, merge, resize, and copy these buttons to fit your needs. This gives you full control over how your payment screen looks and works.
Setup Steps
  
Access Payment Screen Settings
Go to 
Back Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Payment Screen
.
Customize Button Layout
You can move, resize, and copy the buttons to create the layout you want. Think of it like arranging icons on your smartphone.
Set Button Functions
Each button can be assigned a specific function. Here's a simple guide to what each function does:
Payment Method
: Choose the type of payment, like cash or credit card.
Exact
: This button will enter the exact amount needed to complete the sale.
Key-In Value
: Enter a custom amount to be paid.
Set Value
: Set buttons for common amounts (e.g., $5, $10). Pressing this button fills in that amount.
Fraction
: Split the total amount into halves, quarters, or thirds to easily divide the bill among up to 4 people.
Round Up
: Rounds the total up to the next dollar. For example, if the total is $4.45, this button will change it to $5.00.
Examples of Use
  
Here are three scenarios where you might use this knowledge base article:
Scenario 1: New Button Layout
You're updating the layout of your payment screen to make it more user-friendly. Use this guide to rearrange the buttons.
Scenario 2: Adding a New Payment Method
You've added a new payment method to your POS system and need to create a button for it. Follow the steps to customize the button and assign it the new payment method.
Scenario 3: Splitting Bills
Customers often split their bills. Use the Fraction function to set up buttons that divide the total amount by the number of people paying.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Cash Discount

The cash discount feature allows you to charge a fee for card payments. This fee can be set to automatically apply based on the payment method used. If you select all payment methods, it becomes a regular fee that must be paid to settle the bill. If only card payment methods are selected, customers can avoid the fee by paying with cash.
Setting Up the Service Fee
Go to Back Office
Navigate to Settings
Select Service Fees
Service Fee Settings
Service Fee Name
: The name that appears on the screen and customer receipt.
Service Fee Amount
: The extra charge amount.
Service Fee Type:
 Choose between Percentage (applied to all items) or Set Fee (a fixed amount).
Count Towards Sales
: Decide if the service fee is part of gross and net sales reports.
Auto Add Orders
: Automatically add the fee to selected order types.
Auto Add Payments
: Choose payment methods that trigger the service fee. If all methods are chosen, it acts like a regular fee. If only some methods are chosen, it functions as a surcharge (often called a cash discount).
Payment Fee Options
Total Line
: The bill total without the fee.
Payment Fee Line
: The amount of the fee.
Total With Fee
: The total amount including the fee.
Tax Code
: Choose the tax code for the fee or select tax-exempt.
Add to Split Checks
: Apply the fee to each ticket when splitting checks.
Rounding Options
:
Always Round Up
: Rounds up to the nearest penny.
Always Round Down
: Rounds down to the nearest penny.
Round Up and Down:
 
Rounds up if 0.005 or above; otherwise, rounds down.
Example Scenario
 If the remaining balance due is $5.33, and you select: 
Cash:
 The total remains $5.33. 
Credit: 
The total becomes $5.85, with $0.52 as the payment fee. 
You can set the fee as a negative percentage to act as a discount. If card payment is selected, paying by card applies the discount, and paying by cash does not.
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here:
 
https://tinyurl.com/occashdiscount
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Rounding Up Taxcodes

Overview
This is where you can configure rounding for taxes.
Back Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Taxcode
​
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Tip Sharing

Overview
Tip sharing allows you to collect the tips from transactions and disperse them via job descriptions.
Creating A Tip Share
Setup
Navigate to  
Back Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Tip Shares
      Click "
Add Tip Share
"
      
           Enter the 
Name
, 
Split Type,
 
Minimum Hours,
 and 
Percentage
 that should go towards each job title.
            
            
 
            
Even Split
: 
Splits money evenly among employees who qualify (based on job code and minimum hours worked).
            
Proportionate Based On Time Worked
: 
Employees receive a percentage of the money based on the percentage of hours they worked 
      
        
compared to total sum of hours worked by all employees who qualify.
            
                  Click "
Save Tip Share
" when done
Creating A Fee Group
Now that you've created a 
Tip Share
, you'll need to create a Fee Group to share the percentages from either the total revenue made or by the various
order types to the 
Tip Share
 before tips will be shared.
Setup
Navigate to 
Back Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Fee Groups
      Enter a name and click "
Add Group
"
            
                  Set up the percentages that the tip's should goto.
                  
*Note you will see your tip share where you can adjust how much of the tips are going into the funds before being shared*
                  
                        Click "
Save Group"
 when done
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Takeout and Delivery

This guide will help you understand and manage the settings for Takeout and Delivery orders. You can find these settings in the Back Office under Settings > Takeout and Delivery.
Key Settings Explained
Google Maps Integration
Google Maps Integration:
 This setting determines whether Google Maps is used to map and find addresses.
Google Mapping API (Override):
 If you have your own Google API key, you can use it instead of the one provided by OrderCounter.
Show Mapping Buttons:
 This shows the map on your Point of Sale (POS) system. Note that if you use the OrderCounter API, maps won't be displayed.
Delivery Zone and Fees
Require Delivery Zone:
 This setting ensures that a delivery address is within a specified delivery zone.
Minimum Delivery Order:
 Sets the smallest order amount required for delivery. If there’s no zone found, this amount is used.
No Zone Delivery Fee:
 Fee charged for delivering to an address outside any delivery zone.
No Zone Delivery Fee Type:
 Decides if the no zone delivery fee is a flat amount or a percentage.
Default Settings
Default State/City/Area Code:
 These are the pre-selected state, city, and area code for takeout and delivery orders.
Customer Information
Require Full Name:
 Ensures customers provide their full name (first and last).
Valid Phone Number Digits:
 Sets the minimum number of digits required for a phone number.
Caller ID:
 Decides if the Caller ID module is used to show customer phone numbers.
Caller ID Settings
Caller ID - Lines:
 Specifies how many phone lines the Caller ID module supports.
Caller ID - Takeout/Delivery:
 Determines if the Caller ID module automatically shows on takeout or delivery orders.
Order Management
Takeout Picked Up:
 Sets whether a takeout order is marked as picked up automatically, manually, or with a prompt.
EOD Auto-Complete - Takeout:
 Automatically completes a takeout order at the end of the day if it has been paid for.
Delivery Map
Delivery Map Scale:
 Controls the scale (zoom level) of the delivery map.
Customer Contact Requirements
These settings determine if a phone number or email is required for different types of customers:
Bar Tab Customer:
 Requires phone or email for bar tab customers.
Retail Customer:
 Requires phone or email for retail customers.
Takeout Customer:
 Requires phone or email for takeout customers.
Table Service Customer:
 Requires phone or email for table service customers.
Delivery Customer:
 Requires phone or email for delivery customers.
For Here Customer:
 Requires phone or email for dine-in customers.
ToGo Customer:
 Requires phone or email for to-go customers.
Drive Thru Customer:
 Requires phone or email for drive-thru customers.
Driver Notifications
Driver Address Emails:
 Sends delivery addresses to drivers via email.
Driver Address SMS:
 Sends delivery addresses to drivers via SMS.
Example Scenarios
Setting Up a New Delivery Zone:

If you are expanding your delivery service to a new area, use the "Require Delivery Zone" and "No Zone Delivery Fee" settings to manage orders and fees for addresses outside your current zones.
Using Caller ID for Takeout Orders:

To improve customer service, you can enable the "Caller ID - Takeout" setting so that when customers call to place an order, their information pops up automatically, making the process faster and more efficient.
Managing Minimum Order Amounts:

If you need to ensure profitability, set a "Minimum Delivery Order" amount. This helps prevent small orders that may not cover delivery costs, ensuring every delivery is worth the trip.
By following this simplified guide, you can easily configure and manage your takeout and delivery settings, ensuring smooth operations and a better customer experience.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Auto Complete Takeout Orders

Overview
There's a setting that will allow you to bypass the "
Mark Order As Complete
" screen for takeout orders. Below is where the setting can be found. 
Setup
The following setting can be found under 
Settings 
> 
Takeout and Delivery
 > 
Takeout Picked Up
Prompt - 
Prompts to mark the order as complete
Manual - 
Server manually marks the order as complete 
Automatic - 
Order is marked as complete automatically after being paid for
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Advanced Table Statuses

Advanced Table Statuses
 allow you to customize the status of tables in your restaurant, making it easier to manage table occupancy and service stages. 
By default, tables have three colors:
Green
: Empty and ready to be occupied.
Yellow
: Opened and occupied by your server.
Gray
: Opened by another server.
When Advanced Table Statuses are enabled, you can create custom statuses with different colors and behaviors to suit your needs.
Advanced statuses can be used for other order methods but it is most useful for table orders
Setting Up Advanced Table Statuses:
Enable Advanced Table Statuses:
Go to the 
Back Office
.
Navigate to 
Settings
 > 
POS
 > 
Advanced Table Statuses
 and switch it to "
On
".
Create and Manage Table Statuses:
Go to 
Back Office
 > 
Order Statuses
 > 
Table Statuses.
If no statuses are set up, click on "
Add New
" to create one.
There should be some set up already. If not then you can click on "
Add New
"
The first one we need is "Ready". A status to say that the table is not in use, clean and ready to go.
Name
: Enter a name for the status (e.g., Ready, In Use, Needs Cleaning).
Rank
: Use rank to order statuses. Lower ranks indicate earlier stages (e.g., Ready could be rank 1, In Use rank 2). You can use decimals to add statuses between existing ranks (e.g., 1.5).
Color
: Choose a color to represent this status on the table diagram.
Table Ready Status
: Check this if the status should reset the table for a new customer when no orders are pending.
Guest Check Printed:
 Automatically changes the table status when the check is printed. Create a status like "Check Dropped" and assign a color and rank.
Table Opened:
 Changes the status when a table is opened. Create a status like "Table Open" for this purpose.
Last Check Paid:
 Updates the status when the last check is paid. Create a status like "Dirty Table" to indicate that the table needs cleaning.
Printing and Notifications
Printer Notifications:
Enable Printer Notifications
: If enabled, a message will print to selected printers when the status changes.
Courses / Labels
: You can set specific courses to automatically send items to printers when their status is selected. This helps track the meal progress and manage kitchen operations.
Using Advanced Table Statuses:
Manual Changes
: Click on the Change Status button on the order screen to manually update the table status.
Automatic Changes:
 Configure items in Menu Item Management to automatically change the table status when specific items (like dessert) are ordered.
Example Scenarios
Managing Busy Times:
During peak hours, use advanced statuses to quickly see which tables are ready to be seated, occupied, or waiting for a check to be paid. For example, set "Ready" as green, "Occupied" as yellow, and "Check Printed" as orange to streamline your seating process.
Tracking Meal Progress:
Use different statuses to track the progress of meals. For instance, create statuses like "Appetizer Served," "Main Course Served," and "Dessert Served" to know exactly which stage each table is at, helping you provide timely service.
Cleaning and Preparation:
After customers leave, change the table status to "Dirty" (e.g., red) to signal the need for cleaning. Once cleaned, change it back to "Ready" (e.g., green) to indicate the table is ready for the next customer, ensuring quick turnaround times.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Reports

Sales Reports
Operations Report
This is your main report and will show you what you need to know on a day to day basis
You are able to filter by Dates only
Gross
 
Sales
 – Sum of all sales before discounts / comps and tax not including event deposits
Refunds
 – Any refunds issued
Discounts
/
Promos
– Any Discounts or promotions issued
Comps
 – Any Comps that were issued
Pay
 
Ins/pay outs
 – = and paid in less any paid out
Fees
 
Collected
On
 
Account Transactions
 – Total of all transactions settled to account (inc Tax)
On
 
Account
 
Tips
 – Tips paid for using account
Adjusted
 
Gross
 - Gross Sales -Refunds -Discounts -Comps +Pay Ins – Pay Outs – On account transactions and tips
Tax
 
Collected
 – The sum of tax collected for all payment methods
Gift
 
Cards
 
Sold
 (x) – x is the number sold. The amount is the sum of the value of all sold Gift Cards
On
 
Account
 – The total amount of money paid using accounts (Inc Tax)
Pay
 
Ins
 – Amount paid in to the till using the paid in function
Pay
 
Outs
 – Amount paid out of the till using the paid out function
Net
 
Sales
 - = Uses Adjusted gross, removes tax and gift cards the adds back in the paid in/paid out  an
d on account transactions
Sales summary by Taxcode
 shows you your tax codes, sales and tax collected against each taxcode. In this case a $15 Gift Card was sold which does not have tax 
Tip Summary
 lets you know what payment method was used to give tips.
   Deposit Summary
Cash Sales
 - Total amount of cash sales (Inc Tax)
Tips Collected - 
The total of any tips paid. Tips made to other payment methods will be taken out of cash to pay the server so will be a negative figure here. 
Pay Ins 
– Sum of all Pay Ins using the pay in function
Pay Outs
 – Sum of all Pay Outs using the pay out function
Cash Refunds
 – Refunds made to cash
Cash Event Deposits
 – Deposits taken against events paid for in cash
Cash Deposit Expected
 – How much the system calculates you should have in cash to deposit in the safe
Credit Sales
 - Total amount of sales paid using credit (Inc Tax)
Online Credit Sales
 – Transactions paid for through the mobile order site
Credit Tips
 – Tips paid using credit
Credit Refunds
 – Refunds made to Credit
Credit Event Deposits
 - Deposits taken against events paid for with Credit
Credit Deposit Expected
 = Credit Sales + Online Credit Sales + Credit Tips -Credit Refunds + Credit Event Deposits
Check Sales
 –Total amount of sales paid for using Checks (Inc Tax)
Check Tips
 - Tips paid using Checks
Check Refunds
  – Refunds made to Check
Check Event Deposits
 - Deposits taken against events paid for with a Check
Check Deposit Expected
 - How much the system calculates you should have in Checks to deposit in the safe
Gift Card Sales
 -Total amount of sales paid for using Gift Cards (Inc Tax) 
Gift Card Tips
 - Tips paid using Gift Cards
Gift Card Refunds
 – Refund made to Gift Cards
Gift Card Event Deposits
 - Deposits taken against events paid for using Gift Cards
Gift Card Deposit Expected
 - How much the system calculates was paid for using Gift Cards
Other Payment Sales
 – Total sales paid for using custom payment methods (Inc Tax)
Other Payment Event Deposits
 - Deposits taken against events paid for using one of the custom payment methods
Other Payment Deposit Expected
 - How much the system calculates you should have using the custom payment methods
Redeemed Event Deposit
 – The $ amount of Deposits that have been redeemed
Expected Deposit
 – Sum of all Payment deposit types + Redeemed Event Deposit
Event Deposits
 – Sum of Event Deposits from all payment methods
Adj Gross
 - = Gross Sales -Refunds -Discounts -Comps +Pay Ins – Pay Outs -Event Deposits + payments to account (payments to pay down the balance of an account)
Refunds
 – Sum of all refunds
Discounts 
– Sum of all discounts
Comps
 - Any Comps that were issues
On
 
Account
 
Transactions
 – Sum of all transactions paid for using account
On
 
Account
 
Tips
 – sum of all tips paid for using account
Payments
 
to
 
Account
 – Payments received to pay off the balance of an account
Pay
 
Ins
 – Sum of all pay ins
Pay
 
Outs
 – Sum of all pay outs
Gross Sales
 - The calculations are reversed to show how to get back from Adjusted gross to Gross sales
Sales by Order Method
 will allow you to compare the Order Methods to see which one is making the most money.
Till Adjustments
Expected Deposit Total
 – All deposit totals +Redeemed Event Deposit +  Not including Account Payments. 
Deposit Adjustment
 – The difference between the expected deposit total and the actual deposit total
Actual Deposit Total
 -  How much was actually declared
Other Payment Methods – Other Payment Methods will show you the custom payment methods that have been added split out (Inc Tax)
Category trends show how the sales are split by category
Qty
 – How many items were sold from a particular category 
Approximate
 
Sales
 – There is some rounding so sales are approximate
Comps
 – comps from items in a specific category 
Comp
 
%
 - Percentage of sales that are comps
%
 
of
 
Sales
 – Approximate sales divided by the sum of all approximate sales *100
Tills and Banks 
- Overview of what was declared under tills and banks for each payment method
Daily Transaction Report
This report will allow you to see each day organized by day of the week for a given time frame so you can compare the same days on previous weeks to see how sales are doing.
You are able to filter this report by Date, Category and Profit Center
Sales do not include Tax
Averages are the sum of all sales on the same day of the week divided by how many days there are
For example, here we have 6 Wednesdays and a total of 74.75. 74.75/6 =12.46
End of Day Search
Shows you when each end of day was performed and how many transactions were settled
You can also link through to the Specific end of day report by clicking on the ID of the EOD
You can filter by Date only
ID
 – The unique ID of that EOD
Date
 – The date the EOD was run
Time
 – The Time the EOD was ran
Number
 
of
 
Transactions
 – How many transactions were paid off from the end of the previous EOD to the end of this one
End of Day Report
You can only get to this report by clicking on the ID of the EOD in the “End of Day Search Report”This report will show you everything you need to know about the End of Day in question
Gross
 
Sales
 – Sum of all sales before discounts / comps and tax
Refunds
 – Any refunds issued
Discounts
 – Any Discounts issued
Comps
 – Any Comps that were issues
Pay
 
Ins
 – Any monies paid in to the till
Pay
 
Outs
 – Any monies paid out of the till
Fees
 
Collected
 – Fees can be set from Settings > Fee Groups 
On
 
Account
 – Total of all transactions settled to account (inc Tax)
Adjusted
 
Gross
 - Gross Sales -Refunds -Discounts -Comps +Pay Ins – Pay Outs – On account transactions and tips
Tax
 
Collected
 – The sum of tax collected for all payment methods
Gift
 
Cards
 
Sold
 (x) – x is the number sold. The amount is the sum of the value of all sold Gift Cards
On
 
Account
 – The total amount of money paid using accounts (Inc Tax)
Pay
 
Ins
 – Amount paid in to the till using the paid in function
Pay
 
Outs
 – Amount paid out of the till using the paid out function
Net
 
Sales
 - = Adjusted gross -Tax -Gift cards + Paid Out – Paid In. It does this to remove the paid in and paid out from the net sales as net sales does not include paid in or paid outs
Cash Transactions
 (x) - No of transactions and total amount (Inc Tax)
Tips Collected - 
Sum of all tips
Pay Ins 
– Sum of all Pay Ins using the pay in function
Pay Outs
 – Sum of all Pay Outs using the pay out function
Cash Refunds (x)
 – Refunds made to cash
Cash Event Deposits
 – Deposits taken against events paid for in cash
Cash Deposit Expected
 – How much the system calculates you should have in cash to deposit in the safe
Credit Transactions
 (x) - No of transactions and total amount (Inc Tax)
Online Credit Transactions
 (x) – Transactions paid for through the mobile order site
Credit Tips
 – Tips paid using credit
Credit Refunds
 – Refunds made to Credit
Credit Event Deposits
 - Deposits taken against events paid for with Credit
Credit Deposit Expected
 - How much the system calculates you should have in Credit card sales to deposit in the safe or bank
Check Transactions
 (x) – No of transactions and total amount (Inc Tax)
Check Tips
 - Tips paid using Checks
Check Refunds
 (x) – Refunds made to Check
Check Event Deposits
 - Deposits taken against events paid for with a Check
Check Deposit Expected
 - How much the system calculates you should have in Checks to deposit in the safe
Gift Card Transactions
(x) - No of transactions and total amount (Inc Tax) 
Gift Card Tips
 - Tips paid using Gift Cards
Gift Card Refunds
 – Refund made to Gift Cards
Gift Card Event Deposits
 - Deposits taken against events paid for using Gift Cards
Gift Card Deposit Expected
 - How much the system calculates was paid for using Gift Cards
Other Payment Transactions
 (0) - No of transactions and total amount (Inc Tax)
Other Payment Event Deposits
 - Deposits taken against events paid for using one of the custom payment methods
Other Payment Deposit Expected
 - How much the system calculates you should have using the custom payment methods
Expected Deposit
 – Sum of all Payment deposit types – paid out + paid in
Event Deposits
 – Sum of Event Deposits from all payment methods
Adj Gross
 - = Gross Sales -Refunds -Discounts -Comps +Pay Ins – Pay Outs -Event Deposits
Discounts (x)
 – Number of Discounts and the sum of all discounts
Comps
 - Any Comps that were issues
Pay Ins
 – Amount paid into the till 
Pay Outs
 – Amount paid out of the till
On Account
 – Amount paid to account (Inc Tax)
Gross Sales
 - = The calculations removed to gross sales to get to adjusted gross are reversed to get you back to gross sales
Expected Deposit Total
 – The amount for bank deposit from all payment types
Deposit Adjustment
 – Any adjustments made when declaring tills or banks
Actual Deposit Total
 – Expected Deposit Total -Actual Deposit Total
Voided Transactions
 (x) – No of and sum of all voided transactions
Refunds (x)
 – No of and sum of all voided transactions
Sales By Order Method will show sales (Inc Tax) for each order method
    Other Data
Accounts Invoiced
 – Sum of transactions settled using accounts (Inc Tax)
Gift Cards Sold
 – No of and sum of at Gift cards sold
Gift Cards Redeemed
 – No Of transactions and Sum of all transactions paid using Giftcards (Inc Tax)
Guests
 – No of guests. How these are calculated can be set in 
Settings
 > 
Pos
 > 
Guest
 
Count
 
settings
Transactions
 – No of transactions from the end of the last EOD to the end of this one
Payments
 – How many Payments there were. If one transactions was paid half card half cash it would count as 2 payments
Average net Transactions
 – = Net sales divided by no of transaction 
Average Payment Net Transactions
 – = Net sales divided by no of payments
Pre-Submit removals
 – No of and sum of pre submit removals (Not Inc Tax)
Post Submit Removals
 – No of and sum of Post Submit Removals (Not Inc Tax)
Other Payment Methods will show you the custom payment methods that have been added split out (Inc Tax)
Gift Card Report
Shows you a list of all gift cards with their balance and allows you to see your total outstanding liability. You can also link through to see the details of each transaction for a specific gift card.
Filtering is available by:
Date
 – The date the gift card was sold
Balance > 0 only
 – Will only show gift cards with money left to spend on them
Gift Card Group
 – Groups can be created from 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Database
 > 
Insert
 
Gift
 
Card
Hourly Sales Comparison Report by Time Transaction Entered
Allows you to compare a time period of sales with the same time on different days
You can filter by Date, Hours, Category and Ordertype
Averages are the sum of the hour slot for each day divided by the number of days
Hourly Sales Comparison Report By Time Transaction Completed
The same as Hourly Sales Comparison Report by Time Transaction entered but it uses the transaction complete time instead
Hourly Transaction Report
This report allows you to see how you are doing for a given hour or group of hours day by day.
So you can run the report from Monday to Friday and compare takings between 12:00 and 14:00
You can filter by profit center and by hour
Date
 – The date and day 
Each hourly time slot has 
    
$
 - The monetary amount taken in sales for that time slot (Not Inc Tax)
#
  - Number of transactions
Totals
 – The total form each day added together
Averages
 – 
Is either the $sales, Number of orders or number of guests for each day in the hour slot added together divided by the number of days in the range.
Percentage of sales – What percentage of sales were within that hour slot
Guests – Number of guests. There are settings that help define this is 
Settings
 > 
Pos
 > 
Guest
 
Count
 
Settings
Orders by Zip Code Report
Shows all of the delivery orders in the date range grouped by zipCode 
You can only filter by date.
ZipCode
 – Is the ZipCode the order was sent to
Number
 
of
 
Transactions
 – How many orders were sent to that zipcode
Grand
 
Total
 – The amount of money taken from all combined transactions within that postcode (Inc Tax)
Grand
 
Total
 
Average
 = Grand Total divided by the number of transactions
Total
 
Discounts
 – Sum of all the discounts 
Average
 
Discount
 – Total Discounts divided by the number of transactions
View
 
Transaction 
–
 
Links to the Reports Transactions spec where you can see the individual invoices
 
Sales Journal
This report was written as a custom report for a customer that uses this instead of their excel spreadsheet
You enter figures in the white spaces and the other figures adjust automatically
Figures you enter will be saved in the report
Date – The date in the format YYYY-MM-DD
Expected Cash – The amount of cash the system calculated you should have (not including the float (starting amount)
Actual Cash – This is where you enter how much cash you actually counted
Expected Check - The amount money paid in Checks, system calculated you should have
Actual Check - The actual amount paid in checks declared when cashing up
Bank Deposit – How much you should be taking to the bank. Actual cash + Actual Check
Credit + Tips – Sum of all payments to credit + any tips
Gift Cards – Payment made with a payment type of Gift Card?
House Charges – These are when a transaction is settled using an account as a method of payment
Purchase orders – Number entry field
Donations – Number entry field
Payouts – Money Paid Out
Pay Ins – Money Paid In
Discount – The amount of money discounted using promotions
Refunds – Any refunds issued
Total - = Actual Cash + Actual Check +Credit + Tips + Gift Cards + Purchase Orders
Adjusted Gross - = Total – Over/Short
Over / Short – The difference between expected cash + expected check and actual cash + actual check + pay outs + Purchase Orders
Net1 – Sales - tax
Gift Cads Sold – Any Gift cards that have been sold
Voids – Sum of all voids
Notes – Free text field
Number of Transactions – How many transactions in the period
Average Transactions – Net 1 divided by Number of Transactions
Scheduled Order Report
This report will show you an overview of the order and when it was supposed to be ready
Orders will only appear here if they were scheduled using Takeout or Delivery order methods
You are able to filter by Date or by Order Method
Order
 
ID
 – The ID for the order. Links to a Pending Transaction Detail Report
Ready
 
Date
 – The date and time the order was scheduled for
Order
 
Method
 – Order Method used to place the order
Customer
 – The name of the customer
Items
 
On
 
Order 
– Details of the items that were scheduled
Total
 – Total price for the order (Not including VAT)
Table Performance Report
Allows you to see how well each of your tables is doing relative to each other as well as look out for potential risk factors.
You can only filter by Date
Table
 
Number
 – Is the table Number
Guests
Average
 – Number of guests divided by number of sittings
Total
 – The total number of guests that have sat at this table within the time frame
Volume
    
Average
 – Amount of money (Inc Tax) paid at this table divided by the number of sittings
    
Total
 – Amount of money (Inc Tax) that has been made on this table within the time frame
Av $ Per Guest
 – Volume Total divided by number of guests
Turnover
 – The turnover time for every sitting added together and divided by the number of sittings
Comps
 – The total off all the comps completed on this table
Terminal Performance Report
A list of all Terminals / Tills and some figures against each so you can compare how they are performing relative to each other
You can only filter by date
Terminal
 
#
 - The ID of the terminal
Transactions
 – How many transactions were put through during the time period
Cash
 – The total amount (Inc Tax) taken in cash at that terminal
Credit
 - The total amount (Inc Tax) taken in credit at that terminal
Tips
 – Money taken in Credit tips at that terminal
Check
 - The total amount (Inc Tax) taken in Checks at that terminal
Gift
 
Card
 - The total amount (Inc Tax) taken in sales paid for with Gift Cards at that terminal
Other Payment
 - The total amount (Inc Tax) taken in Other payment types at that terminal
Comps
 – Total Comps
Voids
 – Total Voids
Refunds
 – Total Refunds
Clock
 
Punches
 – How many times someone has punched in or out at this terminal
Retail
 - How much money was taken through the retail order type (Inc Tax)
Takeout 
-
 
How much money was taken through the Takeout order type (Inc Tax) 
Delivery
 - How much money was taken through the Delivery order type (Inc Tax)
Table
 
Service
 - How much money was taken through the Table Service order type (Inc Tax)
Bar
 
Orders
 - How much money was taken through the Bar order type (Inc Tax)
Transaction report
Shows a list of every Invoice with high level information against each invoice with a summary section at the bottom
You can filter by Date, Profit Center, Employee, Order Location, Order Method, Order Status, Payment Method
There is an option to Show Net/Gross which will show you 
Subtotal
 – Total for the invoice before discounts and not including tax
Tax
 
Total
 – How much tax is paid on the invoice
Gross
 
Total 
- = Subtotal 
+
 Tax
Discount
 – How much discount was added to the transaction
Net
 
Total
 – = Subtotal 
less
 discount 
less
 tax
Adjusted Gross Total
 - = Subtotal 
less
 Discounts 
+
 Tax 
If unticked you get the following against each transition
Subtotal
 – Total for the invoice before discounts and not including tax
Discount
 – How much discount was added to the transaction
Tax
 
Total
 – How much tax is paid on the invoice
Grand
 
Total
 – = Subtotal 
less
 Discounts 
+
 Tax
In either option you have 
Gross Total Sum
 = Sum of subtotal 
+
 sum of Taxtotal
Adjusted Gross Total Sum
 – Gross Total sum 
Less
 Discounts
Net Total Sum
 - = Sum of subtotal – discounts (No Tax included)
Total
 
Transactions
 – Total number of invoices listed
 
Transaction Detail Report
You get to this report when there is a link to an invoice in another report. Such as the transaction report
This report will show you a lot of detailed information relating to the invoice you clicked on
 
Items on Order
 – All the items that were on the order
Subtotal
 – The amount before discounts not including tax
Discount
 – How much Discount was applied
Tax
 – The amount of tax added to the invoice
Gratuity
 – How much gratuity was added to the invoice
Grand
 
Total
 = Subtotal less Discounts + Tax + Gratuity
Payment
 
Methods
 – How the invoice was paid. Card / cash etc.
Promotions
 
Used
 – List of who applied the discount, its name and amount
Order
 
ID
 – The order ID for this transaction. If a check is split into 2 tickets then there will be 2 invoices. The order ID will be the same on both invoices
Ticket
 
Number
 – Shows how many tickets there were in this order. If the order was split into 2 tickets it would say 1 of 2 or 2 of 2
Order Date – 
The date the invoice was made
Table
 
Number
 – If the transaction was a table order the table number will show here
Bar
 
Tab
 – If the transaction was a bar order the name of the Tab would show here
Terminal
 – The ID of the terminal used to pay for the transaction
Order
 
Method
 – The order method used to start the transaction
Order
 
Status
 – The current status of the transaction, could be voided or complete
Order
 
Notes
 – Are the notes entered when discounting or comping
Customer
 
Information
 – For the customer attached to the transaction
Removals
 – A list of an pre or post submit removals
Staff
 
involved
 – Shows you which staff placed the order and paid off the transaction
Open Tabs Report
Will show a list of all tabs and how much is owed for each tab (Inc Tax)
You can filter on profit center
Transaction Taxcode Report
This report will show you all of the invoices in a date range and allow you to see what tax code was used on each. Each tax code will show in the list as a subtotal and a taxtotal
You can filter by Employee, Order Location, Order Method, Order Statu, Payment Method and Date
Invoice
 
ID
 – The ID of the invoice 
Order
 
ID
 – The ID of the Order
Date
 
and
 
Time
 – Of the sale
Customer
 – The name of the customer against the sale
Subtotal
 – Cost of the items before discounts and not including tax
Discount
 – How much discount was applied to the sale
Tax
 
Total
 – All taxes for the sale
Grand
 
Total
 – Subtotal 
less
 Discount 
+
 Tax Total
Default
 
Taxrate
 -
Subtotal
 – The Subtotal for all sales made using the tax called Default Taxrate 
Default
 
Taxrate
 -
Taxtotal
 – The Tax Total for all sales made using the tax called Default Taxrate
Scheduled Item Report
Shows you a list of all items that were sent using scheduled orders, how many were sent and what orders they were against
You can filter by date and by order type of Takeout or Delivery
Profit Center Report
Profit Centers are names for tills or groups of tills. From 
Back Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Profit Centers 
 you can create and assign profit centers to terminals. This allows you to see how profitable different areas of your business are, like the bar or the restaurant
You can filter by date only
You will see information for each profit center and then a total for all profit centers added together
Gross Sales
Refunds
Discounts / promotions
Comps
Redeemed Deposit Report
This report will show you all event deposits that have been redeemed and which invoice they have been redeemed against
This report allows you to see who it was that redeemed the deposit so that if a deposit is not available when you come to redeem it, you have a way to find out who used it and what they used it for
You can filter by date and by employee
Employee
 – The name of the employee that redeemed the deposit
Customer
 
Name
 – The name of the customer the event and deposit were taken against
Invoice
 
ID
 – ID of the invoice the deposit was redeemed against
Order
 
ID
 – The order ID of the Order the deposit was redeemed against
Event
 
Date
 – The date the event was to take place
Deposit
 
Date
 – The date the Deposit was taken
Redeemed
 
Date
 – The date the Deposit was redeemed
Deposit
 
Amount
 – The Monetary amount taken as a deposit
There is a link on the invoice ID that allows you to go straight to the Transaction detail Report.
Sales By Serving Period
This report will show you what sales you have made by each serving period
Serving Periods are defined in 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Serving
 
Periods
You can filter by the date or by the time the orders were opened or closed. For instance, if your breakfast service is 08:00 – 12:00 and a guest comes in at 11:55 and stays for an hour then choosing “
Opened
” will count the sale against breakfast and choosing “
Closed
” will count the sale as Lunch
You can see category sales by serving period
And sales by Profit Center (If they are enabled)
No. Orders
 – The number of separate orders
No. Covers
 – The total number of guests (No of guests is only taken from table orders) ???? I have lodged a ticket to see if this should be affected by the settings for guests
No. Items
 – The number of items added up from every order
Pre-Discount Gross
 – The total sum of all money taken including tax before any discount was applied 
Discount / Comps
 – How much money was removed in either discounts or Comps
Gross Sales 
–
 
=Pre-Discount Gross -Discount / Comps
Tax
 – All sales taxes added together
Net Sales
 – =Gross Sales -Tax
Service Charge
 - Gratuity
Av. Spend Per Order
 – Gross Sales / No. Orders
Av. Spend Per Cover
 – Gross Sales / No. Covers
Employee Reports
Employee Performance Report
Lets you compare how well employees are doing on various metrics such as sales voids and removals
You can filter by Date, Order Method, Jobs, Employees and Employee Types
There are also options for Outlier Top and bottom. These relate to turnover times. The defaults are 120 and 5. So if an orders turnover time is over 120 mins or below 5 mins it does not count towards the average turnover time
Employee
 – The servers name
Total
 
Trans
 – Sum of all transactions completed by the server
Average
 
Turnover
 – Sum of all turnover times divided by the number of transactions (within the outlier parameters) 
Average
 
Delivery
 
Time
 – Sum of all delivery times divided by the number of transactions
Average
 
Ticket
 – Sum of the settled amounts of all tickets divided by the number of transactions
Average
 
Tip
 / 
Gratuity
 – Sum of all the tips divided by the number of transactions that had tips
Sales Totals - 
    
Cash
 
Sales
 – Sum of all sales made to cash (Inc Tax)
    
Credit
 
Sales
 – Sum of all sales made to credit (Inc Tax)
    
Credit
 
Tips
 – Sum of all Tips made to credit
Comps
    
#
 -Number of Comps 
    
%
 - Comps$ divide (Total transactions + $comps) x 100
    
$
 - Sum of all comps
Promotions
    # - No of Promotions
    % - $Promotions divide (Total transactions + $Promotions) x 100
    $ - Sum of all promotions
Pre Submit Removals
    # - No Of removals
    % - $Pre Submit Removals divide (Total transactions + $Pre Submit Removals) x 100
    $ - Sum of all Removals
Post Submit Removals
    # - Number of Removals
    % - $Post Submit Removals divide (Total transactions + $Post Submit Removals) x 100
    $ - Sum of all removals
Voids
    # - No of Voids
    $ - Sum of all Voids
Refunds
    # - Number of Refunds
    $ - Sum of all Refunds
Till Bank Shortage – The dollar amount of all till and bank shortages during the date range
Claimed Tip Report
Back Office > Settings > POS > Claim Tips has to be on which will prompt you for tips when clocking out. The results will show in this report
You can Filter by Date or Employee
Employee
 – The name of the employee claiming the tip
Date
 – The date and time the tip was claimed
Claimed
 
Tip
 – How much was entered by the employee when they declared their tips when clocking out 
Credit
 
Tips
 – How much in credit tips was registered against this employee
Credit
 
Gratuity
 – If gratuity was added to a transaction and paid off with the credit payment type then it will appear here
Credit
 
Tips
 + 
Gratuity
 – The is the sum of Credit Tips and Credit Gratuity
Cash
 
Gratuity
 - If gratuity was added to a transaction and paid off with Cash then it will appear here
Edit
 – Allows you to edit the cash tips for this employee
Comp Detail Report
Shows a list of all the invoices with comps and lets you see who commend them and why
You can filter date or by employee
Invoice
 
ID
 – The ID for the invoice
Date
 / 
Time
 – The Time and date the Comp was applied
Employee
 – Who initiated the Comp
Manager
 – Who authorized the override 
Item
 – The Menu Item that was Comped
Comp
 
Amount
 – Sale amount for the Comped Item (Not Inc Tax)
Reason
 – The reason chosen when performing the Comp
Notes
 – Any notes added by the employee when Comping the item
Promotion detail report
Shows a list of all Invoices that used a promotion along with who gave it and how much it was. This allows you to analyze if they are genuine or suspect
 You can filter by Date or Employee
Invoice
 
ID
 – Allows you to click through to the transaction detail report
Date
/
Time
 – The date and time the promotion was applied
Employee
 – The employee who initiated the promotion
Manager
 – The employee that authorized the override
Promotion
 – The name of the promotion that was applied
Discount
 
Amount
 – The $ amount that was removed by using the promotion
Credit Tips Report
Allows you to compare who is getting what tips
You can only filter by Date
Employee
 – The Name of the Employee
Credit
 
Tips
 – Sum of all Credit tips for the Employee
Credit
 
Gratuity
 – If Gratuity is added to a check and paid using the credit payment type then it will show here for the Employee
Cash
 
Gratuity
 – If Gratuity is added to a check and paid using the Cash payment type then it will show here
Total
 
Tip
 
& Gratuity
 – Credit Tips + Credit Gratuity + Cash Gratuity
Claimed
 
Tips
 – The amount of cash tips declared / claimed by the employee. Tips are claimed at clock out and have to be enabled from 
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
POS
 > 
Claim
 
Tips 
=
 On
Employee Hours Report
A list of all employees that have clocked in and out within the date range
You can filter by Date only
Employee
 – The name of the employee
Job
 
Title
 – The Job Title chosen when clocking in
Payrate
 – The payrate for the chosen Job Title
Date
 – The date of the Punch
In
 – The time the employee clockedIn
Out
 – The time the employee clocked Out
Hours
 – The time in Hours between the clock In and the clock Out
Employee
 
Total
 – The sum of all the hours worked
Grand
 
Total
 – The total of all hours for all employees
Add
 
Punch
 – Allows you to add a clock in or a clock out for an employee
Employee Payroll Income Report
A list of all employees and how much they cost you vs how much they turned over.
You can filter this report by Dates and Employee
Job
 
Title
 – The Title of the job the Employee choose when they clocked in
Sales
 – Sum of all sales for that employee
Pay Rate 
– The pay rate is set against the Job
Hours
 – How many hours were completed for each Job Title
Total 
– The sum of each line
Claimed
 
Tips
 – Cash tips claimed by the employee when clocking out
Credit
 
Tips
 – Credit card tips declared for each employee
Credit
 
Gratuity
 – Gratuity paid with credit
Grand
 
Total
 – The sum of Total Pay + Claimed Tips + Credit Tips + Credit Gratuity
Avg
 
Pay Rate
 - = Grand Total divide Total Hours
Employee Payroll Report
List of all employees and how much you need to pay them
You can filter by Date – Employee or Job 
Job
 
Title
 – The Job Title associated with these hours
Pay
 
Rate
 – The hourly rate attached to the Job Title
Hours
 
Total
 – How many hours were worked
Total
 – Pay rate x hours
Claimed
 
Tips
 – The amount the employee declared/ Claimed in cash tips when clocking out
Grand
 
Total
 – Total + Claimed Tips
Manager Performance Report
A list of all employees that have performed overrides on some key areas so you can see if one sticks out compared to the others.
You can filter by Date or Employee
Manager
 – The name of the person who performed the override
Comps
    
#
 - Number of comps performed
$
 - Sum of all comps
Coupons
#
 - Number of promotions used
$
 - Sum of Promotions
Post-Submit Removals
#
 - Number of Post-Submit removals Performed
$
 - Sum of all post-Submit Removals
Voids
#
 - Number of Voids performed
$
 - Sum of all voids performed
Refunds
#
 - Number of refunds performed
$
 - Sum of all Refunds
Till Bank Shortage – 
The sum of the shortages of any declared Tills or Banks for that employee
Post Submit Removal Detail Report
Shows a list of all invoices where a Post Submit Removal was performed with some detail on the transaction
You can filter by Date or Employee
Invoice
 
ID
 – Links to the Transaction detail report for the invoice
Date/Time
 – The date and time the Removal was performed
Employee
 – The name of the employee that initiated the removal
Manager
 –  The name of the manager that authorized the override
Item
 – The item that was removed
Total
 – The sale price for the Item
Reason
 – The reason that was chosen
Notes
 – Any notes that were added at the time
Pre Submit Removal Detail Report
Shows a list of all invoices where a Pre Submit Removal was performed with some detail on the transaction
Invoice
 
ID
 – Links to the Transaction detail report for the invoice
Date/Time
 – The date and time the Removal was performed
Employee
 – The name of the employee that initiated the removal
Item
 – The item that was removed
Total
 – The sale price for the Item
Reason
 – The reason that was chosen if required
Notes
 – Any notes that were added at the time
Employee Payroll Report Mansion
This is like the Employee Payroll Report but with more information
You can filter by Date, Employee and Job Title
Job
 
Title
 –  The Job Title selected when the employee clocked in
Pay
 
Rate
 – The pay rate associated with the Job Title
Hours
 – How many hours were logged against each Job Title
Total
 – Is the Column that contains the results
(
CR
) 
Remaining
 
Tips
 – Declared Credit Tips
Check
 
Total
 – Sum of Hours for all Jobs
Cash
 
Sales
 – Sum of all cash sales made by this employee (Inc Tax)
Claimed Cash Tips – 
The sum of all cash tips claimed when clocking out
Cash
 
Tip
 
Percentage
 – Cash tips as a percentage of cash sales. =Cash tips divided by cash sales x 100
Remaining
 
Credit
 
Tips
 – Declared Credit Tips
Credit
 
Card
 
Sales
 – The sum of all credit sales made by this employee (Inc Tax)
Credit
 
Tip
 
Percentage
 – Credit tips as a percentage of credit sales. =Credit Tips divided by credit sales x 100
Grand
 
Total
 – Check Total + Claimed Cash Tips + Total Credit Tips
Average Pay - 
= Grand total divided by total hours worked
Check
 
Totals
Hours
 – Total Hours Worked
Total
 – Total pay not including tips
Labor Tracking Report
Allows you to track labor costs for the business day by day for a given week by Job category so you can see your costs for management, bar staff kitchen staff etc
You can filter by Date, Year and Week
Date –  The date the labor was used
Category Name – The name of the Job category will show in the first column. The cost of labor will show in the days of the week
Total Labor – The total labor cost for the day
Week Total – The total labor cost for the week
Waste Detail Report
Shows you which Menu Items have been wasted from the front end
You can filter this report by Date, and Employee
Invoice ID – Links to the transaction detail report
Date/Time – The date and time the wastage was applied
Employee – The name of the employee who initiated the wastage event
Manager – The name of the employee who authorized the override
Item –  The item that was wasted
Waste Amount – Always Zero
Reason – The reason chosen at the time 
Notes – Any notes entered at the time
Inventory Reports
Cost Report
Allows you to see how much money you have spent on inventory over a date range
You can filter this report by Date and Departments
Item
 – The name of the Inventory Product
On
 
hand
 
Date
 – How many of the product you had on the start date (take note of the unit)
Market
 
Value
 
Date
 – The cost price of the inventory item on the start date 
$
 
Purchased
 – How many of the product was ordered within the date range
Avg
 
Cost
 
Per
 
Unit
 – 
$purchased
 divided by 
# Purchased
On
 
Hand
 
Date
- How many of the product you have on the end date
Market
 
Value
 – The cost price of the inventory item on the end date
Market
 
Value
 
Change
 – Shows the difference in the cost price of the product between the start and end date
Current Market Value Report
Tells you how much money you have or had invested in inventory at a specific point in time based on actual inventory declarations. The default is today
You Can filter this report by Date or by Department
#
 - The sequential order the Product was added in
Inventory
 
Item
 – The name of the Inventory Product
Department
 – Name of the inventory Department
Units – 
How many of each Product you have in stock
Current Market
 
Value
 
Per
 
unit
 – The cost value of the inventory per unit
Current Market Value 
– The cost value of the inventory
Estimated Current Market Value Report
This is the same as the Current Market Value Report but used the Calculated on hand value instead of the declared inventory count
#
 - The sequential order the Product was added in
Inventory
 
Item
 – The name of the Inventory Product
Department
 – Name of the inventory Department
Units – 
How many of each Product you have in stock
Current Market
 
Value
 
Per
 
unit
 – The cost value of the inventory per unit
Current Market Value 
– The cost value of the inventory
Gain and Loss Report
This is the report you would run to see if you are up or down on inventory
You can filter by Date and time, Use actual counts and Inventory Departments
Item
 – The name of the Inventory Product
Department
 – The name of the Inventory Department
Beginning
 
Actual
 
Date
 – closing count from the earliest inventory declaration within this date range. If you untick “Use actual counts” then this will become the Beginning theoretical value
Sales
 
Adjustment
 – The sum of all the products sold through menu Items during the date range
Front
 
End
 
Waste
 
Adjustment
 – Any wastage entered through the front end
Back
 
End
 
Waste
 
Adjustment
 – Any wastage entered through the back office
Inventory
 
Adjustment
 – Any Products that were purchased during the date range
Expected
 
On
 
Hand
 – “BeginningActual” minus “Sales Adjustments” minus “Front End Waste Adjustment” minus “Back End Waste Adjustment” + or Minus Inventory Adjustment
Ending
 
Actual
 
Date
 – Closing count for from the latest inventory declaration registered within the date range
Gain
 
Loss
    
Units
 = Red is down Green is up. The number of units for the product that you are down or up over the period. This will be the difference between the expected on hand and ending actual
%
 - Represents how much you are up or down as a percentage
Est $
 - Gain / Loss units x latest cost
Retail Markup Report
Shows you how much money you will make on each menu item based on cost price for all products in the recipe vs the sale price for the item
You cannot filter this report
Menu
 
Item
 – The name of the Menu Item
Item
 
Cost
 – Sum of the cost of all Products in the Item Recipe
Item
 
Retail
 – The sale price for the Item
Markup $
 - “
Item
 
Retail
 less “
Item
 
Cost
”
Markup %
 - Markup as a percentage of Item Cost. “Markup $” divide “Item Cost” x 100
Purchase Order Report
Shows you all the purchase orders within the date range and allows you to view or edit them
You can filter by Date only
PO / Invoice
 – The Purchase order Number
Date
 
Created
 – Date the Order was raised
Order
 
Date
 – Date the order was submitted
Received
 
Date
 – Date the order was received  
Employee
 – Name of the employee that started the Order
Notes
 – Any notes that were added to the order
Supplier
 – The name of the supplier for the Order
View
 
Invoice
 – Allows you to click through to the Invoice report which details exactly what was on the order. From that report you can click on edit invoice and change the invoice retrospectively 
Actual Inventory Report
Shows a list of all Inventory Declarations and allows you to edit them
You can filter this report by Date 
Report
 
ID
 – A number that identifies the Inventory count
Date
 
Entered
 – The date the inventory was counted and processed
Actual Date – 
The date that was chosen when you were asked when you wanted to do the inventory count for
Date
 
Finalized
 - The date the count was submitted and finalized
Employee
 – The name of the employee which started the inventory count
View
 
Items
 – Takes you to a read only version of the actual inventory item report
Adjust Entry – 
Allows you to edit the actual inventory retrospectively
Actual Inventory Item Report
You get to this report by clicking on “View Items” in the “Actual Inventory Report”
Item
 – Name of the Inventory Product
Previous
 
Actual
 – The end count for the previous inventory count
Sales
 
Adjustment
 – any sales made between the last inventory count and this one
Waste
 
Adjustment
 – Front end waste adjustments from the last count to this one. 
Inventory
 
Adjustment
 – Any Orders that have been processed from the last inventory to this one
Estimated
 
On
 
Hand
 – Previous actual – Sales Adjustment -Waste + Inventory Adjustment
Count
 – The actual declaration
Customer reports
Customer Report
There are several reports in one for this report. There is a dropdown box which will change the report
Customer Performance report
Allows you to see spend per customer to find your best customers
Customer
 
ID
 – Links through to the customer Detail Report
Total
 
#
 
purchases
 – Number of transactions completed whilst that customer was assigned to the sale
Total
 
Spent
 – Sum of all spend across all visits (Inc Tax)
Days
 
Since
 
Last
 
Visit
 – How many days since the customer last completed a transaction
Registration
 
Date
 – The date the customer was put on the system
Address
 – Customers Address
Phone
 
#
 - Customers Phone Number
Email –  
Customers email address
Customer Loyalty Report
The Loyalty system consists of assigning VIP cards to members and they can accrue points for their spend or visits. This report allows you to see each VIP member and their spend
Customer
 
ID
 – Links through to the Customer Detail Report
Total
 
#
 
Purchases
 Number of transactions completed whilst the customers VIP card was assigned to the sale
Total Spend
 – Sum of all spend across all visits (Inc Tax)
Days
 
Since
 
Last
 
Visit 
- How many days since the customer last completed a transaction
Registration
 
Date 
- The date the customer was put on the system
Address
 – Customers Address
Phone
 
#
 - Customers Phone Number
Email
 - Customers email address
Customer Registration Report
Shows when Each Customer was Registered
Search
Allows you to search for the name of a customer. If you search with no name entered it will return all customers
Advanced Search
Allows you to search members using number of transactions or a minimum spend amount and an activation date range
Customer Detail Report
You get to this report by clicking through from one of the customer reports
It will show you each invoice associated with the customer
Invoice ID
 – Links to the Transaction detail report
Order ID
 – If a ticket is split then the order ID will be the same on both tickets
Date and Time
 – The date and time the order was completed
Subtotal
 – The amount before Tax
Discount
 – Any discount that was applied
Tax Total
 – Sum of all taxes
Grand Total
 – Subtotal + Tax
Cash Paid
 – Amount Paid in Cash
Credit Paid
 – Amount Paid in Credit
Check Paid
 – Amount Paid in Check
Gift
 
Card
 
Paid
 – Amount Paid in Gift Card
Other
 
payment
 
Paid
 – Amount Paid in custom payment types
Status
 – The status of the invoice
Promotion Usage Report
Shows all applied promotions within a date range
You can filter by Date, Employee and Profit Center
Promotion
 – The name of the promotion used
Average
 
Value
 – Value of discount / number of discounts
Total
 
Orders
 – The cost of the orders after the discount
Average
 
Total
 – Total orders / number of discounts
Average
 
#
 
Used Per Ticket
 – The average time the promotion was used per ticket
Total used
 – How many times that promotion has been used
Total
 –  Total sum of money discounted using that promotion
Active Bank
Shows you any currently active banks
Employee
 – The name of the employee who opened the bank
Open
 
Date
 – The date and time the bank was opened
Cash
 
Reading
 – Sum of all transactions paid using the Cash Payment method
Credit
 
Reading
 – Sum of all transactions paid using the Credit Payment method
Check
 
Reading
 – Sum of all transactions paid using the Check Payment method
Gift
 
Card
 
Reading
 – Sum of all transactions paid using the Gift Card Payment method
Other
 
Payment
 
Reading
 - Sum of all transactions paid using Custom Payment methods
View
 
Transactions
  - Links through to the Active bank Transaction Report
Active Bank Transaction report
Shows a list of all transactions for the currently open Bank
Active Tills
Shows a list of all active tills 
Employee
 
(s)
 – The names of the employees who opened and are assigned to the till
Terminal
 – The terminal number the Till is open on 
Open
 
Date
 – The date the till was opened
Cash
 
Reading
 – Sum of all transactions paid using the Cash Payment method
Credit
 
Reading
 – Sum of all transactions paid using the Credit Payment method
Check
 
Reading
 – Sum of all transactions paid using the Check Payment method
Gift
 
Card
 
Reading
 – Sum of all transactions paid using the Gift Card Payment method
Other
 
Payment
 
Reading
 - Sum of all transactions paid using Custom Payment methods
View
 
Transactions
 – Links to the Till Transaction Report
Closed Banks
Shows a list of all closed Banks. You can come here to see if there were any Bank shortages
You can filter this report by Date
Fees to Restaurant
 - Service fees or fee group amount that goes to the restaurant
Fees to Employee
 - Service fees or fee group amount that goes to the restaurant
Fees to 3
rd
 par
ty - Service fees or fee group amount that goes to a group of employees
Cash Reading
 – How much cash the system calculated you should have had
Credit Reading
 – How much in credit the system calculated you should have had
Check Reading
 - - How much in Checks the system calculated you should have had
Gift Card Reading
 – How much in Gift Cards the system calculated you should have had
Other Payment Reading
 – How much in custom Media Types the system calculated you should have had
Cash Actual
 – How much was actually declared
Credit Actual
 - How much was actually declared
Gift Card Actual
 - How much was actually declared
Other Payment Actual
 - How much was actually declared
Cash Difference
 – The difference between the Reading and the Actual
Credit Difference
 - The difference between the Reading and the Actual
Check Difference
 - The difference between the Reading and the Actual
Gift Card Difference
 - The difference between the Reading and the Actual
Other Payment Difference
 - The difference between the Reading and the Actual
Closed Tills
A list of all closed Tills
You can filter by Date
Terminal 
– The terminal the bank was opened on
Fees to Restaurant
 - Service fees or fee group amount that goes to the restaurant
Fees to Employee
 - Service fees or fee group amount that goes to the restaurant
Fees to 3
rd
 par
ty - Service fees or fee group amount that goes to a group of employees
Cash Reading
 – How much cash the system calculated you should have had
Credit Reading
 – How much in credit the system calculated you should have had
Check Reading
 - - How much in Checks the system calculated you should have had
Gift Card Reading
 – How much in Gift Cards the system calculated you should have had
Other Payment Reading
 – How much in custom Media Types the system calculated you should have had
Cash Actual
 – How much was actually declared
Credit Actual
 - How much was actually declared
Gift Card Actual
 - How much was actually declared
Other Payment Actual
 - How much was actually declared
Cash Difference
 – The difference between the Reading and the Actual
Credit Difference
 - The difference between the Reading and the Actual
Check Difference
 - The difference between the Reading and the Actual
Gift Card Difference
 - The difference between the Reading and the Actual
Other Payment Difference
 - The difference between the Reading and the Actual
Consolidated Till and Bank Report
Allows you to see Till and Bank reports In one place
You can filter this report by Date
Bank / Till
 – The Name of the bank or till
Sales
 – Sum of all sales put through the till or bank (Inc tax) Includes float????
Refunds
 – The sum of any refunds issued
Voids
 – The sum of any voids
Net
 – Sales – Refunds -Voids (Still includes Tax)
Cash
 
Total
 – Sum of all Cash sales (Includes the float)
Credit Sales 
– Sum of all Credit sales
Credit
 
Gratuity
 – Sum of all Gratuity paid to Credit
Credit
 
Tips
 – Sum of all Credit Tips
Credit
 
Total
 – Credit Sales + Credit Gratuity + Credit Tips
Gift Card Sales 
– Sum of all Gift Card sales
Gift Card Gratuity 
– Sum of all Gift Card Gratuity
Gift Card Tips
 –  Sum of all Gift Card Tips
Gift Card Total
 – Gift Card sales + Gift Card Gratuity + Gift Card Tips
Other Payment Total
 – Sum of all sales paid to custom payment types
Check
 
Total
 – Sum of all sales paid to Check
Pay Ins 
– Sum of all paid Ins
Pay
 
Outs
 – Sum of all Paid outs
Pay
 
Ins/Outs
 – “Paid Out” minus “Paid In”
Total Collected
 – Sum of all tips collected
Totals are sum of all of the banks and tills combined
Bank and Till Tracker
This report will show all Tills and Banks with Category sales and discounts
You can filter this report by Date
Bank / Till
Category
 – A list of the report categories and much money was taken against each (Inc Tax)
Gift
 
Cards
 
Sold 
– The amount of money attributed to the selling of gift cards
Discounts 
– The sum of all gift card sales
Net
 
Sales
 – The sum of all sales minus Discounts minus 
Tax
 – 
Credit Sales 
– Sum of all Credit sales
Credit
 
Gratuity
 – Sum of all Gratuity paid to Credit
Credit
 
Tips
 – Sum of all Credit Tips
Credit
 
Total
 – Credit Sales + Credit Gratuity + Credit Tips
Gift Card Sales 
– Sum of all Gift Card sales
Gift Card Gratuity 
– Sum of all Gift Card Gratuity
Gift Card Tips
 –  Sum of all Gift Card Tips
Gift Card Total
 – Gift Card sales + Gift Card Gratuity + Gift Card Tips
Menu Reports
Category Performance Report
Allows you to compare the performance of category sales
You can filter this report by Date, Category, Report Group, Employee and profit center
Category Performance data is estimated due to the fact that some items such as discounts and taxes are calculated on full orders.  When splitting these items up by category, rounding may occur causing small differences in the totals.
Category
 – The name of the category
Est
 
Gross
 
Sales
 – Sum of all sales for that category (not Inc Tax)
Est
 
Discount
 – Sum of all the discounts applied to items in the category
Comps
 – Sum of all comps applied to items in the category
Est
 
Default
 
Taxrate
 
Collected
 – There will be a column for every tax rate you have made. The taxrates I made were called Tax Exempt Default Taxrate and Taxcode 3
Est
 
Net
 – The sum of all the sales less discounts, comps and tax
Est Gross – Est Tax
 – is the est Gross less the sum of the taxes (does not remove Discounts or comps)
Item Performance Report
Lists all Menu Items that have been sold and allows you to compare them
You can filter by Date, Taxcode, Employee Profit Center and Category
Item
 – The name of the Menu Item
Quantity
 
Sold
 – How many of the item has been sold
Average Price
 – The average selling price for the item (Not Inc Tax)
Total Options
 – Sum of any modifiers sold with this item
Total $ Sold
 – The price of all items sold added together. (Not inc Modifiers or Tax)
View Transactions
 – links through to the transaction report
Item Price Report
Lists every Menu Item with its sale price so you can quickly check if the prices are correct Grouped by Menu Category. You can also see if the item is unique or has a sale reference to another item
Item
 
name
 – The name of the Menu Item
Item Price – 
The sale price for the item
Reference
 
Item
 – The sales reference for the item
Item Report
Shows all Menu items and how to get to each menu item, along with any modifier groups attached to them. For example, if Cobra Rum is a sub item of run it would show Rum > Cobra Rum
Item
 
Name
 – The name of the Menu Item
Item
 
Price
 – The sale price for the item
Notes
 – You used to be able to make notes against items. However that has been removed and this column is here for legacy support
Modifier Performance Report By Item
This report will show you a list of all items that have been sold in the date range together with the modifiers 
You can filter by Date, Category, Taxcode, Employee and Profit center
Item
 – The name of the Item
Quantity Sold
 – How many of the Item were sold based on the filters
Average
 
price
 – Sum of the price all the Items sold for divided by the quantity. Stand alone modifiers will also show in this column ( Not Inc Tax)
Total
 
Options
 – Sum of all modifiers sold with these Items as part of a modifier set (Not Inc Tax)
Total
 
$
 
Sold
 – This is the total price of the Items sold (Not Inc Tax) Modifiers are not in this calculation
Modifier Price Report
Shows a list of all Modifiers with their price and what modifier set they are in. This is a good report for checking that all your modifiers are set up in the right group with the right price. 
There are no filters available for this report
Recipe Report
Shows a list of all Menu Items and their recipes. After you set up your inventory you should head to this report to check the recipes.
You can filter by Menu Category
Menu Categorization Report
This report shows me every Item and what category it is in. The unique thing about this report is that you can change the category straight from the report. So If something is wrong you can correct it straight away.
You can filter by Date and Report Category. You can also show active items only, include or exclude unsold items and include custom items/Fees
Category
 – The Report Category the Item belongs to
Item
 – The name of the Menu Item
Quantity
 
Sold
 – How many of the Menu Item have been sold
Average
 
Price
 – Sum price for all sales divided by the number of sales (Not Inc Tax)
Total Options 
–
 
Sum of any Modifiers that were sold by the items (Not Inc Tax)
Total $ Sold 
– The sum of all sales for that item (Not inc Tax)
View
 
Transactions
 – Takes you to the transaction report
Custom Menu Items Report
Custom Items are sold from Order Functions on the front end and are a way to sell items that don’t exist on the system.
This report will show you all of the custom items that have been sold with their price and who sold them.
You can filter this report by Date
Date
 
and
 
Time
 – The date and time the items were sold
Item
 – The name of the Custom Item entered by the employee
Employee
 – The name of the employee that sold the Custom Item
Sale
 
Price
 – The price of the Custom Item (Not Inc Tax)
Quantity 
– How many of the Custom Item were sold
Modifiers
 – The cost of any modifiers that were added to the Custom Item (Not Inc Tax)
Total
 
Price
 – Sum of the cost of the Custom Items
Modifier Performance Report
Allows you to see how many modifiers were sold and how much they were sold for.
You can filter this report by Date
Custom Menu Modifier Report
Custom Modifiers are sold Order Functions on the front end. They are used to sell modifiers that don’t exist on the menu. Then can also be used for Kitchen instruction
You can filter this report by Date
 
Date and Time
 – The date and time the Modifier was sold
Modifier
 – The name of the modifier entered by the employee
Employee
 – The name of the employee that sold the Modifier
Sale
 
Price
 – The price the Modifier was sold for (Not Inc Tax)
Totals
 – The sum of all the sale prices
Accounts
Account Transaction Report
This is where you would go to see what transactions have been happening on your account
You can filter this report by Date, Account, Orders Charged and payments
Starting
 
balance
 – The sum of the balance of all accounts at the start of the date range (Inc Tax)
Invoice
 
ID
 – Links through to the Transaction detail report
Date
 
and
 
Time
 – The date and time the sale was charged to account
Account
 – The name of the account the transaction was settled to
Total
 – The amount the transaction was settled for (Inc Tax) (Red is a payment off the balance)
Tip
 – Any Tip that was paid for with an account
Grand Total 
– Total + Tip
Ending Balance
 – Sum of all grand totals
Other Reports
Table Service Performance report
Allows you to compare metrics by hour on table service sales
You can filter this report by Date, Employee Job Title and hours of the day
Open – Drink
 – Average time in minutes from when the table was opened to when the first drink was entered?
Open – App
 – Average time in minutes from when the table was opened to when the first appetizer was entered
Open – Last Item
 – Average time in minutes from when the table was opened to when the last item was added to the check
Open – last Printed Check
 – Average time in minutes from when the table was opened to when the last check was printed
Open – Table Reset
 - Average time in minutes from when the table was opened to when the table was reset to be used again 
Tables Opened
 – How many tables were opened in that hour
Tables Closed
 – How many tables were closed in that hour
Category Count
 – How many items were sold that belong to that category within the hour
Category Sales
 – Sum of all money taken in sales from that category within the hour
Total
 – Is the total of all of the hours for the given metric
Outliers (In seconds) 
– Default is 10 – 3600 but you are free to set this to any value. Any times outside of this range will not count towards the average.
KDS Performance Report
Allows you to compare key metrics on KDS performance hour by hour
You can filter this report by Time, Employee, Job Title, Order method and hours
Start – Bump – The average time in minutes from when the order was started to the time it was bBumped
Send – Bump – The average time in minutes from when the order was sent to the time it was Bumped 
Start Print – The average time in minutes from when the order was started to when the order was printed
Outliers (In seconds) 
– Default is 10 – 3600 but you are free to set this to any value. Any times outside of this range will not count towards the average.
Dashboard
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Dashboard
. From Here you can turn the dashboard reports on or off and change their position.
The Dashboard Report is the first thing that loads when you open the back office. It is meant to give an overview of the business and is comprised of the following reports
Sales Graph
Shows Hour by hour how much the business has taken (Inc Tax)
You can filter this report by a selection of pre-defined dates, last week, today etc or by profit center
Sales Total
Shows a breakdown of sales for the chosen period
You can filter this report by a selection of pre-defined dates, last week, today etc or by profit center
Sales by Order Method
A pie chart to represent how much money has been made through each order type
You can filter this report by a selection of pre-defined dates, last week, today etc or by profit center
Statistics
Shows some key risk factors in both monitory value and as a percentage of net sales (Not Inc Tax)
You can filter this report by a selection of pre-defined dates, last week, today etc or by profit center
Comps – Sum of all Comps performed
Coupons – Sum of all coupons / Promotions applied to sales
Pre-Submit Removals – Sum of all Pre-Submit Removals
Post Submit Removals – Sum of all Post Submit Removals
Voids – Sum of all voids
Active Tills
This report will show both active Tills and Banks
You cannot filter this report
Terminal
 -  The Terminal used to open the Till
Opened
 –  Date and time the Till or Bank was opened
Funds
 – Sum of all monies taken for the Till or Bank (Inc Tax)
Personal
 
Banks
 – Name of the employee who the Bank belongs to
Category Sales
This pie chart represents all of the sales and how much of those sales belong to each category
You can filter this report by a selection of pre-defined dates, last week, today etc or by profit center
Top Selling Items
Shows the top 10 selling items defined by quantity sold
You can filter this report by a selection of pre-defined dates, last week, today etc or by profit center
Item
 – The name of the Menu Item
#
 - How many were sold
Sales
 – The sum of all the sales for that item (Not Inc Tax)
Time Clock Activity
Shows the last 10 time clock punches
You cannot filter this report
Employee
 – The employees Name
In/Out
 – Whether the employee clocked in or out
Time
 – Time and date stamp for the punch
Labor
Shows all labor costs for the date range and the 
You can filter this report by a selection of pre-defined dates, last week, today etc
Category – This is the Job Category Can be set to Management, kitchen, servers etc
Hours
 – Total number of hours worked by all employees in the date range
Total
 – The total labor cost based on hours worked x Pay Rate
Avg
 – The average hourly Pay Rate
%
 - Percentage of Net sales
Labor
 
Totals
 – The sum of the columns
Custom Reports
These custom reports will allow you to calculate a few different things. They can be used in may ways but I will give you a couple of examples.
Go to 
Back
 
Office
 >  
Settings
 > 
Report
 > Scroll down to 
Event
 
Metrics
First you have to set up an event.
Click on 
Events
 > 
Add
 
Event
Event Type
  
Checkout Items
 
 
- Triggers an event when a Menu Item is sold
Checkout Modifiers
 - Triggers an event when a Modifier is sold
Event Name
 - The name of the event
Quantity to Trigger Event
 – How many Items or Modifiers that have to be sold in 
one sale
 in order to trigger an event. If you choose 6 in this field then 6 Items or Modifiers would have to be sold within one sale for this event to be triggered. 6 sales of one item per sale would not trigger this event.
Event
 
Multipliers
 – When the event is triggered the amount reported will be multiplied by this number. For example, if you had an event of 6 pack of coke, with a Quantity to Trigger Event of “1” but you wanted to know how many cokes were sold then you would but the Event Multipliers as “6”
Items
 – Press shift or Ctrl to select more than 1 item if required. If you choose more than one item then the event will be triggered when any of the items selected are sold. Just press Save Event to add the items to the list
Metrics -
 allow you to apply some math to the events which translate to the reports.
Click on 
Add Metric
 to get started
Metric Operator – 
what type of math will be performed. Options are 
            
Sum
 
            
Multiplication
            
Division
Metric Name 
– What you would like to call the Metric
Metrics/Events
 – A list of all the Events or metrics you currently have. These can be used together with the Metric operator to produce a result you would like to report on.
You can select either a number, an Event or a Metric. Sum will add these together but only requires one to be selected. The others require at least 2
Choose one or more options using shift or Ctrl then save by clicking on “
Add
 
Metric
”
Custom Reports
New Report Name 
– Enter the name of the report and click on “
New Report
”
Click on the 
icon to choose what you Metric you want to appear in the report
To view the report, click on the 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Inbox Reports

Overview
Utilizing inbox reports will allow you to receive the statistics for your business on a scheduled basis. You can configure which reports you want to receive and how frequently you receive them. 
Send Report
You can send the report to your email, or if you have a ftp server, you can send the spreadsheet (
CSV
 file) or 
PDF
 file instead.
Schedule This Report
You can schedule a report to be sent to you on occurence. You can also specify what time as well.
Modify Your Scheduled Reports
You'll be provided with list of reports that you have scheduled. From there you'll be able to modify them.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Sales Summary

This section of the Operations Report shows you your total sales for the day.
The operations report can be found in the 
Back Office
 under 
Data Mining
 > 
Sales Reports
Sales Summary
Gross
 
Sales
 – Total of all sales before discounts/comps and tax
Does not include event deposits.
Refunds
 – Total amount of refunds issued
Discounts
/
Promos
– Total amount of discounts or promotions issued.
Comps
 – Total amount of compensation issued.
Pay
 
Ins/pay outs
 – Amount of pay ins/outs
Fees
 
Collected - 
Total amount of fees collected from transactions
Includes service fees
On
 
Account Transactions
 – Total of all transactions settled to an account
Includes taxes
On
 
Account
 
Tips
 – Tips paid for using account
Adjusted
 
Gross
 - The Gross Sales calculated by subtracting 
Refunds
, 
Discounts,
 
Comps
, 
Pay Ins 
& 
Outs
, 
On
 
Account Transactions
 and 
On
 
Account
 
Tips
.
Tax
 
Collected
 – Total amount of tax collected on all payment methods (Cash, Credit, etc)
Gift
 
Cards
 
Sold
 – This is the total value amount of all gift cards sold.
There will be a number in Parentheses with the number of gift cards sold.
On
 
Account
 – The total amount of money paid using accounts (Inc Tax)
Includes taxes
Pay
 
Ins
 – Total amount of money paid into the till.
Pay
 
Outs
 – Total amount of money taken out of the till.
Net
 
Sales
 - This amount is calculated from the Adjusted Gross. It removes the taxes, gift cards, while adding back in the Paid Ins/Outs and On Account Transactions.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Operations Report

This is your main report and will show you what you need to know on a day to day basis
The 
Operations Report
 can be found in the 
Back Office
 under 
Data Mining
 > 
Sales Reports
Information on the various sections in the Operations Report can be found in these articles below
Sales Summary
Sales Summary By Taxcode
Tip Summary
Sales By Order Method
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Sales Summary By Taxcode

This section of the Operations report shows you your tax codes, sales and tax collected against each taxcode.
The operations report can be found in the 
Back Office
 under 
Data Mining
 > 
Sales Reports
Sales Summary By Taxcode
Tax Exempt
 - Total amount of sales that were excluded from taxes
Default Taxrate
 - Total amount of sales that were included in taxes.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Tips Summary

This section of the Operations report 
lets you know what payment method was used to give tips.
The operations report can be found in the 
Back Office
 under 
Data Mining
 > 
Sales Reports
Sales Summary By Taxcode
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Deposit Summary

The 
Deposit Summary
 section on the 
Operations Reports
 outline the total amount of money received as a deposit. 
This includes Cash, Credit Card, Gift Card, Check, and other payment methods. 
The operations report can be found in the 
Back Office
 under 
Data Mining
 > 
Sales Reports
Deposit Summary
Cash Sales
 -  Total amount of cash sales
Includes Tax
Tips Collected 
- The total of any tips paid. 
Tips made to other payment methods will be taken out of cash to pay the server so it appears negative here.
Pay Outs
 - Total amount of of all Pay Ins
Pay Outs 
- Total amount of of all Pay Ins
Cash Refunds
 – Total amount of cash refunds issued
Cash Event Deposits
 – Payments collected in cash for events.
Cash Deposit Expected
 – How much cash you should have to deposit.
Credit Sales
 - Total amount of sales paid using credit
Includes Tax
Online Credit Sales
 – Total amount of credit card sales made from the Online Ordering site.
Credit Tips
 – Total amount of tips collected from credit cards.
Credit Refunds
 – Total amount of credit refunds issued.
Credit Event Deposits
 - 
Total amount of payments collected by credit for events.
Credit Deposit Expected
 = Expected credit deposit into a bank account.
This deposit amount is calculated from the following: 
Credit Sales
 + 
Online Credit Sales
 + 
Credit Tips
  + 
Credit Event Deposits
 
- 
Credit Refunds
Check Sales
 –Total amount of sales paid for using Checks
Includes Tax
Check Tips
 - Total amount of tips paid using checks
Check Refunds
  – 
Total amount of check refunds issued.
Check Event Deposits
 - 
Total amount of payments collected by checks for events.
Check Deposit Expected
 - 
How much funds in checks you should have to deposit.
Gift Card Sales
 -Total amount of sales paid for using Gift Cards
Include Tax
Gift Card Tips
 - 
Total amount of sales paid for using gift cards.
Gift Card Refunds
 – 
Total amount of refunds issued to gift cards.
Gift Card Event Deposits
 - 
Total amount of payments redeemed by gift cards for events.
Gift Card Deposit Expected
 - The total amount of money redeemed from gift card balances. 
Other Payment Sales
 – Total sales paid for using custom payment methods.
Includes Tax
Other Payment Event Deposits
 - 
Total amount of payments collected by other payment methods for events.
Other Payment Deposit Expected
 - How much the system calculates you should have using the custom payment methods
Redeemed Event Deposit
 – The $ amount of Deposits that have been redeemed
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Sales By Order Method

This section of the Operations Report shows the total amount of money being made from each order type.
This includes Cash, Credit Card, Gift Card, Check, and other payment methods. 
The operations report can be found in the 
Back Office
 under 
Data Mining
 > 
Sales Reports
Sales By Order Method
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Service Fees Setup







Overview






This feature is intended to allow you to charge a fee if a customer pays with a card. Although it can be used with any payment method.


Setting up the Service Fees


Go to 
Back Office
 > 
Settings 
> 
Service Fees




Considering Cash Discount or Dual Pricing programs for Credit Card Processing. If you are working with a CC processor or CC referral partner, it is important you have a detailed discussion with the CC processor / provider as well as the owner on a few items.




Tax
, is the Service Fee to be calculated pre or post tax? Calculating pre tax, the tax IS NOT included in the Service Fee amount.




Taxes and Dual Pricing and Surcharging are subject to State laws. Be knowledgeable.




Tips. In restaurants it’s important to discuss with the Credit Card provider, Rep, Agent that Tips are a secondary transaction and will incur transaction fees. It is important to SET EXPECTATIONS the Service Fee may need to be ADJUSTED DOWNWARD in the POS system. If the Processor promises the Restaurant, they are going to be getting 100% of their money, it’s possible given the number of Tip Adjustments, this will have an impact on their deposits. Again, it’s important to have a detailed discussion. 


This is the Back Office Service Fees edit or set up screen. We’re going to look at this set up in detail.








Here we put a name in for the service fee. This name does not show up on any printout but will be visible to the staff on screen only.








Service Fee Name.


This is the name you give to the Service Fee. It will display on screen for the wait staff but will not print on the receipt unless you add it to the Payment Fee Line.








Count Towards Sales.


Determines whether the service fee will be included in gross/net sales totals default is YES.  We set it to 
NO
. For our purposes this is a fee that is calculated outside of taxes and sales calculations.








Taxcode


We set to Default Taxrate because some states tax the Service Fees. 
This is a per state item so be aware and check with the Merchant Services provider.








Discountable.
 Determines whether the service fee can be discounted.


Default setting is 
no








Show As a Receipt Item.
 Service Fee shows as a line item on customer receipts.


Default setting is 
on


When turned on
 this will show up as a line item on customer receipts, we don’t want this to show on the customer receipts.








Service Fee Amount
 added to the order. Can be either a percentage of the order or a set fee. We have set our Service Fee to 3.50%








Auto-Add Orders
. Applies the Service Fee is automatically to the different order types. The payment must also satisfy the Auto-Add Payments setting. The fee will automatically be added to the order types you choose here. 


Default setting, nothing is marked.








Add to Split Checks.
 When splitting checks, the Service Fee will be added to any additional tickets if already on the orders. If on, this will result in percentage fees only being calculated for the current ticket.


Default Setting is 
Yes.








Calculate Pre Discount. 
Determines whether a percentage service fee calculates based on the pre-discount subtotal. 


Default Setting is 
No








Show As Total Line
. Determines whether the service fee shows as a total line above the subtotal line.








Service Fee Type
. Whether the service fee charged is a percentage of the order or a set fee.


In this example, we set ours to 
Percentage
.








Total Line.
 Description for the Total Cash payment line. "Cash Total 3.5% Discount included" or "Total Cash" or "Cash Total."


You can either show or hide this from the receipt.




Default should be 
Shown
.




Payment Fees Line.
 Description of the Payment Fee line. We no longer want this showing unless explicitly instructed. To be compliant with Visa Master Card as of this writing May, 2023, you do not want this to show on the customers receipt print out. Again, unless you are explicitly instructed to do so.
 You can either show or hide this from the receipt.


Default should be 
Hide
 not marked.




Total With Fee.
 Description for the Total With Fee line. "Credit Total"


You can either show or hide this from the receipt.


Default should be 
Shown.


Rounding.
 Determines whether the service fee is rounded up, down, or both (.005 or more up, otherwise down) when calculating the fee from the percentage.




Default is 
Round Up and Down.








Calculate Pre Tax.
 Determines whether a percentage service fee calculates based on the pre-tax subtotal.




Default Setting is 
Yes.








Show As Customer Display Total
. Determines whether the service fee is included in the non-payment fee total line on the Customer Display instead of in the list of items on the Customer Display.




Default Setting is 
Off.




Prep for the End of Day Reports


Settings > POS > End of Day / Reports








Show Estimated Cash Discount Fees In Store.
 If turned on, the Batch, Operations, EOD, and Quick reports will show estimated cash discount fees and an estimated credit deposit expected that takes the fees estimate into account for in-store credit.


Default Setting is 
Off.


Estimated Cash Discount Fee Percent In Store.
 If Show Estimated Cash Discount Fees is turned on, this is the percentage of credit received that will make up the fees estimate for in-store credit. 


Default Setting is 
0.00.


Show Estimated Cash Discount Fees Online.
 If turned on, the Batch, Operations, EOD, and Quick reports will show estimated cash discount fees and an estimated credit deposit expected that takes the fees estimate into account for online credit.


Default Setting is 
Off.


Estimated Cash Discount Fee Percent Online.
 If Show Estimated Cash Discount Fees is turned on, this is the percentage of online credit received that will make up the fees estimate for online credit.


Default Setting is 
0.00.






Credits: 


Vincent Mills


































--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Dual Pricing

Overview
Dual pricing is our way of withholding visa's new regulations regarding them not wanting to see any line at the bottom of the check that would indicate an increase in price if the customer pays with a visa card. OrderCounter has released a new complaint solution allowed by Visa to pass the fees 
through to the customer which we refer to as "Dual Pricing." 
This is where the point of sale generates both a cash and credit price for each item in the system and will apply the correct itemized price based on the payment method selected. 
Setup
Prerequisites
System must be upgraded with the newest release that supports dual pricing
1) Navigate to the 
Back Office 
and Log in
You can access the back office by clicking the "
OC Back Office
" icon on your desktop or by searching 
"Localhost
" in the url address in your browser
2) Click "
Settings
" on the navigation bar
3) Scroll down and click "
Service Fees
" on the bottom left
4) Click "
Add Dual Pricing
"
5) Configure Dual Pricing Settings
6) Click "
Save Dual Pricing
" when done
Front End
Once Dual Pricing has been setup, it'll be displayed as shown below when creating an order.
Note:
 Unlike the setup before with 
Service Fees
, 
Dual Pricing 
will not display as an Item in the order
Formula
The formula used to calculate the dual pricing
Subtotal
 = Item Price * Dual Pricing Fee Percentage (In this example, 3.99% or 1.0399)
Tax 
= Subtotal * Default Tax Rate (In this example, 11.44 * 6.5%)
Credit
 = Subtotal + Tax (In this example, 11.44$ + 0.75$)
Cash
 = Total + Default Tax Rate (In this example, 11.00$ + 6.5%(0.715))
FAQ
Do I have to change?
Yes
  the change is required in order to stay compliant.  Our experience is that the new way of implementing is actually less confusing for customers and generates fewer questions.
Do I have to update my menu?
As of now you must have your credit prices posted but you can also post your cash prices.  OrderCounter has a menu generator that will print out a dual priced menu for you if you need this to provide to customers or to post.  The processor will also reimburse OrderCounter for some menu and signage reprinting if you are interested in updating menus and signage.  Please let us know what you need and we can work with you to get appro
val for the reprinting costs.
What will change on the POS?
Customer facing displays and guest checks will default to displaying Credit pricing and will also reflect a lower cash price at the bottom.  If the customer pays with cash then all items will be reduced to the cash prices for the final check?
What changes with the Signs I currently have up?
The existing signage needs to be taken down because it is no longer compliant.  New language suggestion “
Due to increasing costs we have implemented a 
dual pricing 
option for our customers.  Dual Pricing 
allows us to pass through our savings to customers who pay with cash.  If you have any questions, we are happy to explain and show our cash and non-cash prices for any items that you are interested in.    Pay by Cash and Save.  Thank you for your business”  We can also send out door stickers.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Using RDP For Tablets

Overview
  
Using RDP (Remote Desktop Protocol), you can turn an iPad or Android tablet into a fully functional terminal for OrderCounter without needing to install the software directly on the tablet. Here's how it works:
Install a remote desktop application on the tablet.
Connect to a machine running OrderCounter using that application.
You can have multiple RDP sessions on one server, allowing each session to work as an individual terminal.
Requirements:
  
Typically, RDP requires a Microsoft Server OS with terminal services. However, using RDP Wrapper, you can achieve this on non-Windows Server machines.
Each session needs:
Its own Windows user on the server
Its own terminal ID
To be licensed individually
The tablet and server must be on the same network.
Getting Started
  
Set Up the Server
Designate one machine as the server (likely the one hosting the OrderCounter database).
  
For a single tablet setup, a dedicated server might not be necessary.
Install RDP Wrapper
Obtain the RDP Wrapper installer. A technician can provide the link.
Place the RDP Wrapper Installer folder on the computer.
Extract the contents of 
RDPWrap-v1.6.2
 and 
autoupdate
.
In 
RDPWrap-v1.6.2
, right-click 
install
 and run as administrator.
Copy all files from 
RDPWrap-v1.6.2
 and 
autoupdate
 to 
C:\Program Files\RDP Wrapper
.
Run 
autoupdate
 as administrator and let it finish.
Open 
RDPConf
. If you see 
[not supported]
 under the version number, re-run the auto update file.
Configuration
  
Add and Configure RDP Users
Add RDP users in Windows and grant them admin access.
Open SQL Server Management Studio:
Go to Security > Right-click Logins > New Login > Windows Authentication.
 Click on search, enter the username.
 Under User Mapping, select the OrderCounter Database and assign db_datawriter and db_datareader roles.
Assign the user as sqladmin.
Set Up the RDP App on the Tablet
Download and install RDP Enterprise on your tablet.
Ensure the tablet and server are on the same network.
Open the RDP app and add a new connection:
 Click the + sign on the top right, choose "
Desktop
".
 Enter the hostname or IP address of the machine running RDP Wrapper.
 Choose to enter an account, input the Windows username and password for the account created earlier (e.g., ipad01).
Change the screen resolution to 1024x768
Save the session.
If prompted with a certificate warning, agree and continue.
Change to touch mode:
Click the icon with 3 horizontal bars and select “Touch”.
Configure OrderCounter on the Tablet
Place the OrderCounter point of sale shortcut on the desktop.
Open OrderCounter software and follow the connection setup steps as you would on any other till to create this as a new till.
Display Settings
  
Adjust the display settings as needed to ensure optimal functionality for touch screen use.
For any changes or suggestions to this article, you can make them 
here
.
Review
  
Ensure all steps are clear and sequential.
Double-check each instruction to make sure it's easy to understand and follow, even for those who might not be very tech-savvy.
If needed, simplify technical jargon and provide additional clarifications.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Setting up RDP Wrapper and Configuring RDP Sessions

Put RDP Wrapper Installer folder on the computer
Extract contents of 'RDPWrap-v1.6.2' and 'autoupdate'
In 'RDPWrap-v1.6.2,' right click on 'install' and run as administrator
Copy all the files in 'RDPWrap-v1.6.2' and 'autoupdate' and paste them in 'C:\Program Files\RDP Wrapper'
Once all the files are in, run 'autoupdate' as administrator and allow the update to finish
Once complete, double click on 'RDPConf.' It should open a screen that looks like this:
[rdpwrappersettings.png]
Note: if you see '[not supported]' under the version number, you must re-run the auto update file.
Remove or make into legacy documentation any reference to ThinStuff in [Getting Started], [Installing Thinstuff], and [Configuration]
['SQL' Configuration]
Remove all steps except for 4
[The RDP App]
Ensure the tablet and the server are on the same network before continuing.
Please refer the the proper section for Windows 10 and Windows 11 setups.
Windows 10:
Open Remote RDP Enterprise app on the tablet
Click the + sign
Enter the server (or terminal server's) IP Address
Enter the RDP session user name (rdp1, rdp2, etc.)
Enter the RDP session password
Change the resolution to 1024x768 (you will use the 'x' key on the tablet keypad for this)
Change the orientation to landscape
Click the back arrow
Click the Cog to open RDP Enterprise settings
Ensure no boxes are checked except for 'Keep screen on,' 'Disable Zoom,' and 'Scale to screen.'
Click on your RDP session to connect to the server
Windows 11:
Windows 10:
Open Remote RDP Enterprise app on the tablet
Click the + sign
Enter the server (or terminal server's) IP Address
Enter the RDP session user name (rdp1, rdp2, etc.)
Leave the password blank for the 1st tablet
Change the resolution to 1024x768 (you will use the 'x' key on the tablet keypad for this)
Change the orientation to landscape
Click the back arrow
Click the Cog to open RDP Enterprise settings
Ensure no boxes are checked except for 'Keep screen on,' 'Disable Zoom,' and 'Scale to screen.'
Click on your RDP session to connect to the server
When opening the RDP session, you will need to input the password. To open a keyboard, click the accessibility button on the right side of the screen, and turn on 'On-screen Keyboard.'
[rdplogin.png]
After a successful login, close Remote RDP Enterprise and reopen it
Hold your finger on the RDP session and scroll down to 'Edit.'
Enter the RDP password in the password field and reconnect.
All tablets should be able to log in to their respective RDP sessions with the password entered into the password field
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Upgrading To SQL Server 2014

Do this while the customer is closed and not using the system.  The whole process should take less than an hour but they'll want to give them more time in case anything goes wrong.  

1 - Make a backup of the ocpos and ocps (if used) database
2 - Uninstall SQL Server 2008
3 - Install SQL Server 2014 Express from this link: 
https://www.microsoft.com/en-us/download/details.aspx?id=42299
 
- Choose ExpressAndTools 64BIT\SQLEXPRWT_x64_ENU.exe
4 - Name the SQL Server instance the same as the previous one (usually OCSERVER) to make switching over easier
5  - Restore database(s) to the new SQL Server 2014 installation
6 - Add any Windows users as SQL Server logins as needed.
7 - Test all terminals
Microsoft® SQL Server® 2014 
Expresswww.microsoft.com
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Backing Up OrderCounter

Overview
There are several ways a backup can be performed. OrderCounter uses an SQL database to store its information
so these are all different ways of creating a .bak SQL Server backup file
Options
  
  
  
1.
      
Backing up using the back office
  
   
 
2.
   
   
Backing up using the front end
   
   3.
 
     
Backing up using SQL ServerManagement Studio
  
 
   4.
      
Backing up automatically when EOD(End Of Day) is ran
Backing Up Using The Back Office
1.
 
Open the back office, 
http://localhost/ocpos
2.
 
Select 
Databases
 from the menu along the top > 
Create Backup
 
3.
 
A backup will be created and saved to the downloads folder.
Backing Up Using The Front End
1.
 
Open OrderCounter Front end and go to “Database Settings”
Enter a password with the 
Correct Privileges
 
and select yes to agree to the warnings. 
These warnings are letting you know that you can cause a lot of 
damage
 in this area.
2.
 
On On the Connection Setup Screen Select 
Backup Database
3.
 
Choose a location to save the back.
 A file name will be created automatically.
4.
 
The backup will now be in the location you selected with the 
file name in the format of databasename_YYYYMMDD.bak
Backing Up Using SQL Server Management
1.
 
Open SQL Server Management Studio
 
2. 
Connect to the 
SQL Server Instance
 hosting the OrderCounter Database
 
3.
 Expand Databases
 > Right click the database you wish to backup and select 
Tasks > Backup
4.
 
Remove the existing file path
 (Unless this is the file location and name you want to use)
5.
 
Click Add to enter the path and filename for the new backup
6.
 Click the T
hree Dots(...)
 to choose a file location or simply type one in. You need to include the file name including the .bak file extension.
7.
 
Press OK
 To create the backup
8.
 
The backup will now be in the location you selected.  
9.
 
If you get an error at this point it is likely to be that you do not have permission to save that location.
Backing Up Automatically When End Of Day Is Ran
Backup location can be viewed in the back office under 
Settings
 -> 
Backup
.
It is recommended that you install a cloud backup service on each machine which syncs to a local folder. You then set that folder to be the backup location.If a machine goes down then you already have access to the backup from every other machine.You would then restore the database to one of the available machines and change the connection settings of the remaining machines to point to it.
| 
Run the EOD(End Of Day) a backup will occur automatically.
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
tinyurl.com/ordercounterbd
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Resetting The Sales Data

Demo Video
​
Overview
When you are ready to go live with a site you will want to reset the sales data. To do so please follow these steps
 
Resetting the sales data
⦁
 
On the Front End go to
 Database settings  
⦁
 
Enter a passcode 
with the security rights to access database settings. 
Back Office > Employees > Employee Privileges > Database settings 
⦁
 
Read and agree to the warning 
⦁
 
Click on
 Database Commands
  
⦁
 
Read and agree to the warnings
⦁
 
Select “
Clear all sales data
” from the dropdown box
That action fills out the entry box with an SQL command. When executed, this command will delete the sales data. You can enter any SQL command into this box and it will run against the OrderCounter database
⦁
 
Press “
Execute Command
” 
 
The sales will now be deleted
*For any changes or updates, please reference the document here:
 
https://www.dropbox.com/sh/3bc33g9rn11zb43/AACDDAipwfSjJwz4qgVLDxSPa/Documents?dl=0&preview=Make+VideoOC18-Resetting+the+sales+data_1115.docx&subfolder_nav_tracking=1
*
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: How To Install A Specific Version Of OrderCounter

Overview
You now have the ability to install any version of OrderCounter released after Jan 2019. This can be Beta or Release.
Installing A Specific Version
⦁
 
Make sure the front end is open
⦁
 
Press Ctrl + Alt + U at the same time
⦁
 
Enter an employee code that has the privilege of “settings”
⦁
 
Next is the update code. Enter the update code followed by a hyphen then the version number. For example to go to Beta Version 
4.5.0.1.b.21
 you would enter 
EagerEagle76-4.5.0.1.b.21
         And to go to release version 
4.8.0.32
 you would enter 
ManicMonkey14-4.8.0.32
⦁
 
Follow the prompts and install as usual. 
Troubleshooting
You are told you are already on the latest version while performing an update:
client.wyc contains information about the version currently installed. If the version you have installed is newer than the version you are trying to install, then you will need to follow these steps.
⦁
 
Rename C\OCPOS\client.wyc to client.old
⦁
 
Make a copy of C:\OCPOS\rollback.wyc and rename it to client.wyc
⦁
 
Try the update again
The update code is accepted but nothing happens
This can happen if C:\OCPOS\Rollback.wyc is missing. Follow these steps to solve the issue
⦁
 
Make a copy of C:\OCPOS\client.wyc and rename it to rollback.wyc
⦁
 
Try the update again
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercountersv
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Changing The Database Connection

Why Would You Need To change The Database Connection?
1) Testing
You may have several databases representing different customers or different types of data build son one machine. Changing the database connection means that you can change the database OrderCounter will be looking at. This enables you to easily switch between databases.
2) Restoring to a different database.
If you want to restore a backup to a different database you will need to change the database connection.
3) Making a different machine the server
If the machine that is hosting the database fails then you will need to restore the database to another machine on site. The tills then ened to have 
their database connection details changed to point to the new machine.
Changing The Database Connection
1) 
Open the OrderCounter front end and select “
Database Settings
” 
2) 
Enter a passcode of an employee with access to the Database Settings. To enable this for an employee go to Back office > Employees > Select Employee > Edit Privileges > set “
Database Settings
” to Yes
3) 
Select “
Change Connection
” 
4)
 Read and agree to the warnings
5) 
Choose the new server and/or database from the drop down lists
Server
” is a list of all machines
on the local network with 
SQL installed
“
Database
” will show a list of
databases available on the
chosen machine
“
Refresh
 
Servers
” will refresh and
Update the list of servers
“
Advanced Setup
” will take you
To the advanced setup screen where
You can enter these setting
Manually. You also get the option to
Enter a username and password
6)
 Press “
Continue”
 
7) 
You will then see the “Back Office Setup” screen
“
Password
” This is the MSSQL password that the back-office software will use to connect to the database. It can be any password.
“
Port
” This changes the port used by apache
80 is default
“
Timezone
” Used to set the timezone for
The site
“
External Access
”
changes c:\OCPOS\htdocs\.htaccess
to control if external access is allowed. Only
enable this on the machine running SQL
8)
 Press Continue
9) 
You will need to do this for every machine that needs to connect to the new database
Advanced Setup
“
Server
” The name of the server
You wish to connect to in the format
Computername\sql instance which by
Default is OCSERVER
“
Database
” is the name of the database
You want to connect to
“
Username
” You can specify a username
that has access to the database you want
to connect to. If left blank, Windows
authentication will be used
“
Password
” You can specify the password
For an account that has access to the
Database you want to connect to
“
Terminal
 
Number
” This is a unique identifier for each terminal and is used to store the terminal settings. The example shows “001” but “01” or “1” could also be used
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here:
 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercountercdc
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Restoring A Database

Overview
There are 2 main reasons to restore the database.
1)
 It is a brand-new install and there is no database. In this case you will want to restore a master database which you use to start each build.
2)
 Something has gone wrong and you need to restore a previous version of the database.
Restoring An OrderCounter Database
There are 2 ways to restore a database. Through SQL Server Management Studio and through database settings on the front end. If you use the database settings it will not replace the existing database, it will create a new one. Seen as you have connection settings on each device connecting to a specific database name you would need to change these settings on every device to connect to the new database.
If you use SQL Server Management Studio then you have the option to restore to the existing database. However, the database cannot be in use when this happens.
The best method of restoring the database is to delete the existing database and restore to a new database with the same name. 
Ordinarily the ordercounter database is called OCPOS, so we would delete the database and restore to a new database also called OCPOS.
1)
 Open Microsoft SQL Server Management Studio
2)
 Connect using valid credentials
3)
 
Expand Databases
, if this is not a completely new install then you will already have a database for OrderCounte
4)
 If you do not already have a database then we can create one during the restore process.
5)
 
Right Click 
the 
Database
 > 
Delete
6)
 Tick "
Close existing connections
" 
 > OK
7)
 Now we can restore the backup to a new database with the same name
8)
 Right click "
Databases
" > "
Restore Database"
9)
 Enter the name of the database in the “
To database
” field. This is the same as the one we just deleted
      
10) 
Choose "
From Device"
 This means we are going to point it to a backup file and not another database.
11) Click on the 3 dots > 
Add, Navigate to and select the backup file you wish to restore from
12) 
Tick the box in the “Restore” column to show that this is the file you wish to restore
13) 
Click
 OK
14) 
The database has now been restored. Because it has the same name as the original, no further adjustments are needed.
If you restored to a database with a different name then you will need to change the connection details.
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
tinyurl.com/ordercounterrd
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Upgrading OrderCounter

Overview
OrderCounter will remain on the version used to install it until a manual update is performed. You may want to update to take advantage of new features or resolve software related issues.
Upgrading OrderCounter
Upgrading OrderCounter is very simple and there are 2 ways to do so
Run c:\ocpos\update.exe. This will update you to the latest release
Updating to a specific version using a code. 
On the login screen, press CTRL + ALT + U. You should be prompted for a password. 
Enter a password with permissions to perform the update
You will be asked for an update code. Enter 
For Release enter - “ManicMonkey14” (without the quotation marks)
For Beta enter “EagerEagle76” (without the quotation marks)
You can tell which version you are on by checking the number on the startup screen in the top right. 
If you upgrade a site you will need to do this upgrade on every machine running Order Counter at that site.  I recommend that you start with the machine running the SQL database. 
It is not recommended to run the update whilst the site is operating. 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Firewall Exceptions

Overview
There are a specific set of services & programs that need to be configured to pass through the firewall in order for OrderCounter to operate.
Step 1: Open Windows Defender
      Press the 
Windows Key
 + 
R
 to bring up the 
Run
 Window
            Type in "
control firewall.cpl
" to open 
Windows Defender Firewall
    
         
                
Step 2: New Inbound Rule
      Click "
Advanced settings
"
      
            Right Click "
Inbound Rules
"
            
                  Select "
New Rule"
                      
Step 3: Creating New Rules
Programs
      Select "
Program
" and click "
Next >
"
            Enter 
Program Path
 or Select it from the File Directory using "
Browse
" 
                  Click "
Next >
"
                  
                  Select "
Allow the connection
" 
                        Click "
Next >
"
                        
                        Make sure "
Domain
, 
Private
, and 
Public
" are selected 
                              Click "
Next >
"
                              
                              Create a name for the rule 
                                    Click "
Finish
"
                                          
Ports
      Select "
Ports
"
            Click "
Next >
"
                  Select "
TCP
" or "
UDP
" based on the port and Select "
Specific local ports
"
                            Click "
Next >
"
                            
                  Select "
Allow the connection
"
                         Click "
Next >
"
                         
                        Make sure "
Domain
, 
Private
, and 
Public
" 
                              Click "
Next >
"
                              
                              Create a name for the rule
                                    Click "
Finish
"
                                          
Exceptions
      
SQL Server
         
   
SQL Server Executable
               
   
Program Path
: 
C:\Program Files\Microsoft SQL Server\MSSQL12.OCSERVER\MSSQL\Binn\sqlservr.exe
            
SQL Server Browser
                  
Program Path
: 
C:\Program Files (x86)\Microsoft SQL Server\90\Shared\sqlbrowser.exe
      
Back Office
            
Apache Web Server
                 
 
Program Path
: 
C:\OCPOS\server\apache\bin\httpd.exe
              
RabbitMQ
                      
Erlang
                             
 
Program Path
: 
C:\OCPOS\server\erlang\bin\erl.exe
                          
Erland TS 
                             
 
Program Path
: 
C:\OCPOS\server\erlang\erts-10.0.1\bin\erl.exe


                          
EPMD: 
                              
Program Path
: 
C:\OCPOS\server\erlang\erts-10.0.1\bin\epmd.exe
              Ports:
                  TCP 
5672
                  TCP 
15672
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Setting Up A Demo Terminal

Step 1: Install Splashtop Streamer
      Download Splashtop Streamer 
tinyurl.com/ocsplash
            Click the "
I trust the organization above and want to allow remote access to my computer.
" Checkbox
            Run 
Splashtop_Streamer.exe
                  Click "
Confirm
"
                        Change 
Computer Name
                                   
 *This will give you remote access to the computer without having to use an SOS code*
Step 2: Install OrderCounter
      Navigate to 
www.ordercounter.com/downloads
            Download "
ocpos_setup.exe
"
                  Run "
ocpos_setup.exe
"
                        Select 
Create Window User - Prompt for username and password on next screen
                            
   Username
: ocpos
                            
   Password
: ocpos
                                    Click "
Next >
" on the "
Select Destination Location
"
                                          Click "
Install
"
                                               When it's done installing click "
Restart Now
"
Step 3: Installing SQL Server 
      
Use Splashtop to remote back into the computer after it restarts
            Make sure "
SQL Server 2014
" is selected and click "
Next >
"
                  For SA Password enter "
pspwd7277
" and click "
Next >
"
                        After everything installs on the "Set Service Login Screen"
                        
Username:
 ./ocpos
                        
Password:
  ocpos
                             Enter it twice
                                   
Click "Yes, restart the computer now"
Step 3: Update OrderCounter 
      When prompted to update order counter, click "
Update now
"
            on the "
wyUpdate
" screen click "
Update
"
                  Click "Close all process" on any pop up windows
                         for "Please enter the username and password for this user." enter:
                              
Username: 
ocpos
                              P
assword
:
 ocpos
                                     click "
allow access
" on the "
erl
" window
                                        
click "
allow access
" on the "
empd
" window        
                                                click "
Cancel
" on the "
Serial License
" window
                                                      click "
Finish
"
Step 4: Restore Demo Database
      Navigate to 
www.ordercounter.com/downloads
            Download "
ocpos_ordercounter4.zip"
                  Open the file and extract it to the desktop
                        open "
SQL Server 2014 Management Studi
o"
                              click "
Connect
"
                                    Right click "
Databases
"
                                          click "
Restore Database
"
                                                Click "
Device
" --> click the 
3 dots
 --> Click 
Add
 --> after adding database click "
OK
"
                                                      Click "
OK
" 
                                                            Close "
Microsoft SQL Server Management Studio
"
Step 5: Change Database In OrderCounter
      Open 
OCPOS - Point of Sale Suite
            Get a Serial Number and click "
Activate
"
                  on the "
Connection Setup
" screen 
                        
Server:
 Desktopxxx\ocserver
                        
Database:
 ocpos_ordercounter4
                              
                        
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Rollback Updates

Overview
This process will allow you to rollback to an older version of OrderCounter.
1) 
Delete or rename "
client.wyc
"
      
C:\OCPOS\client.wyc
      
*If you're renaming, name it something along the lines of "client2.wyc*
      
2)
 Rename "
rollback.wyc
" to "
client.wyc
"
      
3) 
Restart OCPOS
      
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Inbox Reports

Overview
Inbox Reports is feature that delivers reports directly to a user's inbox. These reports typically contain important information from the various report Categories available such as the Sales Reports, Employee Reports, Labor Reports, and more. 
Setup
In order for a site to have inbox reports enabled, they'll need to have their API information. Below is a quick guide on finding the API information.
Log in to the Partner Portal (
https://partners.ordercounter.com/
)
Find the merchant under "
Merchants
".
​
Click the 
Merchant
 and scroll down. Below you will see the 
API
 information
Navigate to the Back Office > Support > API Setup
Enter the API information from the partner portal
Inbox Reports have now been enabled for that location
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: How to Set Up Credit Card Processing in OrderCounter

Setting up credit card processing in OrderCounter involves configuring various settings to ensure seamless transactions. Follow this step-by-step guide to set up credit card processing on your OrderCounter POS system.
Step 1: Access the Credit Card Processing Settings
  
Open the Login Screen:
Start by accessing the OrderCounter POS login screen.
Access Settings Using a Shortcut:
Press 
Ctrl + Alt + \
 simultaneously on your keyboard to open the credit card processing settings.
Step 2: Select the Processing Type
  
Choose the Processing Type:
In the settings, locate the 
Processing
 dropdown menu.
Select the appropriate processing type for your business, such as 
NETePay EMV-FD
, 
PAX
, etc.
Step 3: Configure Device-Specific Settings
  
NETePay IP/Hostname:
Enter the IP address or hostname of your NETePay server. For local installations, this is typically 
127.0.0.1
.
NETePay Port:
The default port is usually 
9000
. Ensure this port is open and accessible.
MID (Merchant ID) and TID (Terminal ID):
Enter the Merchant ID and Terminal ID provided by the payment processor.
COM Port:
Set the COM port that your card reader is connected to (e.g., 
COM 9
).
Secure Device:
Select your secure device model from the dropdown (e.g., 
EMV_VX805_MERCURY
).
NETePay Lane:
Assign a lane number to the terminal, typically starting with 
01
.
Backup NETePay Mode:
Choose 
Use Primary
 if you do not have a backup NETePay server. Otherwise, configure the backup settings similarly.
NETePay Store and Forward:
Enable or disable store and forward mode, which allows transactions to be stored and processed later if the network is down.
Step 4: Additional Settings
  
Manual Entry Mode:
Set to 
Device
 to allow manual entry of card details on the device.
SAF (Store and Forward) Max Transactions and Purchase Limit:
Configure the maximum number of transactions and the purchase limit for SAF.
Signature Capture and Tip Prompt:
Enable or disable signature capture and tip prompts as needed.
Suggested Tip Amounts:
Set up to four suggested tip amounts for convenience.
Step 5: Save Settings
  
Save Your Configuration:
After entering all necessary information, click 
Save Settings
 to apply the changes.
Step 6: Test the Configuration
  
Run Test Transactions:
Perform a few test transactions to ensure the setup is correct and everything works smoothly.
Device IDs for Different Card Readers
  
VP8300
Secure Device: 
EMV_8300_DATACAP
Manaul Entry:
 IDTVP8300_DATACAP_E2E
 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Installing Printer Drivers

After installing the POS Softwar
e (
http://www.ordercounter.com/downloads/
) 
the drivers are located in
 
C:\OCPOS\setup\Printer Drivers\
 
as in the picture below.
After each driver is installed it can be found under the Start Menu in the following locations:
Bixolon -> Bixolon OPOS Driver
Epson -> OPOS or EPSON OPOS ADK
POS-X and Touch Dynamic -> OLE POS 2.xx
SNBC -> BYOPOS
Star -> Star Micronics
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterprinterd
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: All About Printers

Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here: 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterprinters
Overview
Only Epson printers are recommended by OrderCounter. Specifically Epson TM-T20II , TMT20, 
TM-U220, TM-T88V, TM-T88VI, and TM-M30II. This may expand over time so you should check the current printer options before purchasing printers.
If you do not have one of these printers then you will need to install the appropriate OPOS drivers and add the printer Manually.
The printers use the OPOS drivers which means that they have a FN (Friendly Name) Also Known as an LDN (Logical Device Name). This name is how they are referenced on the other terminals and machines.
How Printing In OrderCounter Works
First you need to choose where you want to serve the printers from. If you are using serial or USB printers then this will have to be the machine physically connected to the printer. If you are using IP Printers it would normally be the machine running the back office. If this machine is off or disconnected from the network, then the printers set up on that machine will not work.
Next thing is to set up the printers in the back office. There are 10 stations which you can call kitchen, Desserts or Bar etc. When you set an item to print you will be choosing one of these 10 stations.
At this point you have a name for your printer (the station) and we have a friendly name for the printer (from the OPOS driver install) We need to join one to the other. This is done with terminal printers from the back office where you assign a Printer to each station.
Example
You have a printer with a friendly name of REC01 (Terminal 1 Receipt printer) and REC02 (Terminal 2 Receipt printer).
Terminal 1 is Downstairs. Terminal 2 is Upstairs.
You have named station 1 in Back Office > Settings > Printers “Bar”.
Menu Item of “Beer” is set to print to “Bar”.
You have set Till 1 station 1 (Bar) to print to REC01.
You have set Till 2 station 1 (Bar) to print to REC02.
The item is set to print to the same location but the locations are mapped to different printers on the till. This means that if you send the item from Till 1 it will print downstairs and if you send the item from Till 2 it will print from upstairs.
Lots of businesses will have all the tills stations set to the same printers across all tills. This way it is easier to figure out what should be printing where. But in more complicated restaurants you may need the flexibility of mapping different stations to different printers.
How To Add A Printer
First you need to install the Epson ADK. The print server can add the printer for you but it still needs the Epson ADK to do so. 
If using a serial printer, you will need to do this on the machine connected to the till. If using an IP printer then the server is recommended but it could be any machine.
1)
 
Once you install the Order counter software you will be able to see a folder, C:\OCPOS\setup\ Printer Drivers\Inside there will be EPSON OPOS ADK 270ER18.exe Run the exe and unzip to a location you will remember.
2) 
Go to that location and open OPOSADK/ADK270ER18/Disk1/Setup.exe
3)
 Choose default until the setup type screen.
4) 
When prompted choose the user option
5)
 When asked which port to use, choose the ports your printer will use. Serial, USB, Ethernet etc
6)
 Continue the installation with default options
7) 
Open OrderCounter Front End
8)
 Double Click the p icon in the system tray to open the printer settings. If the icon is not there then open c:\ocpos\winprtspl.exe
9) 
Click on "Manage Printers & Draws"
10)
 Select "
Opos Pos Printe
r" from the "select Device" drop down menu
11
) Enter a name for the Printer
12)
 Choose a model of printer from the "Printer" drop down box. you will only be able to select Epson printers from this list
13)
 
Choose a port from “
OPOS
 
Port
” or choose “
Create
 
New
”
14)
 
Choose the Port Type from the drop down list
15) 
Choose the Port Type from the drop down list
16)
 
Click on “
Add
 
device”
17) 
Highlight the new printer and Click on “
Test Device
”
A successful test print will look like this
Manually Adding A Printer
We will use Epson as an example but if you have a printer which is not in our list you may still be able to use it. You will have to go to the manufacturers website to get a hold of their OPOS driver software and go through the steps to install it.
1)
 We went through these steps under “How to add a printer” steps 1-5 but essentially you download and install the application from the manufacturer’s website
2)
 Once installed, open the application. 
Start Menu
 > 
Programs 
> 
Opos
 > 
SetupPOS V2.00
3)
 Right click on "
POS Printer
" > 
Add new Device
4)
 Choose the device from the list and enter a LDN (Friendly Name)
5)
 Cick 
Next
6)
 Either choose the port or create a new port and enter the IP Address details and click 
Finish
7)
 you can now manually enter the friendly name of the printer in the Order Counter Print Server by clicking on 
Manual Entry 
> adding the 
Friendly Name
 in “
Device Name
” > “
Add Device
"
Sharing A Printer
Once you have added all of the printers you will need to add them to the system. You do this through the 
print server
. 
c:\ocpos\winprtspl.exe
This opens automatically when OrderCounter is opened. If it is closed it will automatically open again.
If there is a problem printing this application will automatically restart in an attempt to resolve the issue.
To access this application double click on the icon in the system tray 
Select one of the dropdowns in the “controlled printer list” and choose a printer that you would like to share and press save. 
If you do not see the printer in the list but you can see it in “Manage Printers & Drawers” then click "
Refresh
" next to the 
Controlled Printer List text
.
The printers that are added in the “manage printers & drawers” screen will only show on the machine used to add them.
You will be able to print to them from any terminal in the system.
Adding And Naming The Printer Stations In The Back Office
Back Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Printers
There are 10 Stations called Station 1 to 10. These are the names of the stations. These are not physical printers. Different printers can be mapped to a station. These are what you will select when assigning an Item to a printer
There are tick boxes at the sides of each station. 
Max Items 
– The maximum number of items that can print to that station on 1 ticket. If the number of items on the ticket is more than the Max Items allowed they will print on a separate ticket
Seat
 – determines if the seat number information prints to a printer mapped to this station
Send
 
Expo
 - You can have a printer set a as an expediter printer. If you tick this box then anything that is sent to this printer will also be sent to the expediter printer
Print Course / Label for Order Method – 
When coursing is set up you can control which order method and station the coursing will work with. If these boxes are not ticked then the coursing information will not print for that station / order method
Adding A Logo
Open the Print server 
 icon in the system tray for the Till you wish to add a logo to  
1)
 Under Terminal Printer Receipt Image click on Browse
2) 
Find the bitmap file you want to use 
The image needs to be a monochrome Bitmap.
The larger the file size the slower the logo will print. 
Kitchen Types
There are 3 different kitchen types that can be selected which will affect how tickets are sent to order printers
1) G
o to 
Front
 
End
 > “
Terminal
 
Settings
”  ( You will need the security Privilege of “
Settings
” to be allowed into this section)
      Under "Kitchen Select" there are 3 options
      
Off
 – Orders will only be sent when the “Send Order” button is pressed. This mode enables you to decide exactly when the order will be sent to the kitchen. The whole order will be sent when the button is pressed. If you press the button again the order will not be re-sent. If you add more items then press “Send Order “ only the additional items will be sent
Auto
 – Orders will be sent whenever you navigate away from the order screen. This mode is intended for those who want the sending to be automatic
On
 – Will present you with a list of all items on the ticket that are set to send to a printer. You can click on each one and choose which ones you would like to send to the order printers. You also get some timings so you can see when the item was entered, sent and printed. 
Creating Headers And Footers
The basic ticket is very basic. Here is an example
Seq#1  - Ref# 67
1 Cola
1 Burger
1 Apple Pie
The Seq number is Specific to that printer. The number starts at 1 each day and every time an order is received, that number goes up by 1. This allows you to see if there are any missing tickets
The Ref is a reference for that ticket. If the ticket contains items that are sent to 2 order printers then the Ref will be the same on each ticket. This is what ties the order together.
There are many other options to add to an order slip and they are added through Receipt Templates
1) 
Go to the 
Back Office
 > 
Settings 
> 
Receipt Templates
 > Click on "
Create Receipt Template
"
2)
 Choose a 
Header Style
 (This is how the text will be aligned)
3)
 Choose a 
Number of Data Points
 - This is the amount of data you are going to show each line. For example, you could have data on one line and time on the next ( 1 data point ) or you could have both date and time on 1 line next to each other ( 2 data points )
4)
 Click on the + icon to add a line - You can do his for header or footer. Header wil show above the items and footer will show below
5)
 After you have added the items you will see this button 
Click on it to select what will be shown on that row
You will now be presented with the options for line 1. 
 
Bold Text  
      
 Underlined Text
     
 Print in Blue or Red (Impact Printers Only)
      
 
Size of the text. Options are 
 
S - Standard
 
2XH – Double height
 
2XW – Double width
 
2XHW – Double high and double wide
 
This is where we select the actual receipt item. Such as Date, Order Number, Address etc. There are many to choose from and more may be added.
6) Add a name for this Receipt under "Receipt Name"
7) Press "Save"
The receipt templates that have been set up will show with examples of how they will look
They can be edited, deleted or copied from this area. 
Now you have created a template you can assign it to printers. You have 3 types of order printer ( you may see them refered to as kitchen printers or order printers. They are the same thing)
Kitchen Expo Printer
 – If “
Send
 
Expo
” is selected against the station in 
Settings
 > 
Printers
Kitchen Seat Printer
 - If “
Seat
” is selected against the station in 
Settings
 > 
Printers
Kitchen Normal Printer
 – If neither “Send Expo” nor “Seat” are selected then it is deemed to be a normal printer
Here we have an example. A normal printer for Bar has been set to the “Basic” receipt template. Whereas the normal Takeout and ToGo order type printers have been set to the “Takeout” template
If someone sends a ticket from a takeout order type the receipt will have different information. Like the customers name and address. But if it is just a simple bar order it will use the “Basic” template without that information
Additional Printer Settings
Back
 
Office
 > 
Settings
 > 
Printers
Receipts
Customer Receipt Prompt
 – Prompts for a response to print a customer receipt
Refund Receipt Prompt
 –  Prompts for a response to print a Refund Receipt
Void Receipt
 
Prompt
 – Prompts for a response to print Void Receipt 
Print
 
Till
 
Report
 – Determines if the Till report will print
General Printer Settings
Show modifiers
 – Determines how Item modifiers are shown on Customer Receipts. The following options are available
Show Options w/Prices
 – Will show the Modifier with the price next to it only if the modifier has a price
Show Options with Non-zero Prices
 – Will show the Modifier and the price next to it only if the Modifier has a price and the price is not Zero
Show Options W/O Prices
 – Will show all Modifiers whether they are priced or not but will not have the price next to it on the receipt
Do Not Show Options
 – Will not show any Modifiers at all
Print Custom Modifiers
 – Custom Modifiers is an option from Order Functions that allows you to create a custom modifier just for that order. This setting decided if that modifier will print on the customer receipt or not. 
Print Quanitiy 1
 – Determines if the quantity of the Item will appear on the Order Printer ticket
Print All Quantities
 – Will print any quantity next to the Item
Print All Quantities Other Than 1
 – If there is one of something then the 1 will not print next to the item. If there are 2 or more then the quantity will print. 
Display Modifier Quantity 1
 – Determines if the quantity of the Modifier will appear on the Order Printer ticket
Print All Quantities
 – Will print any quantity next to the Modifier
Print All Quantities Other Than 1
 – If there is one of something then the 1 will not print next to the Modifier. If there are 2 or more then the quantity will print. 
Expo Printer
 – Determines if an expediter printer is being used or not
Expo Printer name
 – This is asking for the “Friendly Name” of the printer that will be used as the expediter printer
Gratuity on Credit Slip 
– Prints a line on the credit slip if Gratuity has been added to the ticket
Tip Line
 – Determines if the Tip Line will be shown on the credit slip
Signature Line
 – Determines if the Signature Line will be shown on the credit slip
Credit Barcode
 – Print the Transaction ID at the bottom of the Credit slip as a barcode or not
Print Red
 – Print the Modifiers in Red on Impact Printers
Retail
 
Red 
– Prints the Order Method and the Order Number in Red for Retail orders
Takeout Red
 – Print the Order Method and the Order Number in Red for Takeout orders
Delivery
 
Red
 Print the Order Method and the Order Number in Red for Delivery orders
Table
 
Red
 – Print the Order Method and the Order Number in Red for Table orders
Bar
 
Red
 – Print the Order Method and the Order Number in Red for Bar orders
For
 
Here
 
Red
 – Print the Order Method and the Order Number in Red for For Here orders
To
 
Go
 
Red
 – Print the Order Method and the Order Number in Red for To Go orders
Drive
 
Thru
 
Red
 – Print the Order Method and the Order Number in Red for Drive Thru orders
Print Clock Slip
 – Prints a slip when an employee clocks in or out
Item Name Size
 – Changes the size of the Item name on the order tickets 
Receipt Spacing
 - When enabled an extra line is inserted between every Item on the customer receipt
Receipt Line
 - Text entered here will appear at the bottom of customer receipts
Receipt Box
 (
Setup
) – Determines if the Receipt Box will show on customer receipts. The Receipt Box is a box of start  ******* at the bottom of the receipt. Click on the blue “Setup” to enter the setup for the receipt box. Anything added here will show inside the Receipt Box
Print
 
Address
 – If yes then the Address of the Restaurant will print at the top of the Receipt
#Credit Simple Guest Copies
 -  Determines the number of Simple Guest copies that print for credit payments
#Credit Simple Merchant Copies
 - Determines the number of Simple Merchant copies that print for credit payments
# Credit Detailed Guest Copies
 - 
Determines the number of Detailed Guest copies that print for credit payments
# Credit Detailed Merchant Copies
 - 
Determines the number of Detailed Merchant copies that print for credit payments
# Credit Final Receipts
 - 
Determines the number of Receipts that will print for credit payments
# Final Receipts
 - 
Determines the number of Receipts that will print for all payment types other than credit
Suggested
 
Tip
 -  If set to “
Yes
” then the suggested tip will print at the bottom of the receipt
Suggested
 
Tip Percentage 1 
- Determines the percentage to calculate the first suggested tip
Suggested Tip Percentage
 
2
 - Determines the percentage to calculate the second suggested tip
Suggested Tip Percentage
 
3
 - Determines the percentage to calculate the third suggested tip
Kitchen Receipt Header
 – Can be set to “
Top
” or “
Bottom
”
Kitchen Receipt Footer
 - Can be set to “
Top
” or “
Bottom
”
Description on Tickets 
- Can be set to “
Top
” or “
Bottom
”
Print Edited Items
- has to be used in conjunction with "
Kitchen Edit Tickets
". If set to yes then when you edit a ticket, a new ticket with the edited items will be sent to the kitchen. If set to "
No" 
and "
Kitchen Edit Tickets
" is set to "
Yes
" then a slip will be printed that will just say "
Edited Ticket
"
Print Removed Items
 – Used in conjunction with “
Kitchen Edit Tickets
” If this is set to on and Kitchen Edit Tickets is set to yes then when you remove an item that has already been sent a new slip will be sent saying ***REMOVED ITEMS*** then the items will be listed. If you set Print Removed Items to No then the items will not be listed
Kitchen Edit Tickets
 – See Print Removed Items and Print Edited Items
Other Station Items
 – If set to yes then items sent to other printers will appear under a heading of ***Other Stations***. This allows everyone to know what is on the whole order
Print Timing Delays
 – Determines if Servers can delay items printing to order printers
Kitchen Modifier Separation
 -  Determines how Modifiers are displayed on the order printer ticket. Choose either “
Separate
 
lines
” or “
Seperated
 
By
 
Comma
”
Grand Total Large Font
 – Changes the Grant Total on the customer receipt to be large
Pre Auth Slip
 – If set to “On” Then a slip prints confirming the pre auth when performing one
Pre Auth Slip Text
 – The text that prints at the bottom of the pre auth slip
Show Tab Name
 – If set to “On” then the name of the bar tab will print on the customer receipt
Print Receipts Without Tip Line
 – Determines if a Receipt will print with a signature line when no tip line is present due to settings
Print # on Tickets
 – If set to On then a number of tickets will be printed at the top. If the order contained items sent to 2 printers then each ticket would show 1 of 2 at the top
Print After Bump
 – Determines if the item will print immediately or after the item has been bumped from KDS
Print Account Balances
 – Determines if the account balance prints on the receipt of a transaction settled using an account
Prefix Items With Seat
 – If set to “Yes” then the items on the kitchen ticket will be prefixed by the seat number. If set to “No” then there will be a seat heading and all Items for that seat will be listed under it
Print Prices on Order Tickets
 – Determines if the price of the Menu Item will be printed on the tickets sent to the kitchen.
Hide Cash on Till/Bank Reports
 – Decides if cash totals print on the Till / Bank reports
Troubleshooting
Print logs
The print logs are kept in a logfile 
c:\ocpos\logs\ocpos_print.log
This will give you information on what problems the printer is having.
Cannot claim printer
. If the logs indicate that the system cannot claim the printer then run the following file 
C:\OCPOS\setup\RegDLLS\regdlls.bat 
This registers some dll files and takes ownership of the printer.
If you have star printers and use the star print opos driver application you would need to run this file after to be able to print
Make sure the printer is not being shared from more than one print server
.
The list of printers in the print server has to be unique. If the printer exists in more than 1 place then highlight the printer name > press delete > press save.
Make sure that the print server is not open
.
The printers will not be able to print if the print server is left open
Restart the PC sharing the printer
. 
Find the PC sharing the printer and restart it. When it restarts, open “Manage Printers & Drawers” > Highlight the printer and press “Test Device” If you can’t print from here then you won’t be able to print from the POS. 
If the printer doesn’t give any errors or print then it is likely that the item or receipt is not set to actual go to a printer. Make sure that the Terminal printers are set to go to the correct printer. Check that There is a receipt printer selected, also check that the items are set to go to the printer. 
What’s in the database?
Dbo.printer_receipts
This table is where the print job is stored. Everything that has printed will be in this table. 
Check the printer name field to make sure it is going to the correct printer. This will be the name of the printer how it shows in the print server list not in the station name. 
The receipt column shows the data that actually gets sent to the printer. If you copy this and paste it into notepad you will see the content of the printout
Status
I = Ignore
O= Pending
E = Error
C = Complete
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: WinPrtSpl

*Note: WinPrtSpl must be CLOSED after done using, leaving it open will prevent tickets from printing*
Printers that operate at a location across the network require a printer server, like WinPrtSpl. WinPrtSpl is a software that accomplishes this, and handles printers found locally attached via USB. When opening the software, you first arrive at a screen where it will list all the printers and cash drawers being controlled. 
If you set up the printers and cash drawers correctly, and the devices are on/connected, they will appear in the drop down boxes. It does not matter what order these devices are listed in, as long as they are listed is all that matters. For the Drawers, if they are Epson, (sometimes) they don’t need the checkbox marked next to them. SNBC printers (sometimes) do need the box marked. 
Opening the Manage Printers & Drawers selection at the top will open up a screen to give a more detailed view of the printers and drawers.
With the above view, you can see a wide variety of information.
 
At the bottom under the section Devices, you can see all the devices that the winprtspl has been setup to recognize. Selecting a device will allow you to use the Test Device button, which will send a check to the printer via receipt, or to the cash drawer via opening it. 
To the right of Devices, you will see Test Results, which returns the results of using the Test Button.
In the upper right hand corner you will see the OPOS Ports, which are ports & IP addresses being used to control different devices. In this instance, you can see IPs 192.168.10.(20/21/22/25) are all registered, but this does not mean all are being actively used. They can be registered, but empty ports. 
When adding devices to the WinPrtSpl, you want to first register the device in either Epson OPOS for Epson devices, or BYOPOS for SNBC devices. Then, you will want to Manual Entry to register the device, and all Manual Entry will ask for is the Local Device Name (LDN).
Troubleshooting
The first thing to do is to open file explorer, and navigate to the OCPOS folder, and scroll to the bottom of the folder to find WinPrtSpl. Leave the folder alone, and then open WinPrtSpl and Exit the program, or use Task Manager to kill it. Quickly, right click WinPrtSpl and Run As Administrator. After you do this, see if printing capabilities have returned. 
If this doesn’t work, open Manage Printers & Drawers and test each device. Refresh the results box after each test. This will provide more information for troubleshooting. 
Here is a PowerShell Script that can restart the process, although the OC Guardian Service should automatically detect and restart any services/processes that should be running or are malfunctioning. The PowerShell Script will argue with the Guardian so it isn’t viable for anything but curiosity.
#Fix Winprtspl
#Set-ExecutionPolicy RemoteSigned -enables scripts to be ran
#so do below steps
#Search for gpedit.msc in the Taskbar search box.
#Click on Edit group policy in the search result.
#Go to Windows PowerShell in Computer Configuration.
#Double-click on Turn on Script Execution.
#Select the Enabled option.
#Choose an Execution Policy from the drop-down list.
#Select the Disabled option to turn off script execution.
#Click on Apply and OK.
#path for winprtspl
$path = "C:\OCPOS\winprtspl.exe"
$list = get-process | where-object {$_.Path -eq $Path}
if ($list -ne $null) { Write-Host "Attempting to kill process";Stop-Process -Name "winprtspl" }
Start-Sleep -Seconds 3
if ($list -eq $null) { Write-Host "Attempting to Restart Process"; Start-Process -filepath $path}
Read-Host "Press ENTER when done"
​
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here:
 
https://tinyurl.com/ordercounterwps
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Setting Up A Receipt Printer On A Terminal

Overview
For setting up the following receipt printers:      
      TM-T20
      TM-T20II
      TM-U220
      TM-T88V
      TM-T88Vi
Step 1: Add Printer To WinPrtSpl
      Open up WinPrtSpl 
 from the System's Tray.
      
          Select "
Manage Printers & Drawers
"  
   
            
                  Make sure "
Opos Pos Printer
" is selected
                        Enter a 
device name
 (Example: Kitchen)
                              
If replacing a printer, the LDN should stay the same otherwise you will need to adjust all printer settings on each terminal.
                        Select the 
Printer Model
                        Select the 
Opos Port
 or 
Create a new port
 
                              Select "
Add Device
" 
                                    Select "
Test Device
" to make sure the printer is functional
                                    
                                   When done, Exit out "
Manage Devices
", Select "
Save
" 
                                   then "
Save and Restart
"
                                          
                                          
Note: Adding the printer to WinPrtSpl will share the printer from the device*
Step 2: Add Printer To OrderCounter
      Open up Front End OrderCounter
            Click "
Printer Settings
" *Enter Password*
            
                  Select the printer you added in the "
Receipt Printer
" Dropdown menu
                        Click "
Save Settings
"
                              
                              Restart 
OrderCounter
Troubleshooting
1.
 
Ensure Printer is 
Plugged In
 & 
Powered On
 and has 
Paper.
2.
 
Ensure the Terminal shows 
Restaurants Information
 at the 
top of the login screen
      If it does not, restart 
OrderCounter
. Once showing correctly go to the login screen
      Choose "
printer settings
" and ensure the printer is setup and selected correctly there.
3. 
Check to see if there are any 
error lights
 displayed on the printer. If there are error lights skip to 
9
4. 
Ensure 
WinPrtSpl
 is 
running 
in the system tray. If it is not, open C:\OCPOS\winprtspl.exe - test again
5.
 
Double Click on 
WinPrtSpl
 icon and check to see if printer is 
being shared
 from this device
If we are having issues with a shared printer we will have to find what Terminal/Server it is being shared from.
6.
 
Once on the Terminal the printer was setup on, in 
WinPrtSpl
 go to "
Manage Printers & Drawers
"
            
Click on the printer and choose "
Test Device
" then "
Refresh
" you will then see the 
            
test results and if it was successful or 
 
if there were any errors. 
                  
Successful: Close 
all
 
WinPrtSpl
 windows and test in 
OrderCounter
 again. 
                  
Fail: Close the "
Manage Printers & Drawers
" window then choose "
exit
" on the 
                  
"
printer settings
" window
7.
 If the POS is using 
EPSON 
printers open up the 
Epson ADK
 and ensure the printers are setup there. Find the correct printer 
and right click "
Check Health Interactive" 
If a box comes up asking where you would like to print, the check passed and you can choose to cancel and close Epson ADK.
8. 
Go to "
C:\OCPOS\winprtspl.exe
" Right click and choose to run as administrator. 
Double click on 
WinPrtSpl
 again and try the health check again. If it passes this time use the red x to close both windows and test again in order counter.
9.
 
If there are 
error lights
, start with a restart of the printer. If the lights continue to show, open 
Epson ADK
 and attempt to run "
Check Health Interactive
". If a box comes up choose to print a receipt 
often times it will show the error in the box just below those test options. You might have to send a test print twice for this to show up.
10.
 
If it shows a mechanical error, turn the printer off and back on and try again. If the same error shows
 
follow the next steps
 
 
- Turn off the printer then hold the feed button as you switch it back on. 
           A self check should print. 
If a check does print, turn off the printer and 
      
      
back on regularly. 
Test in Epson ADK Again
 
- Ensure there is receipt paper in the printer. If there is try to put a different roll in the 
           printer and test again.
 
- Ensure lid is fully shut after putting in new roll
 
- In most cases if the "Mechanical"  issue continues after this it will be a hardware issue 
           with the printer
 
- Ensure you get the serial number from the printer
11.
 
Sometimes the Backup server is set to a different server than on the Terminal. This may sometimes cause some printer issues. 
      To fix this open "
Regedit" (
Windows Key + R
 --> Type in "Regedit")
            Remove the value for "
server_backup
" 
      
      
      
(Right Click --> Modify --> Delete text in "Value Data)
                  
      
Restart OrderCounter
Changes or suggestions to this article can be made here:
 
https://tinyurl.com/orodercountertps
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Updating Printer Drivers

This article will be expanded on frequently
EPSON
Latest EPSON Drivers
TM-88VI
: 
https://epson.com/Support/Point-of-Sale/Thermal-Printers/Epson-TM-T88VII-Series/s/SPT_C31CJ57052
Prerequistes
Uninstall the following programs before installing the new drivers
BYOPOS
EPSON OPOS ADK
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: How to Enable DataCap Gift Stripe Pass Through in OrderCounter

Enabling the DataCap Gift Stripe Pass Through feature in the OrderCounter system is essential for businesses that want to efficiently process gift card transactions through their point of sale system. This article provides step-by-step instructions on how to enable this feature.
On the login screen press "
Ctrl
" + "
ALT
" + "
\
"
Navigate to "DataCap Gift Stripe"
Checkmark DataCap Gift Stripe Pass Through
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: EPSON OPOS ADK Troubleshooting

Errors
Claim(5000) = 106
Usually means that the printer is claimed by another program. 
Solutions: 
Make sure WinPrtSpl isn't open
Restart the printer
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Addressing Printer Issues and Database Size Limitations in OrderCounter

Issue Overview
In certain scenarios, users of the OrderCounter Point of Sale (POS) system may encounter issues where printers fail to print items and the 
Winprtspl 
process terminates unexpectedly. This article provides a comprehensive guide on diagnosing and resolving these issues, which are often linked to the database reaching its size limits.
Identifying the Problem
The root cause of printers not printing and 
Winprtspl 
terminating randomly is frequently due to the database reaching its storage capacity. When the database size limit is hit, it can cause disruptions in various backend processes, including those responsible for printing services.
Diagnosing Database Size Issues
To determine if the database size is the issue, we recommend running the following SQL command. This command helps identify which tables are occupying the most space, thereby allowing targeted data management strategies:
SELECT
    t.NAME AS TableName,
    s.Name AS SchemaName,
    p.rows AS RowCounts,
    SUM(a.total_pages) * 8 AS TotalSpaceKB,
    CAST(ROUND(((SUM(a.total_pages) * 8) / 1024.00), 2) AS NUMERIC(36, 2)) AS TotalSpaceMB,
    SUM(a.used_pages) * 8 AS UsedSpaceKB,
    CAST(ROUND(((SUM(a.used_pages) * 8) / 1024.00), 2) AS NUMERIC(36, 2)) AS UsedSpaceMB,
    (SUM(a.total_pages) - SUM(a.used_pages)) * 8 AS UnusedSpaceKB,
    CAST(ROUND(((SUM(a.total_pages) - SUM(a.used_pages)) * 8) / 1024.00, 2) AS NUMERIC(36, 2)) AS UnusedSpaceMB
FROM
    sys.tables t
INNER JOIN      
    sys.indexes i ON t.OBJECT_ID = i.object_id
INNER JOIN
    sys.partitions p ON i.object_id = p.OBJECT_ID AND i.index_id = p.index_id
INNER JOIN
    sys.allocation_units a ON p.partition_id = a.container_id
LEFT OUTER JOIN
    sys.schemas s ON t.schema_id = s.schema_id
WHERE
    t.NAME NOT LIKE 'dt%'
    AND t.is_ms_shipped = 0
    AND i.OBJECT_ID > 255
GROUP BY
    t.Name, s.Name, p.Rows
ORDER BY
    TotalSpaceMB DESC, t.Name
Solution and Data Management
Once you've identified the tables that are consuming excessive space, consider the following steps:
Archive Old Data
: If the data is no longer needed for daily operations but needs to be retained for historical analysis or compliance, archive it to an external storage system.
Clean Up Redundant Data
: Remove redundant or obsolete data that does not need to be stored. For instance, clear old transaction logs, outdated reports, or temporary data.
Database Maintenance
: Implement regular database maintenance practices such as re-indexing and defragmentation to optimize space usage.
Increase Database Capacity
: If frequent data clean-up is not a viable solution, consider increasing the database size limit. Consult your database administrator for guidance on scaling up the database capacity safely.
Conclusion
By effectively managing the database size, you can ensure smoother operations of the 
OrderCounter POS system
, including reliable printing services. Regular monitoring and maintenance of the database are key to preventing these issues from reoccurring.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Troubleshooting Card Reader Error - Stuck on "Please Remove Card"

Issue Description:

Users may encounter a persistent message on the card reader stating "Please Remove Card", even when no card is present in the reader. This error typically indicates that the card reader erroneously detects a card still inserted, possibly due to dirt, debris, or a sensor malfunction.

Troubleshooting Steps:
Visual Inspection:
Check the card slot for any visible signs of dirt, debris, or obstructions.
Ensure there is no card left inside the card reader.
Cleaning the Card Reader Slot:
Turn off the device before attempting any cleaning to avoid damage or further issues.
Use a soft, dry cloth to gently wipe the card reader's slot. Avoid using wet cloths unless specified by the manufacturer's cleaning guidelines.
For more thorough cleaning, use a card reader cleaning card. Insert the cleaning card into the card reader slot and remove it. Repeat this process a few times.
Alternatively, wrap a plastic card (like a credit card) with a lint-free cloth slightly moistened with isopropyl alcohol and insert it gently into the card slot. Move the card in and out gently to remove any dirt or residue.
Check and Reset the Reader:
After cleaning, power on the device and check if the error persists.
If the message continues, perform a soft reset of the reader as per the device's operational manual.
Software and Firmware Check:
Ensure that the card reader’s software and firmware are up to date. Update if necessary, following the manufacturer's instructions.
Testing the Card Reader:
Test the card reader with multiple cards to determine if the issue is with a particular card or the reader itself.
If possible, test the reader with known good cards to confirm functionality.
Preventive Measures:
Regularly clean the card reader slot to prevent buildup of dirt and debris.
Avoid using cards with heavy scratches or damages as they can leave residues or damage the internal components of the reader.
Follow the manufacturer's guidelines for maintenance and use of the card reader to prolong its lifespan.
Conclusion:

Routine maintenance and proper handling are crucial in preventing and resolving the "Stuck on Please Remove Card" error in card readers. If troubleshooting does not resolve the issue, professional diagnostic and repair services may be necessary.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Resolving "Server Terminal Not Running or Set Properly" Warning

Users may encounter the following warning message
The warning message indicates a potential issue with the server terminal, and the most common fix involves checking and correcting the server Timezone setting.
In the majority of cases encountering this warning message indicates an issue with the server timezone.
Always consider this as the primary cause when troubleshooting this specific error.
The server Timezone is crucial for proper functioning.
This setting is typically configured during the initial database setup.
During the database setup process, ensure that the correct timezoneis selected.
The timezone should align with the geographical location of the merchant or business.
Addressing the Issue
If users encounter the warning message, the first step is to verify and correct the server timezone.
It is important to consider the merchant's geographical location to set the appropriate timezone.
Verification Before Changing
Prior to making any changes, it is crucial to verify the correct timezone for the merchant's location.
Changing the timezone without proper verification may lead to inaccuracies in time-sensitive processes.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: How to Resolve Batch Closure Issues with Pending Offline Transactions

Introduction

At times, when attempting to close a batch in the OrderCounter system, you may encounter an alert stating that the batch close has not been processed due to pending "Store And Forward" transactions. This article will guide you through the process of resolving this issue to ensure smooth operations.
Problem

When closing a batch, the system may present the following error message:
"
The batch close has not been processed. Reason: There still are requests to be forwarded. All 'Store And Forward' requests should be forwarded before closing a batch.
"
Cause

This error occurs when there are transactions that were processed offline in "Store And Forward" mode that haven't been sent to the payment processor.
Solution
Check for Offline Transactions
:
Access the 
Offline Transactions
 feature in the OrderCounter system.
Verify if there are any transactions listed that have not been forwarded.
Forwarding Transactions
:
If there are offline transactions listed, use the function to forward them to the payment processor.
Ensure you have a stable internet connection to successfully send all pending transactions.
Processing a Dummy Transaction
:
If no offline transactions are pending, process a small transaction to trigger the system's batch closure process.
It's recommended to use a merchant's card and process a minimal amount, such as a penny, to avoid any significant discrepancies.
Use Your Own Card (Optional
):
If a merchant's card is unavailable, you may use your personal card for the dummy transaction.
Immediately void the transaction afterward to ensure it does not affect your financial records.
Closing the Batch
:
Once all "Store And Forward" transactions have been forwarded, attempt to close the batch again.
The system should now close the batch without presenting the error.
Best Practices
Regularly check for offline transactions to avoid batch closure issues.
Ensure a stable network connection to process all transactions in real-time, reducing the reliance on "Store And Forward" mode.
Conclusion

By following these steps, you can resolve batch closure issues related to pending "Store And Forward" transactions in the OrderCounter system. This will help maintain accurate financial records and ensure that all transactions are processed correctly.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Customer Signature Not Working Customer Display

Resolution: To resolve this issue, follow the steps below:
1. Restart the terminal: Begin by restarting the terminal to see if that resolves the issue.
2. Calibrate the display: If restarting the terminal does not work, calibrate the display to ensure proper touch functionality.
3. Reinstall touch driver: If the issue persists after calibrating the display, you may need to reinstall the touch driver. Download the touch driver from the manufacturer's website and follow the installation instructions. 
Hanesis: 
https://www.hanasis.com/en/support/download_view.aspx?category=Drivers&DID=Board449
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Resolving "Signature display is not enabled. Exiting." Error

Issue:
When launching the OrderCounter terminal, a message saying “Signature display is not enabled. Exiting.” appears, primarily due to terminal_proc not being set to the correct terminal number in the registry.
Solution:
1. 
Open Registry Editor:
Press Win + R, type regedit, and press Enter.
2. 
Navigate to Terminal Settings:
Go to HKEY_LOCAL_MACHINE\SOFTWARE\OrderCounter\ and find your terminal.
3. 
Check terminal_proc Value
:
Ensure that the terminal_proc value matches the terminal number you intend to use.
4. 
Set Correct Terminal Number:
Right-click on terminal_proc, select Modify.
Set the terminal number correctly.
E.g., If using terminal 0001, ensure the value is 1.
5.
 Enable Customer Display:
Go to Back Office > Settings > Rear Facing Customer Display.
Edit the settings for your terminal.
Set Customer Display to On.
Ensure Separate Machine is set correctly based on your setup:
No if on the same machine.
Yes if on a separate machine.
6. 
Save and Restart:
Save changes and restart the terminal to apply the new settings.
By ensuring terminal_proc matches your terminal setup and configuring the customer display properly in the back office, the issue should be resolved. 
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Troubleshooting Inbox Reports Not Sending Due to Cache Issues

Issue:

Some users have reported that their inbox reports from the OrderCounter system are not being sent as expected. Investigations indicate that this issue may be related to cache needing to be cleared to acquire the new version of the software.
Symptoms:
Reports are not sent to the inbox.
System is not updating to the new version automatically.
Root Cause:

The cache on the user's device or server may be holding onto an older version of the OrderCounter software, which can prevent new reports from being generated and sent correctly.
Old Version:
New Version:
Resolution:

To resolve the issue where inbox reports are not being sent, follow these steps to clear the cache and ensure that the new version of the software is in use:
Clear Browser Cache:
In your browser, go to the settings or options menu.
Find the privacy or history section and select "clear browsing data" or "clear cache".
Make sure to select the option to clear cached images and files.
After clearing the cache, restart your browser.
Clear Server-Side Cache (if applicable):
Access the server where the OrderCounter system is hosted.
Use the specific commands or tools provided by the server's operating system to clear the application cache.
Update Software:
After clearing the cache, check for any updates to the OrderCounter system.
If an update is available, follow the instructions provided by OrderCounter to install the latest version.
Restart the OrderCounter System:
Once updates are installed, restart the OrderCounter system to ensure all new changes are applied.
Test Report Sending:
Attempt to send a test report to your inbox to confirm that the issue is resolved.
Preventive Measures:
Regularly clear the browser and server cache to prevent similar issues.
Set up automatic updates for the OrderCounter system if available.
Schedule regular maintenance checks to ensure that the system is operating on the latest version.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Useful SQL Commands

SQL Commands
    
  
Code:
 S
elect * From 
orders_credit 
      
  
    Explanation:  
Shows all orders made using a credit processor (Credit & Debit cards)
      
Notes:
 Use a 
Where
 clause to search for specific rows
            
Example:
  
S
elect * From orders_credit  
Where
 order_id = 249901
               
     
 Code:
 S
elect * From 
orders
        
  
    Explanation: 
Displays all orders
      
Notes:
 Use a 
Where
 clause to search for specific rows
            
Example:
  S
elect * From orders 
Where
 row_id = 1324
               
      
Code:
 S
elect * From 
orders_pending
        
      
Explanation: 
Displays all pending orders
      
Notes:
 Use a 
Where
 clause to search for specific rows
            
Example:
  S
elect * From orders_pending 
Where
 id = 251101
               
 
     Code:
 
S
elect * From 
pending_order
        
      
Explanation: 
All items that have been rang in the status field will show whether they were completed or not.
           
 
Status
 = '
C
' = Closed out
            
Status
 = '
A
' = Closed out to an account
            
Status
 = '
X
' = Removed
            
Status
 = '
O
' = Hasn't been closed out yet
s
      
Notes:
 Use a 
Where
 clause to search for specific rows
            
Example:
  S
elect * From pending_order 
Where
 id = 247501
               
      
 Code:
 
S
elect * From 
pending_options
       
      
Explanation: 
Modifiers that have been added to items in pending_order.  
unique_id
 ties them together
      
Notes:
 Use a 
Where
 clause to search for specific rows
            
Example:
  S
elect * From pending_options 
Where
 id = 127
               
  
      
Code:
 
S
elect * From 
action_log
      
     
Explanation: 
Displays a log of all actions and interactions that have been made
      
      
Code:
 
S
elect * From 
employees_pos_actions_log
      
      
Explanation: 
      
      
Code:
 
S
elect * From 
tills_employees 
      
      
Explanation: 
Transactions that have been added to an employee bank


      
Notes:
 Use a 
Where
 clause to search for specific rows
            
Example:
  S
elect * From tills_employees 
Where
 employee_id = 127
 
               
      
Code:
 
S
elect * From 
printer_receipts
      
      
      
Explanation: 
receipts that have been created to be sent to printers
           
Status
 = '
C
' = Printed 
            
Status
 = '
O
' = Not printed yet

           
Status
 = '
E
' = Error printing

           
Status
 = '
I
' = Error printing and then ignored by employee 
      
Code:
 
S
elect * From 
orders_delivery
      
     Explanation: 
Orders that have been signed out for delivery
      
Code:
 
S
elect * From 
orders_receipts
      
      
Explanation: 
Stored receipts for completed orders so they can be reprinted
Update Tips 
 
   
Code:
 
Update
 orders_credit 
Set
 tip 
=
 
" " where 
credit_id 
=
 
" "
      
Explanation:  
Manually update tips. Replace the " " with the 
tip
 amount, 
     and " " with the 
credit_id
. 
     Your tip will be updated before batching
Change Printer Ink To Black Only
      
Code:
 
U
pdate 
settings_pos
 Set 
kitchen_red
 ='
N
'
     
Explanation:  
In the event that a restaurant has to use a thermal printer 
      
in the kitchen, and the sub items under items are showing up ‘faintly’ 
      
or ‘faded’ use this command to make the printer print in only black. 
      
Having it print only in black will give fuller lines, making it darker.
Onboarding Information
      
Code:
 
Select
 
*
 
From
 settings 
Where 
PropertyGroup 
=
 'Communication' 
     
Explanation:  
Used to troubleshoot license failures.
Diagnostic Information
      
Code:
 
Select Top 200 * From 
NotificationLog
 Order By 
time
 Desc
 
     
Explanation:  
Grabs the latest 200 messages in the Notification Log.
Editing Gift Card Length
      
Code:
 
update 
settings_po
s set 
giftcardnum_digits
 = '10
'
     
Explanation:  
Fixes the gift card 10 digit's error
Change Table Section Name
      
Step 1: 
Find the 
section_id
 from the 
tables_sections
 database table
                  
Select * From 
tables_sections
     
Step 2: 
 put the 
section_id
 at the end of this query
                  
Update 
tables_sections
 Set 
section_name
 = '
the name you want
' where 
section_id
 =
Auto Logout Employees
      
Code:
 U
pdate
 settings_pos
 Set 
eod_clock
 = ‘
Y
’
Check For PreAuth On An Order
      Select * From 
orders_credit_auth
 Where
 order_id
 = 
<the_order_id>
Clear Printer Queue
      Delete From 
printer_receipts 
Delete Menu Items
      Select * From 
menu items
 And 
Active
 = '
N
' Where 
item_name
 = "x"




Print Detailed Clock Out Slip
      U
pdate 
settings_pos
 Set 
clock_slip_detailed 
= 'Y'
Remove Unapplied Transaction 
    
  update 
orders_credit
 set batched = 'Y' where 
applied
 = 'N'
      
Remove Inactive Employees
      
delete from 
employees
 where 
active
 = 'N'
Disable "Order has been sent" Pop up
      update 
settings_pos
 set 
kitchen_popup 
= 'N'
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Using the Kitchen Tickets Function to Retrieve Order Information

Overview


The Kitchen Tickets function is a useful tool within the POS (Point of Sale) system that allows users to view and retrieve information about tickets generated on a specific day. This knowledge base article provides step-by-step instructions on how to utilize this function effectively.
Step 1: Checking The Status Of Items


To begin, you can check the status of items associated with a particular order by executing the following command:
SQL
SELECT
 id, item_name, kitchen_id, datetime_printed 
FROM
 pending_order 
WHERE
 id 
=
 [
Order
 ID]


Replace [Order ID] with the actual Order ID found on the receipt.
Step 2: Retrieving The Actual Receipt


Once you have identified the relevant kitchen_id from the previous step, you can retrieve the actual receipt by running the following command:
SQL
SELECT
 receipt, printer_name, status, datetime_printed 
FROM
 
printer_receipts 
WHERE
 kitchen_id 
=
 [kitchen_id]

Here, [kitchen_id] should be replaced with the Ref # obtained from the previous step.
Note: It is important to note that the printer_receipts table is cleared at the end of each day. Therefore, it is advisable to check this table or create a backup before performing the end-of-day procedures.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: SQL Query to Remove Inactive Employees from a Database

Overview
This knowledge base article provides an SQL query that can be used to remove inactive employees from a database. The query efficiently deletes employee records from the "employees" table where the "active" column value is set to 'N'. Additionally, it removes any corresponding records from the "employees_passwords" table for employees who no longer exist in the "employees" table.
If you need to remove inactive employees from a database, you can utilize the following SQL query to achieve that goal. This query deletes employee records from the "employees" table based on the "active" column value, and it also takes care of removing associated records from the "employees_passwords" table.
DELETE
 
FROM
 employees 
WHERE
 active 
=
 
'N'
; 
DELETE
 
FROM
 
employees_passwords 
WHERE
 employee_id
 
NOT
 
IN
 (
SELECT
 employee_id 
FROM
 employees);
Explanation:
The first SQL statement deletes the inactive employees from the "employees" table. It uses the 
DELETE FROM
 syntax followed by the table name and a 
WHERE
 clause to specify the condition for deletion. In this case, the condition is 
active = 'N'
, meaning only employees with an 'N' (representing inactive status) in the "active" column will be deleted.
The second SQL statement handles the deletion of any corresponding records from the "employees_passwords" table. It uses the 
DELETE FROM
 syntax with the table name and a 
WHERE
 clause to specify the condition for deletion. The condition is 
employee_id NOT IN (SELECT employee_id FROM employees)
, which ensures that only records in "employees_passwords" table that do not have a matching "employee_id" in the "employees" table will be deleted.
Please note that executing these SQL statements will permanently remove the specified employee records from the database. It is crucial to ensure the accuracy of the condition and perform appropriate backups before running any deletions to prevent data loss.
Conclusion:
By utilizing the provided SQL query, you can effectively remove inactive employees from your database. The query deletes the employee records based on the "active" column value and removes any associated records from the "employees_passwords" table to maintain data integrity. Remember to exercise caution and take necessary precautions when performing any database modifications.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Reports Not Showing Up

In the Back Office, under the Data Mining tabs, holds all the report tables that a user can see all the details of their business. Occasionally, these tables do not show up at all. What we do to fix this is empty all the tables, and force the back office to refill the tables. Open up SQL, select the database, then start a new query with:
Truncate table reportCategories
Truncate table report_2category
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Delete Sales Data By Date

Overview
By running the query below, you can delete sales data from within a specified time range. Use the link below to get the correct TS values.
https://www.epochconverter.com/
DECLARE @begDate varchar(14);
DECLARE @
endDate 
varchar(14);
DECLARE @begDT varchar(19);
DECLARE @endDT varchar(19);
DECLARE @begTS varchar(10);
DECLARE @endTS varchar(10);
-- Initialize the variable.
SET @begDate = '20230801050000';
SET @endDate = '20231006150000';
SET @begDT = '2023-08-01 05:00:00';
SET @endDT = '2023-10-06 15:00:00';
SET @begTS = '1690866000';
SET @endTS = '1696604400';
--EOD Data by EOD ID
DELETE FROM end_of_day_labor WHERE eod_id IN (SELECT id FROM end_of_day WHERE date BETWEEN @begDate and @endDate)
--Raw Data by Order ID
DELETE FROM orders_cancelled WHERE order_id IN (SELECT order_id FROM orders WHERE order_datetime BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT)
DELETE FROM orders_credit_auth WHERE order_id IN (SELECT order_id FROM orders WHERE order_datetime BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT)
DELETE FROM orders_tabs WHERE order_id IN (SELECT order_id FROM orders WHERE order_datetime BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT)
DELETE FROM orders_tickets WHERE order_id IN (SELECT order_id FROM orders WHERE order_datetime BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT)
--Raw Data by Invoice ID
DELETE FROM kiosk_orders WHERE invoice_id IN (SELECT invoice_id FROM orders WHERE order_datetime BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT)
DELETE FROM orders_cat_taxes WHERE invoice_id IN (SELECT invoice_id FROM orders WHERE order_datetime BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT)
DELETE FROM orders_delivery WHERE invoice_id IN (SELECT invoice_id FROM orders WHERE order_datetime BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT)
DELETE FROM orders_order2payment WHERE invoice_id IN (SELECT invoice_id FROM orders WHERE order_datetime BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT)
DELETE FROM orders_receipts WHERE invoice_id IN (SELECT invoice_id FROM orders WHERE order_datetime BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT)
--Raw Data by Unique ID
DELETE FROM online_order WHERE unique_id IN (SELECT unique_id FROM pending_order WHERE datetime_inserted BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT)
DELETE FROM orders_unique WHERE unique_id IN (SELECT unique_id FROM pending_order WHERE datetime_inserted BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT)
--Raw Data by Credit ID
DELETE FROM orders_credit_tablet WHERE credit_id IN (SELECT credit_id FROM orders_credit WHERE date BETWEEN @begDate and @endDate)
--Raw Data by Sales Journal ID
DELETE FROM sales_journals_entries WHERE journal_id IN (SELECT journal_id FROM sales_journals WHERE created_on BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT)
--Raw Sales Data
DELETE FROM continuous_sales WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT
DELETE FROM deposit WHERE date BETWEEN @begDate and @endDate
DELETE FROM employees_tips WHERE date BETWEEN @begDate and @endDate
DELETE FROM employees_tips_paycheck WHERE date BETWEEN @begDate and @endDate
DELETE FROM deposit WHERE date BETWEEN @begDate and @endDate
DELETE FROM orders WHERE order_datetime BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT
DELETE FROM orders_comps WHERE datetime_inserted BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT
DELETE FROM orders_coupons WHERE datetime_inserted BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT
DELETE FROM orders_credit WHERE date BETWEEN @begDate and @endDate
DELETE FROM orders_credit_response WHERE date BETWEEN @begDate and @endDate
DELETE FROM orders_delivery WHERE timestamp BETWEEN @begTS AND @endTS
DELETE FROM orders_pending WHERE datetime_created BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT
DELETE FROM orders_removals WHERE datetime_removed BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT
DELETE FROM orders_taxes WHERE date BETWEEN @begDate and @endDate
DELETE FROM pending_options WHERE datetime_inserted BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT
DELETE FROM pending_order WHERE datetime_inserted BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT
DELETE FROM refunds WHERE timestamp BETWEEN @begTS AND @endTS
DELETE FROM sales_counts WHERE time_changed BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT
DELETE FROM sales_items WHERE date BETWEEN @begDate and @endDate
DELETE FROM sales_journals WHERE created_on BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT
DELETE FROM tables_times WHERE datetime_event BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT
DELETE FROM tills_adjustments WHERE dt BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT
DELETE FROM tills_register WHERE close_date BETWEEN @begDate and @endDate
DELETE FROM tills_employees WHERE trans_datetime BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT
DELETE FROM tills_employees_log WHERE date BETWEEN @begDate and @endDate
DELETE FROM tills_register_log WHERE date BETWEEN @begDate and @endDate
DELETE FROM tills_register_trans WHERE trans_datetime BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT
DELETE FROM tip_shares WHERE date_created BETWEEN @begDT and @endDT
DELETE FROM deposit WHERE date BETWEEN @begDate and @endDate
--Compiled Data
DELETE FROM hourly_gross WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM hourly_giftcard_sales WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM hourly_category_sales WHERE for_date BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM hourly_pay_insouts WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM hourly_deposits WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM hourly_fees WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM hourly_pay_types WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM hourly_tips WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM hourly_pay_methods WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM daily_post_sir WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM daily_pre_sir WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM daily_comp_report WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM hourly_refunds WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM hourly_taxes WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM hourly_pay_types_other WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM hourly_employee_pay_types WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM hourly_employee_tips WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM hourly_account_payments WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM hourly_guest_counts WHERE for_datetime BETWEEN @begDT AND @endDT
DELETE FROM end_of_day WHERE date BETWEEN @begDate and @endDate
DELETE FROM end_of_day_close WHERE date BETWEEN @begDate and @endDate
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Back Office Passwords In SQL

Overview
Run the following query to see all configured passwords for the Back Office.
SELECT CONVERT(varchar(max), DECRYPTBYPASSPHRASE('pinetree@hq', username)) as username, CONVERT(varchar(max), DECRYPTBYPASSPHRASE('pinetree@hq', password)) as password FROM employees_admin
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: Database Size Query

SELECT 
    
t.NAME
 AS TableName,
    
s.Name
 AS SchemaName,
    p.rows,
    SUM(a.total_pages) * 8 AS TotalSpaceKB, 
    CAST(ROUND(((SUM(a.total_pages) * 8) / 1024.00), 2) AS NUMERIC(36, 2)) AS TotalSpaceMB,
    SUM(a.used_pages) * 8 AS UsedSpaceKB, 
    CAST(ROUND(((SUM(a.used_pages) * 8) / 1024.00), 2) AS NUMERIC(36, 2)) AS UsedSpaceMB, 
    (SUM(a.total_pages) - SUM(a.used_pages)) * 8 AS UnusedSpaceKB,
    CAST(ROUND(((SUM(a.total_pages) - SUM(a.used_pages)) * 8) / 1024.00, 2) AS NUMERIC(36, 2)) AS UnusedSpaceMB
FROM 
    sys.tables t
INNER JOIN      
    sys.indexes i ON t.OBJECT_ID = i.object_id
INNER JOIN 
    sys.partitions p ON i.object_id = p.OBJECT_ID AND i.index_id = p.index_id
INNER JOIN 
    sys.allocation_units a ON p.partition_id = a.container_id
LEFT OUTER JOIN 
    sys.schemas s ON t.schema_id = s.schema_id
WHERE 
    
t.NAME
 NOT LIKE 'dt%' 
    AND t.is_ms_shipped = 0
    AND i.OBJECT_ID > 255 
GROUP BY 
    
t.Name
, 
s.Name
, p.Rows
ORDER BY 
    TotalSpaceMB DESC, 
t.Name
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
Article Title: SQL Scenarios

Examples where you would use SQL to troubleshoot a problem.
Check for Voided Credit Transactions
Context
: Users report missing credit transactions.
Query: 
select * from orders_credit where approved = 'V'
Retrieve Offline Transactions
Context
: Users need offline transaction details for a specific periods.
Query: 
select * from orders_credit where offline = 'Y' and date between '2023-01-01' and '2023-01-07'
 Clearing Test Orders Before Opening
Context
: 
Remove test transactions made before the restaurant opened.
Query: 
select * from orders where order_date < '2023-03-01'
Updating Order Status
Context
: 
Manually mark an incomplete transaction as complete.
Query: 
update orders_pending set status = 'C', picked_up = 'Y' where id = <order_id>'
Employee Credentials Audit
Context
: 
Security audit of employee password changes.
Query: 
select * from employees_passwords where date_created > '2023-01-01'
Print Report for Online Transactions
Context
: 
Ensure all online orders are printed correctly.
Query: 
select * from orders_receipts where receipt_body like '%ONLINE ORDER%'
Fetching Gift Card Orders
Context
: 
Users need a log of all gift card transactions for reconciliation.
Query: 
select * from orders_egift where amount > 0
Offline Credit Transactions
Context
: 
Identify if there are offline credit transactions that haven't been processed.
Query: 
select * from orders_credit where offline = 'Y'
Retrieve Customer Details
Context
: 
Identify if there are offline credit transactions that haven't been processed.
Query: 
select * from orders_credit where offline = 'Y'
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
